目　录

前言

小王子（中文版）

The Littele Prince（英文版）

Le Petit Prince(法文版)





关于作者





圣·埃克苏佩里（1900-1944），出生于法国里昂，1921-1923年在法国空军中服役，曾是后备飞行员，后来又成为民用航空驾驶员，参加了开辟法国—非洲—南美国际航线的工作，其间他还从事文学写作，作品有《南线班机》、《夜航》等等。

1939年德国法西斯入侵法国，鉴于圣·埃克苏佩里曾多次受伤，医生认为他不能再入伍参战。经过坚决要求，他参加了抗德战争，被编入2/33空军侦察大队。1940年法国在战争中溃败，他所在的部队损失惨重，该部队被调往阿尔及尔。他随后即复员，只身流亡美国。在美国期间，他继续从事写作，发表了《战斗飞行员》、《给一个人质的信》以及《小王子》。

1943年，在他的强烈要求下，他回到法国在北非的抗战基地阿尔及尔。上级考虑到他的身体和年龄状况，只同意他执行五次飞行任务，他却要求到八次。1944年7月31日上午，他出航执行第八次任务，从此再也没有回来，牺牲时年仅44岁。





（中英法60周年彩色纪念版）

小王子

［法］圣·埃克苏佩里／著　洪友／译





群言出版社





图书在版编目（CIP）数据





小王子：中英法60周年彩色纪念版/（法）埃克苏佩里（Exupery, S.）著；洪友译．—北京：群言出版社，2012.3（重印）





ISBN 978-7-80080-609-4





Ⅰ．①小…　Ⅱ．①埃…　②洪…　Ⅲ．①童话—法国—现代—汉、英、法　Ⅳ．①I565.88





中国版本图书馆CIP数据核字（2006）第106049号





小王子：中英法60周年彩色纪念版



* * *



责任编辑　刘　桦

封面设计　奇文云海

出版发行　群言出版社（Qunyan Press）

地　　址　北京市东城区东厂胡同北巷1号

邮政编码　100006

网　　站　www.qypublish.com

电子信箱　qunyancbs@126.com

总编办　　010-65265404　65138815

编辑部　　010-65276609　65262436

发行部　　010-65263345　65220236



* * *



经　　销　全国新华书店

读者服务　010-65220236　65265404　65263345

法律顾问　中济律师事务所

印　　刷　北京领先印刷有限公司



* * *



版　　次　2006年9月第1版　2012年3月第2次印刷

开　　本　889×1194mm　1/24

印　　张　8

字　　数　120千字

书　　号　ISBN 978-7-80080-609-4（13位）　ISBN 7-80080-609-X（10位）

定　　价　21.80元



* * *



［版权所有，侵权必究］





中文版序

关于生命与生活的寓言





圣·埃克苏佩里的一生与天空为伍，与星星相伴，他的手稿边存放着一朵星状的花儿。其实，他应该是一颗钻石。遗憾的是，未经精雕细琢就殒落于大海之中。这样的一颗天然宝石，靠当时的社会习俗和动荡是无法雕琢的，但也未能使它衰老。

圣·埃克苏佩里是一位法国飞行员，在一次飞机出现故障迫降时，他差点丢了性命。假如他活下来，是为了写作《小王子》，但这项工作完成之后，他还有什么意义继续活着呢？于是他尝试着脱离我们这一星球，在经过多次失败、多次创伤之后，终于在地中海，他完成了自己的这一愿望。

圣·埃克苏佩里具有诗人的天赋，但他并不是一位普通意义的诗人。诗人的思想，在他身上以一种无法预料的方式、通过其职业表现出来。他在消失之前留下了几个珍贵的词语。



假如我们用平庸的只言片语，假如我们满足于通过这些话语来寻找他身上的“一种高贵”，那么我们就会产生种种误解和错误，甚至制造一些津津乐道之事，比如认为贝多芬成为音乐家比贝多芬降生更为容易，圣·埃克苏佩里这样写道：“考虑到任何东西都不能和人的生命相交换，很显然寻找生命的意义是很困难的。”

当我们想到圣·埃克苏佩里的时候，一个清晰的场景会浮现在我们眼前，就像自己经历过这一场景一样。

在我们眼前，南方运河在延伸，波光粼粼。我们靠近飞行员在低空飞行。就在树梢、屋顶和我们飞机的机翼下面，就是他的布莱格14型飞机，从驾驶舱，他向我们挥手作了个小小的动作。避开阿尔卑斯那白雪皑皑的山顶，他朝大海飞去，向阿里堪特，他的下一站飞去。

他那淡黄色的机身逐渐远去，我们只能静静地看着他离去。在绿色的陆地和蓝天之间，逐渐超越了大地，飞机的影子逐渐远去，伴着地中海波光粼粼的海面，直到消失在远方。

随着向下面的世界降落，我们于是感到了他的存在，比以前更加清晰……

圣·埃克苏佩里在大地与星空中度过44载之后，神秘地消失于大海之中，他的生命结束了，但他的思想、他的心灵、他的《小王子》永传于世。这是一部写给大人看的童话，所有喜欢这本书的读者就像喜欢自己的一个朋友，甜甜的、淡淡的，带有一丝哀愁。这是一本使人感到平静、快乐之书。小王子的消失也未尝不是另一次相遇的开始，也许最后的结局让你忍不住红了眼眶，可是如同他们的约定——五亿个小星星就像小铃铛载着思念在天空中微笑，曾经有过的回忆依旧存在。所以，当夜晚仰望星空的时候，只有你——只有你能够拥有会笑的星星。





致列翁·维尔特





我请求孩子们原谅我，把这本书献给了一个大人。因为我有一个重要理由：这个大人是我在这一世界最好的朋友。我还有一个理由：这个大人无所不知，连写给孩子的书也是如此。我的第三个理由是：这个大人住在法国，在那里过得饥寒交迫，他需要鼓舞。

如果这些理由还不够，那么我愿意把本书献给童年时代的他。

所有大人都曾经是孩子——尽管他们几乎不记得这一点。因此，我就把献词改为：





献给小时候的列翁·维尔特





小王子





1





6岁时，我在一本名为《大自然的真实故事》的书中，看到一幅描绘原始森林的精美图画。画面中，一条巨蟒正在吞食着一个庞然大物。以下便是这幅画的摹本。



书中写道：“巨蟒连嚼都不嚼，便将猎物囫囵吞了下去。之后，它们再也无法动弹。为了消化猎物，它们要睡上整整6个月。”

于是，我对丛林历险开始了深深的遐想。在用彩色铅笔练习一阵之后，我成功完成了自己的第一幅画作——我的《一号画作》。它是这样画的：



我将自己的大作拿给大人们看，问他们是否被这幅画吓坏了。

而他们却答道：“吓坏了？一顶帽子怎么会把人吓坏呢？”

我画的并不是帽子，而是正在消化一头大象的巨蟒。不过，既然大人看不出来，我不妨再画一幅好了：我把巨蟒肚子里的情景画了出来，以便大人们能看清楚。他们总要别人把什么事都解释得明明白白。我的《二号画作》是这样的：



这一次，大人们有了另一种反应。他们叫我把画有巨蟒的作品（无论是“外视图”还是“剖视图”）放到一边，而将心思用在学习地理、历史、算术和语法上。就这样，6岁那年，我放弃了当画家这个有可能成为我伟大职业的梦想。《一号画作》和《二号画作》的先后碰壁让我心灰意冷。大人们永远没有半点独立理解能力，而孩子们又懒得随时随地向他们耐心解释。

从此，我选择了另一种职业，学会了驾驶飞机。我几乎飞遍了世界各地，而地理学也的确派上了大用场。我一眼就能将中国和美国的亚利桑那州区别开来。如果有人夜间迷失了方向，这种知识便如同“及时雨”。

我这一生多次遇到过很多只关心大事的人，也和大人一起生活过很长时间。我密切地、面对面地观察过他们，但这种观察并未极大改变我对他们的看法。

只要遇到他们当中某个我认为思维敏锐的人，我便拿出一直珍藏的《一号画作》给对方看，以此考考他是否真正看得懂。遗憾的是，无论对方是男是女，说的都是那句话：“不就是一顶帽子嘛。”

于是，我再也不向这种人说起巨蟒、原始森林或星星了。我会主动降低层次、迁就对方，和他谈论桥牌、高尔夫、政治、领带之类的话题。而大人们也为碰到我这样一个善解人意的家伙而喜形于色。





2





于是，我就这样独自过着日子，对任何人都不推心置腹，直到6年前我的飞机在撒哈拉沙漠出了事为止。飞机发动机有个地方损坏了。由于身边既没有修理工，也没有乘客，我只好硬着头皮，试着自力更生修理棘手的故障。对我来说，这是个生死攸关的问题，因为我带的饮用水几乎维持不了一周。后来，我在1000英里以内旷无人烟的沙地上睡了第一个晚上。我简直比一个在大海中央遇上海难、靠一支木筏求生的水手还要孤立无援。鉴于此，当我在日出时被一个奇异而微弱的声音唤醒时，惊诧之情就不难想象了。这个声音说：

“请问——能给我画一只羊吗？”

“什么？”

“给我画一只羊！”

我一下子跳起来，完全懵了。我吃力地眨眨眼，仔细环顾四周，看到一个小得可怜的人站在那里，非常严肃地打量着我。以下你看到的，可能是我后来能为他画出的最好的肖像，不过，和他本人的模样比起来，我的画当然要逊色多了。

不过这并不是我的错。我6岁时，大人们便让我失去了追求画家梦的勇气，而我除了画蟒蛇的“外视图”和“剖视图”之外，再也没有学画过任何东西。

现在，我瞪大着眼睛，惊奇地注视着这个不知从哪里冒出来的小家伙。你应该记得，我的飞机可是坠落在周围1000英里无人居住的沙漠上。然而，这个小精灵看上去既不会在沙地上迷路，也不会由于疲劳、饥渴或恐惧而晕厥。从他身上根本看不出他是一个在远离人迹1000英里的沙漠中央迷路的小孩。我终于缓过神来，开口问他：

“不过——你在这儿做什么？”

他非常缓慢地反复回答那句话，就像在说一件非同小可的事：

“请问——能给我画一只羊吗……”

人在面对一种不可抗拒的神秘力量时，是不敢不任其左右的。在这个千里之内杳无人迹的地方，在面临死亡威胁的时候，尽管这一切对我而言有些莫名其妙，但我还是从口袋里掏出一张纸和我的钢笔。然而，我随即想起大人们如何奉劝我将精力用在学习地理、历史、算术和语法上，

于是便对这个难缠的小家伙说我不会画画。他对我说：

“这没关系。给我画只羊就行了……”

但我从没有画过羊。于是，我为他画了我经常画的那两幅画中的一幅，那是一只吞食大象的巨蟒“剖视图”。小家伙惊叫失声，这让我非常惊讶。

“不，不，不！我不想要一头死在巨蟒腹中的大象。巨蟒是一种很危险的动物，而大象又非常笨重。我住的地方一切都很小。我想要的是一只羊，给我画只羊吧。”

于是我便画了一幅。

他认真看了看，然后说：



“不。这只羊已经病入膏肓。再给我画一幅吧！”

于是我又画了一幅。

我的朋友温柔而大方地笑起来。

“你瞧你，”他说，“这根本不是小羊，而是一只公羊，头上还长着两只犄角呢。”

无奈，我又重新画了一张。

然而，和前面几张一样，这张画也被他拒绝了。



“这只羊太老，我想要一只能活很久的羊。”

此时我已经完全失去了耐心，因为我还要忙着拆卸发动机呢。于是，我信手把这张画匆匆画完，还作了一番解释：



“这只是装羊的箱子，你想要的羊就在里面。”我十分惊奇地看到这位少年鉴赏家的脸上绽开了笑容：

“我想要的就是这种画！你觉得这只羊要吃很多草吗？”

“何出此言？”

“因为我住的地方一切都很小……”

“那里的草肯定够它吃了，”我说，“我给你画的羊非常小。”



他低下头看着画。

“没有你说的那么小吧——看！它已经睡着了……”

就这样，我认识了小王子。





3





我花了好长时间才搞清楚他从哪里来。小王子问了我一大堆问题，但我问他的问题，他似乎根本没有听进去。只是他无意中透露出的只言片语，才让我一五一十地掌握了来龙去脉。



比如说，他第一次看见我的飞机时（我就不画飞机了，这种任务对我来说太复杂）问我：

“那是什么玩艺儿？”

“那不是玩艺儿。它能飞，是一架飞机，我开的飞机。”

我自豪地告诉他说我能飞。

他叫起来，然后说：

“天呐！你们是从天上掉下来的吗？”

“是啊！”我谦逊地答道。

“哦！这太有意思了！”

小王子爆发出一阵天真而清脆的笑声，这让我很不舒服。我可不喜欢别人对我的不幸若无其事。

接着他又说：

“那么，你也是从天上来的？你住在哪个星球？这时，我从他出现的那个密不透光的谜团中捕捉到了一丝亮光，于是，我冷不丁地急忙问：

“难道你来自另一个星球？”

他并没有回答，只是轻轻地晃着脑袋，目不转睛地盯着我的飞机：

“没错儿，坐着飞机，你不可能来自很远的地方……”

他长时间地陷入沉思。然后，他从口袋里掏出我画的那只羊，聚精会神地凝神思忖着他的宝贝。

你可以想象有关“其他星球”的这种若明若暗的迹象，是怎样激起我的好奇心的。因此，我煞费苦心要探明其中的更多奥秘。

“小家伙，你从哪里来？你所说的‘我居住的地方’指的是哪里？你想把你的小羊带到哪儿去？”

一阵沉思之后，他答道：

“好就好在你给我画的那只箱子，小羊晚上可以拿来当房子用。”

“那倒是。如果你听我的话，我还会给你画一条绳子，这样你白天就可以拴着它。我还可以给你画一根拴羊的柱子。”

不过，小王子似乎对我的这一提议很吃惊。

“拴住它！亏你想得出！”

“但是，如果你不拴住它，”我说，“它会到处乱跑并迷路的。”

我的朋友又爆发出一阵清脆的笑声：

“那么，你认为他会跑到哪里去？”

“哪儿都有可能。一直朝前跑呗。”

这时，小王子诚恳地说：

“这不要紧。我住的地方一切都很小！”

接着，他又略带伤感地说：

“任何人在它前面走，也走不了多远……”





4





这就样，我又了解了第二件非常重要的大事：小王子前来的那个星球和一间房子差不多大。

不过，这件事并没有让我真的感到很吃惊。我非常清楚地知道，除了我们地球人命名的地球、木星、火星、金星等大行星以外，还有数百个其他星球，其中有一些小得我们用望远镜都看不见。当某个天文学家发现一颗这样的行星时，他通常不给星星命名，而只是用一个数字表示。比如说，他可以叫它“325星宿”。

我有确凿的证据相信，小王子来自的那个星球是被人称为“B-612”的行星。

这个星宿人们用望远镜只见过一次，是一位土耳其天文学家1909年观察到的。



这位天文学家将自己的发现成果提交给国际天文学家代表大会，并进行了充分论证。但是，由于他身着土耳其民族服装，因此与会者没有人相信他说的话。

大人就是这样……

不过，好在土耳其有一位独裁者为了捍卫“B-612”星宿的声誉，颁布法律规定所有臣民都必须改穿欧式服装，否则便处以死刑。于是在1920年，这位天文学家身穿既时尚又考究、令人过目不忘的服装，再次完整地进行了一次论证。这次所有人都接受了他汇报的观点。



我之所以向你讲述有关这颗行星的此类细节，并且提请你注意它的编号，那是为了迎合大人和大人们的思维方式。当你告诉他们你交了一位新朋友时，他们从来不问你任何实质性问题。他们根本不会问你：“他的嗓音听起来像什么？他最喜欢玩什么？他收集蝴蝶吗？”而是急不可耐地问：“他多大了？有几个兄弟？他有多重？他父亲挣多少钱？”他们认为，只有从这些数字中才能了解那位朋友的一切。

如果你对大人说：“我看见一套美丽的房子，它用粉红色砖块砌成，窗台上养着天竺葵，屋顶上还有鸽子。”他们根本想不出这间房子到底是什么样子。你应该对他们说：“我看见一套价值两万美元的房子。”于是他们会叫起来：“哦，这房子该多棒啊！”

同样，你可能会对他们说：“我之所以说存在小王子，证据就是他天真可爱、喜欢笑，而且想要一只小羊。有人想要一只小羊，这应该成为他客观存在的证据吧。”对他们说这些有什么用？他们会耸耸肩，觉得你稚气未脱。但是，如果你对他们说：“他前来的那个星球是B-612星宿”，他们便会相信你的话，不再提问题烦你。

不过，对我们这些懂得生活真谛的人来说，数字确实不是什么重要的东西。我更喜欢以讲述童话的方式来开始这个故事。我更愿意这样说：“从前，在某个星球上住着一位小王子。那个星球和小王子本人差不多大。小王子想要一只小羊。”

对那些懂得生活真谛的人而言，这种表述应该使我的故事显得更加真实可信。

我不希望任何人读我的书时漫不经心。写下这些往事时，我的心里非常难过。自从我的朋友带着他的小羊离开我以来，6年已经过去了。之所以我想在此描写他，就是为了保证我不会忘记他。忘却朋友让人伤感。并不是每个人都有过朋友。如果忘记了他，我就会像那些大人一样，对数字之外的任何事物都不感兴趣……

同样，也正是出于这一目的，我买了一盒颜料和几支铅笔。以我当时的年龄，想再次画画太难了，因为自打我6岁以后，除了会画巨蟒的那些“外视图”和“剖视图”之外，就再也没有画过画。当然，我会尽量使我画的肖像贴近生活实际，但我没有一点成功的把握。这张画得还不错，另一张却画得面目全非。而且我在小王子的身高上也犯了一些错误：这一张把他画得太高，另一张又画得太矮。此外，我觉得对他所穿衣服的描绘也不准确。所以，我只能尽最大努力边干边学，一会儿画得好，一会儿画得糟，总体上画个马马虎虎也就满意了。

在某些很重要的细节上，我也会犯错误，不过，出现这种情况也不能怨我。我的朋友从来没向我做过任何解释，也许他觉得我和他一样吧！不过没办法，我不知道如何透过盒子围成的屏障看清里面的小羊。我大概变得有点像大人，不过我总是要变老的。





5





随着日子一天天过去，在与小王子的交谈中，我开始对他居住的星球、他的出走和旅程有了一定了解。这些信息都是从他的所思所想中偶尔流露出来的，因此来得很慢。正是通过这种方式，我在第三天听说了有关非洲巨树——猴面包树的悲剧。

这一次，我还是将事件的起因归咎于那只小羊。因为那天小王子就像无法摆脱某个不解之谜一样突然问我：“羊吃小灌木，这是真的吗？”

“是的，是真的。”

“哦！这太好了！”

我当时并不明白羊吃小灌木为什么有那么重要。但是小王子又追问：

“那么，是否可以认为，它们也吃猴面包树呢？”

我向小王子解释说，猴面包树并不是小灌木，恰恰相反，这种树大得像城堡。就算他回去时带上整整一群大象，象群也吃不完一颗猴面包树上的果实。

象群的念头逗得小王子笑起来。



“那我们只好把它们一只接一只摞起来了。”他说。不过，他倒是颇有心计地评论道：

“猴面包树在长成参天大树之前，一开始不也是小小的么！”

“严格来讲，这话没错儿，”我说，“但是，为什么你想让小羊去吃小猴面包树呢？”

他想都没想回答我，“哦，那当然，那当然！”就像他所说的话不言而喻。可我在无人帮助的情况下，只能绞尽脑汁地想清楚这个问题。

实际上，据我后来所知，和所有星球一样，小王子居住的星球上的植物也有好坏之分。因此，星球上既有益草结出的良种，也有害草结出的毒籽。但种子是看不见的，它们深深地沉睡在泥土那黑漆漆的中央，直到其中某一粒压抑不住苏醒的渴望。于是，这粒小小的种子便展开身子，开始（最初有些怯生生）腼腆地对着太阳，向上伸出一支柔弱可爱的小嫩苗。如果它只是一支萝卜苗或玫瑰的嫩枝，人们便会随便它自由地四处生长；然而，如果它是一种害草，人们一经认出，就肯定会尽快毁掉它。

此时，在小王子居住的星球上，有一些可怕的种子，这便是猴面包树种。那个星球上的土壤是这种树生长的温床。如果某一颗猴面包树发现得太晚，你就再也无法除掉它。它会盘踞整个星球，用树根将星球钻个底朝天。如果星球太小，而猴面包树又太多，那么，它们会把星球分割得支离破碎。





“这可是个纪律问题，”小王子后来对我说，“当你早晨洗漱完毕之后，要马上对你的星球梳妆打扮，万分仔细地把它收拾得井井有条。你必须提醒自己定期拔掉所有猴面包树。这种树的幼苗在萌芽时和玫瑰的幼苗特别相象，一旦能辨别这两种树苗，你就应当立即下手。这种工作非常枯燥，”小王子又补了一句，“不过也很容易。”

一天，他对我说：“你应该画一幅美丽的图画，好让你家乡的孩子对这一切看得真真切切。倘若他们哪一天要出门旅行，这种认识对他们大有裨益。”他又说：“有时候，将某件工作推迟到第二天做并没有害处。但是，如果碰上拔猴面包树这种事儿，这种延误随时都意味着大祸临头。我曾听说有个星球，上面住着一个懒汉。他对三株小灌木视而不见……”

就这样，我根据小王子所做的描述，将该星球画了出来。我向来不太喜欢以道德家的口吻说话，但是，猴面包树带来的危险人们实在知之甚少，而任何在某颗星宿上迷路的人都有可能面临如此严重的灾难，所以，我现在只好破例一改往日的矜持。“孩子们，”我开门见山地说，“可要看好猴面包树啊！”

和我自己一样，我的朋友们受这种危险的困扰也有很长时间了，但他们都浑然不知。所以，为了保护他们，我费尽心思画了这幅画。教训太深刻了，我通过这种方式提醒大家不要重蹈覆辙，而我自己再麻烦也是值得的。

也许你会问我：“在这本书中，为什么再也找不出和这幅猴面包树图画一样壮观、一样令人难忘的画呢？”

答案很简单。我已经试过了，但是其他画我都画不好。然而，在画猴面包树的时候，却有一种紧迫感、一种力量在鼓舞着我，让我无法抗拒。





6





哦，小王子！我开始逐渐认识到你忧伤生活的奥秘……有很长一段时间，你发现自己的惟一乐趣就是静静地观看落日。这一新细节是第四天早上你告诉我之后我才得知的：

“我特别喜欢看落日。来，现在我们就去看夕阳吧！”

“但我们必须等。”我说。

“等？等什么？”

“等日头落山。我们必须等到那时候。”

一开始，你对我的话似乎非常吃惊。接着，你便自我解嘲般地笑起来。你对我说：

“我老是觉得自己在家里！”

是啊，大家都知道，美国正午时，法国却处在黄昏时分。

如果你能在一分钟之内飞到法国，就可以在美国的正午时分直接看到日落。遗憾的是，法国离美国实在太远。但是，我的小王子，在你那微小的星球上，你只用将坐椅挪几步就可以做到。





只要你愿意，可以随时看到白昼结束、夜幕降临。

你对我说：“有一天，我看到了44次落日……！”

过了一会儿，你又说：

“你知道，人在忧伤时喜欢看落日……”

“看了44次落日，当时你就那么忧伤？”

但小王子没有回答。





7





第五天，和往常一样，小羊的帮助为我揭开了小王子的生活秘密。就像对所提的问题经过长期深思熟虑一样，他突然没头没脑地问我：

“如果小羊吃小灌木，那它是不是也吃花？”

“只要够得着，小羊看见什么吃什么。”我答道。

“连带刺的花儿也吃？”

“是的，它连带刺的花儿都吃。”

“刺？刺有何用呢？”

我也不知道。当时我正忙着将牢牢固定在发动机上的一颗螺钉拧下来。我越发清楚地发现，飞机损毁相当严重，这让我焦急万分。另外，饮用水所剩无几，我不得不担心出现最坏的情况。

“那些刺儿——它们有何用处？”

小王子一旦提出某个问题，一定会刨根问底。而我呢，那个该死的螺钉已经让我心烦意乱。我不假思索地答道：

“那些刺毫无用处。花儿带刺，仅仅是为了表达它们的怨恨罢了！”

“哦！”

完全沉默一会儿之后，小王子突然闪到我身后，有些愤慨地说：“我不信你的话！花是柔弱、纯朴的生物，总是尽最大努力安慰自己。它们相信身上的刺是最有力的武器……”

我没做声。当时我正在想：“如果这颗螺钉还纹丝不动，我就用锤子把它敲掉。”而小王子却再次搅乱了我的思绪。

“其实，你也相信花儿……”

“哦，不！”我叫起来。“哦，不，不！我什么也不相信。我只不过随口答应而已。我正忙着做正经事呢，你就没有看见？”

他瞠目结舌地瞪着我。

“正经事！”

他站在那里看着我，我手里正拿着锤子，手指沾满发动机机油的污渍，弯腰俯在一个对他来说极难看的机件上。

“你说话和那些大人一样！”

这句话让我有点难为情。他却不管不顾地接着说：“你把任何东西都搅在一起……你什么也分不清……”

他真的大动肝火，那头金色卷发随风摇摆。

“我听说有个星球，上面住着一位红脸先生。他从未闻过一朵花，从未看过一颗星星，从未爱过任何人。除了算账，他什么也没做过。他成天像你一样反复说：‘我在忙着做正经事呢！’这使他的虚荣心日益膨胀。不过，他并不是人——他是一朵蘑菇！”

“一朵什么？”

“一朵蘑菇！”

此时，小王子气得脸色发白。

“数百万年以来，花儿一直长刺；数百万年以来，羊儿一直吃花。努力搞清花儿为什么历尽千辛万苦去长对它们毫无用处的刺，这难道不是正经事吗？羊和花之间的斗争难道就不重要？这不比大腹便便的红脸先生的账目更重要？假如我自己认识世上仅有的一朵花，它就生长在我居住的星球上，但在一天早上，却有一只小羊稀里糊涂地一口把它吃掉——天呐！你却认为这并不重要！”

他继续说下去，脸色由白变红：“如果你爱上了这无数星星中盛开的惟一花朵，只用凝望这些星星，就足以让花儿感到幸福。你可以自言自语说，‘我的花就在这些星星上……’，但如果羊儿吃掉了这朵花，你所有的星星就会瞬间内变得一团漆黑……可恨的是，你竟然认为这并不重要！”他泣不成声，再也说不下去了。

夜幕降临了。我任由工具从手中滑落。现在，我的锤子、螺钉甚至饥渴或死亡还有何重要性可言？在一个星球上，在我所在的星球——地球上，有一位小王子需要安慰！我一把将他搂进怀里摇晃着，对他说：“你喜爱的那朵花并无危险。我会给你的小羊画一幅口套，再画一圈围栏将你的花儿保护起来。我会……”

我不知道该对他说什么好。我觉得自己既尴尬又笨拙。我不知道如何走进他的内心，在那里我可以再次与他邂逅，再次和他手拉手。

泪水的世界就是这样一个神秘之地。





8





我很快便找到了进一步了解这朵花的办法。在小王子居住的星球上，生长的花儿向来都非常单纯。它们只有一层花瓣，而且这些花一点不占地方，不会影响任何人。早上，它们在草丛中盛开；到了晚上，它们则悄无声息地凋谢。但是有一天，不知从哪里吹来一粒种子，于是又一朵花儿冒了出来。小王子特别仔细地观察着这株与他所住星球生长的其他新芽都不一样的嫩苗。你知道，它有可能是一种新的猴面包树。



这朵新芽很快便不再生长，而准备孕育一朵花。一个大大的花蕾刚刚露头时，小王子便在现场守候，他很快便觉得从这个花蕾中肯定会出现某种奇迹。但是，这朵花却在它那绿茵茵的窝里不知满足地精心梳妆打扮。她精心选择自己的颜色，一片片地梳理她的花瓣，不愿像虞美人那样满脸皱纹地来到人间。只有在完全展示美貌时她才愿意露面。哦，是啊！她是风情万种的生命体！而她那神秘的装饰也会一天天保持着。

于是，一天早上，太阳刚刚升起的时候，她突然开放。

辛苦却很精细地做完这一切，她打着哈欠说：

“哦！我刚刚醒过来。请原谅，我的花瓣还一点没有整理呢……”

但是，小王子的爱慕之情却油然而生：

“天哪！你太美了！”

“我美吗？”花儿甜甜地应着，“我是在太阳升起的同一时刻出生的……”

小王子毫不费力就能猜出她根本不太谦虚，但是，她是多么令人感动、令人振奋啊！

“我想我该吃早饭了，”过了片刻，她又说，“麻烦你也想着我……”

小王子十分局促不安，便去寻找一只装有清水的喷壶，为花儿浇起水来。

于是，她再次迅速用她的虚荣心（一旦真相大白，满足这种虚荣心就有点难了）来折磨小王子。比如，一天，她向小王子说起她身上的四根刺：

“让老虎张着利爪过来吧！”

“我的星球上没有老虎，”小王子回击她，“而且，不管怎么说，老虎也不吃草啊。”

“我不是草，”花儿甜蜜地回答。

“真抱歉……”

“我根本不怕老虎，”她接着说，“不过我特别讨厌穿堂风。你认为是否能给我搬一扇屏风来？”



“特别讨厌穿堂风——对植物来说，这确实不走运，”小王子接过话茬，然后又径自补了一句，“这朵花真难伺候……”

“我希望你晚上能将我放进一个玻璃罩。你住的地方太冷了，我原来住的那地方……”

说到这里，她主动住口。她来的时候是一粒种子，根本不知道别的世界什么样。为了掩饰自己由于不高明的谎言即将被揭穿而窘迫，她干咳了三两声，以便将责任推到小王子身上。

“屏风呢？”

“你刚才对我说的时候，我正打算去找……”

接着，她又迫使自己咳了几声，目的仍然是想让小王子自责。

就这样，尽管小王子在对花儿的爱慕中一直饱含亲切之情，却也立即对她产生了怀疑。他总是过于认真地对待那些无关紧要的话，这样做让他非常不快。

“我不应该听她的话，”一天，他向我倾诉着，“我们永远不要听信花儿的话，只用看看她们、闻闻她们的香味就可以了。那朵花使我的星球四处飘香，但我却不懂得如何享用她的全部恩赐。至于有关老虎利爪的故事，本来只应该让我的心扉充满柔情和怜悯，却让我苦不堪言。”

他继续倾诉着肺腑之言：

“其实，我过去什么也不懂！我本应该根据事实而不是花言巧语来判断她。她用她的芬芳环绕着我，用她的光辉照耀着我。我真不该离开她……我应该猜出隐藏在她拙劣伎俩背后的所有温情。但我当时太小了，根本不知道怎样去爱她……”





9





我相信小王子是利用一群野鸟迁徙的机会跑出来的。离开的那天早上，他把自己的星球收拾得无比整洁，还把他的活火山认真打扫干净。他有两座活火山，早上可以很方便地在上面热早点。他还有一座死火山。不过，如他所言，“谁知道它还会不会复活呢！”于是，他将那座死火山也收拾停当。火山一旦打扫干净，就可以缓慢而稳定地燃烧，不会爆发。火山爆发就像烟囱里冒烟一样。

在地球上，我们显然没有大到清理地球火山的程度。这就是它们给人类带来无尽苦恼的原因。

小王子还带着一丝悲戚的情绪，拔掉了猴面包树的最后一批树苗。他相信自己肯定不会再回来。不过，在最后一个早上，所有这些熟悉不过的任务对他而言似乎都很珍贵。给花儿浇最后一次水并打算用玻璃罩将它保护起来时，他发现自己快要流泪了。

“再见！”他对花儿说。



但她没有作声。

“再见了！”他又说了一遍。

花儿咳嗽起来，但并非感冒所致。

“我一直那么傻，”她终于对他说，“请原谅。祝你幸福……”

她没有怪他，这让他惊讶。他茫然若失地站在那里，怔怔地举着玻璃罩。他不明白花儿为何恬静和温柔。

“我当然爱你，”花儿对他说，“你一直不懂我的爱，这是我的错。不过这并不重要。但是你——你却和我一样傻。祝你幸福……将玻璃罩拿走吧，我不需要。”

“但是风儿——”

“我还没有感冒到弱不禁风的程度……凉爽的夜风对我有好处。我是一朵花。”

“但是动物们——”

“对了，如果我想认识蝴蝶，就必须能够对付两三只毛毛虫。蝴蝶看上去真漂亮。如果没有蝴蝶和毛毛虫，还会有谁来看望我呢？你就要远行了……至于庞大的动物——我根本不怕它们。我有我自己的利爪呢。”

她天真地炫耀着那四根刺，然后补了一句：

“不要再这样磨磨蹭蹭了，你不是决意要离开吗？现在就走吧！”

她是不想让小王子看到她哭泣。她这朵花儿自尊心那么强……





10





小王子发现自己身处325、326、327、328、329、330星宿附近。于是，他开始一一访问它们，以增长一点见识。

第一颗星宿上住着一位国王。他身穿蓝紫色衣服和貂皮袍，坐在一个既简陋又威严的宝座上。

“哈哈！来了一位臣民！”看到小王子走来，国王不禁欢呼。

小王子满腹狐疑：

“他以前从未见过我，怎会认得我呢？”

他并不知道世界对于国王们是多么简单，对他们而言，任何人都是臣民。

“过来吧，这样我能看得清楚些。”国王说。终于成了某个人的国王，这让他感到无比自豪。

小王子四处张望，想找个地方坐下来，但是整个星球都被国王那硕大的貂皮袍遮盖得严严实实。于是，他就那样笔直地站着，因为有些疲倦，他打起了哈欠。

“在国王面前打哈欠有失礼节，”国王对他说，“我不准你那样做。”

“我忍不住。我控制不了自己，”小王子万分窘迫地答道，“我长途跋涉来到这里，觉都没有睡……”

“哦，是这样，那么，”国王说，“我命令你打哈欠。我已经好多年没见过别人打哈欠了。对我来说，打哈欠倒是新鲜事。来吧，再打个哈欠！这是命令。”

“你吓着我了……我再也打不出来了……”小王子低声嘟哝着，这时他太难为情了。

“哼！哼！”国王答道，“那么，我命令你一会儿打哈欠，一会儿不打哈欠……”

他有点气急败坏，看上去恼羞成怒了。

其实，国王所提的要求主要是对方必须尊重他的权威。他容不得半点违抗。他是一个地地道道的统治者，但是，由于他很仁慈，所以只会下达合理的命令。

“如果我命令某位将军，”他会举例说明这一点，“如果我命令某位将军把自己变成一只海鸟，而那位将军却不执行命令，那不是将军的错，而是我的错。”

“我能坐下来吗？”这时，小王子怯生生地请求。

“我命令你坐下，”国王威风凛凛地将他的貂皮袍折起一些，答道。



不过小王子有些想不通……这个星球那么小，这位国王到底统治什么呢？

“陛下，”他对国王说，“请问，可以问您一个问题吗？”

“我命令你问我一个问题，”国王赶紧向他保证。

“陛下——您统治什么呢？”

“统治一切，”国王的回答非常简练。

“统治一切？”

国王做了一个手势，将他所在的星球、其他星球和所有星星全都包含进去。

“统治所有这些？”小王子问。

“统治所有这些，”国王回答。

原来他的统治力不仅不可违抗，而且无所不包。

“那么，星星都服从你吗？”

“它们当然听，”国王说，“它们必须立即服从。我不允许丝毫反抗。”

这种权力让小王子赞叹不已。如果他掌握了这种无所不包的权力，他在一天之内看到的日落就不是44次，而是72次、100次甚至200次，连坐椅都不用挪动。他想起被自己遗弃的那颗小星球，感到有些难过，鉴于此，他鼓起勇气向国王请求：

“我想看一次落日……请您帮帮我吧……命令太阳落下去……”

“如果我命令一位将军像蝴蝶那样从这朵花飞向那朵花，或者命令他写一部悲剧，或者命令他把自己变成一只海鸟，而将军却不按我的命令去做，那么，我们俩责任在谁呢？”国王问，“是将军，还是我自己？”

“责任在您。”小王子坚定地说。

“一点不错。我们只能要求别人做力所能及的事，”国王接着说，“要求首先必须合理，威信才能被人接受。如果你命令你的人去投海，他们便会揭竿而起。我有权要求受令者服从命令，因为我的命令是合理的。”

“那么我提出的日落要求呢？”小王子提醒着国王。问题一旦问出了口，他从来不会忘记。

“你会看到你的落日的。我会给太阳下命令。不过，从我的统治经验看，必须等到时机成熟时下达命令。”

“那是什么时候？”小王子刨根问底。

“嗯！嗯！”国王答道。他要在翻阅一本大部头年历之后才会开口，“嗯！嗯！大约——大约是今晚7点40分。你会看到我的命令是怎样执行的。”

小王子又打起了哈欠。他为看不到落日而遗憾。此外，他也开始有点烦了。

“我在这里没什么要做的了，”他对国王说，“所以，我还是再次启程赶路吧！”

“别走哇！”国王说，他还在为好不容易来了个臣民洋洋得意呢！“千万别走。我任命你当部长！”

“什么部长？”

“——司法部长吧！”

“但是，这里没有审判对象啊！”

“这我倒不清楚，”国王对他说，“我还没有完整地巡视过我的王国呢！我年纪大了，这里又放不下一辆马车。步行会累坏我的。”

“哦，我倒已经看过了！”小王子说着，转头向星球的另一边又瞥了一眼。和这边一样，那边也没有一个人……

“那么，你就审你自己吧！”国王回答，“这是最难办的事。审判自己比审判别人难得多。如果你能公正地审判自己，那么，你就算得上一个真正睿智的人。”

“是啊，”小王子说，“不过，我在任何地方审判自己都可以，不一定非得在这个星球上。”

“嗯！嗯！”国王说，“我有充足的理由相信，在我的星球某处有一只年迈的耗子，晚上我能听到它的声音。你可以审问这只耗子，偶尔还能判它死刑。如此一来，它的小命就攥在你的手里了。不过，你每次都得放它一马，不能无节制地使用它。我们只有这只耗子了。”

小王子答道：“我不想宣判任何人死刑。现在，我想我该赶路了。”

“别！”国王说。

但是，此时小王子的出发准备已经就绪，但他不想让这位老国王难过。

“如果陛下希望自己的命令立即得到执行，”他说，“您也应该能给我下达一个合理的命令。比如说，您可以命令我一分钟之内离开。我认为条件已经成熟了……”

国王默不做声时，小王子踌躇片刻，接着叹了一口气，走了。

“我任命你担任大使。”国王急忙向他喊。

他摆出一副高高在上的样子。

“大人们真奇怪！”小王子继续赶路，心里想。





11





第二个星球上住着一位自大狂。

“喔！喔！我要接受一位崇拜者的来访了！”看到小王子走来，他大老远便欢呼起来。

因为对自高自大的人来说，其他所有人都是他们的崇拜者。

“早上好，”小王子说，“你戴的帽子好怪。”

“这顶帽子是行礼用的，”自大狂答道，“当人们向我欢呼时，我举起它来还礼。可惜从来就没有人从这里路过。”

“是吗？”小王子说，他听不懂这位自大狂在说什么。

“你用一只手拍另一只手，”自大狂现在开始指点他。

小王子鼓起掌来。自大狂举起帽子，得体地行了个礼。

“这比起访问那位国王倒是有意思得多，”小王子心想。他再次开始拍起巴掌，自大狂则再次举起帽子还礼。



这样练习5分钟之后，小王子对这种单调的把戏开始厌倦。

“应该怎样做才能使你的帽子掉下来？”他问。

自大狂并没有听见，自高自大的人除了溢美之辞，什么也听不进去。

“你真的非常崇拜我吗？”他询问小王子。

“‘崇拜’是什么意思？”

“崇拜表示你将我看成这个星球上相貌最英俊、着装最讲究、最富有、最聪明的人。”

“但是，你的星球就你一个人啊！”

“帮我个忙吧。即便如此，还是请你崇拜我。”

“我崇拜你，”小王子轻轻地耸耸肩，“不过，是什么让你对受人崇拜如此着迷？”

于是小王子离开了。

“大人们确实很古怪，”他一边赶路，一边自言自语。





12





下一个星球上住着一位酒鬼。小王子访问这个星球的时间很短，但这次旅行却使他陷入了深深的哀伤。

“您在那里干什么？”他发现酒鬼静地安坐在一堆空酒瓶和装酒的酒瓶前面，便问他。

“我在喝酒，”酒鬼答着，情绪非常低落。

“为什么你要喝酒？”小王子问。

“为了忘却。”酒鬼回答。

“忘却什么？”小王子追问道，已经有些可怜他了。

“忘却我的羞愧。”酒鬼低着头忏悔道。

“羞愧什么？”小王子追根问底。他想帮助对方。

“羞愧我喝酒！”酒鬼说完便住了口，再也不开口了。

小王子大惑不解地离开了。

“大人们确实太古怪了！”他继续赶路，嘴里咕哝着。





13





第四个星球属于一位商人。此人工作起来太投入了，小王子来到跟前时，他连头都没抬一下。

“早上好，”小王子打着招呼，“您的香烟灭了。”

“3加2等于5。5加7等于12。12加3等于15。早上好。15加7等于22。22加6等于28。我没时间点着它。26加5等于31。唷！一共是501,622,731。”

“5亿什么？”小王子问。

“啊？你还在那里？5.01亿……我停不下来……我要做的事太多了！我关心的是大事。我不会说些废话取乐。2加5等于7……”

“5.01亿什么呀？”小王子又问，一旦问题问出了口，他向来不会放过它。

商人抬起头来。

“我在这个星球上居住的54年间，只被打扰过3次。第一次是20年前，不知从什么鬼地方掉下来一只鹅。它发出特别可怕的噪音，声音四处回荡，害得我做加法运算时错了4处。第二次是11年前，我风湿病发作，苦不堪言。我无法经常锻炼身体，也没有时间四处闲逛。第三次——哦，这次便是！对了，我刚才是说5.01亿吧……”



“5亿什么东西？”

商人突然发现自己想得到安宁是没有指望了，除非回答这个问题。

“数亿那些小东西，”他说，“我们有时候能在天上看到它。”

“苍蝇吗？”

“哦，不，闪闪发光的小东西。”

“蜜蜂？”

“哦，不。这种小东西呈金黄色，它让懒汉做黄粱美梦。而我呢，我关心的都是大事。我向来没时候胡思乱想。”

“哦！您是指星星？”

“对了，就是它。星星。”

“您要5亿颗星星做什么用？”

“是501,622,731颗。我只关心大事，我这人计算起来特别精确。”

“您要这些星星做什么用？”

“我拿它们做什么用？”

“是啊。”

“什么也不做。我拥有它们。”

“您拥有星星？”

“对。”

“但是，我曾经见过一位国王……”

“国王并不拥有，他们要做的事是统治。拥有和统治是截然不同的两件事。”

“拥有星星对您有何好处？”

“它给我的好处就是使我富有。”

“它给你的好处就是使您富有？”

“它使我能购买更多星星，如果能找到星星的话。”

“此人的思维逻辑有点像那个可怜的酒鬼……，”小王子自忖。

尽管如此，他仍然还有些问题要问。

“一个人怎么可能拥有星星呢？”

“那你说它们归谁所有？”商人颇为不快地反唇相讥。

“我不知道，但它们不属于任何人。”

“那么它们就归我所有了，因为我是想起这件事的第一个人。”

“一定是这样吗？”

“那当然。当你发现一颗宝石时，如果它不属于任何人，那它就是你的。如果你发现一个岛屿，它不属于任何人，那它就是你的。如果你抢在所有其他人之前想出一个主意，你就获得了有关这一主意的专用权：它便是你的。对我也是一样：我拥有这些星星，因为在我之前没有任何人想过拥有它们。”

“是啊，有道理，”小王子说，“您要它们干什么？”

“我经营它们，”商人回答，“我一遍遍数它们。这并不容易。不过，我这个人天生就对大事感兴趣。”

小王子对他的回答仍不满意。

“如果我有一条绸布围巾，”他说，“我可以把它围在脖子上，可以随身携带。如果我有一朵花，我可以把它采下来，可以随身携带。但是，你却无法从天空中摘取星星……”

“我是不能摘，但我可以把它们存进银行。”

“什么意思？”

“也就是说，我将星星的数量记在一张小纸上。然后，我把这张纸放进抽屉，用锁锁上。”

“这就完了？”

“这就够了。”商人说。

“有意思，”小王子想，“这倒很有诗意。但是，这种事没什么了不起。”

说起大事，小王子有着和大人们截然不同的想法。

“我自己拥有一朵花，”他继续和商人交谈，“我每天都给它浇水。我有三座火山，我每周都把它们收拾得干干净净。连其中那座死火山我也要打扫，天知道它还会不会复活呢。我拥有火山和花儿，而且我的工作对它们都有用。但您对星星有什么用呢……”

商人张开嘴，却发现无言以对。于是小王子便走了。

“大人们确实都很反常！”他在继续赶路时，仅仅对自己说了这么一句。





14





第五个星球非常奇怪。它是最小的一个，上面的空间只容得下一盏路灯和一位点灯人。小王子一点也想不通：在一个既没有人居住又没有房子的星球上，要一盏路灯和一个点灯人干什么呢？尽管如此，他还是自言自语道：

“很可能此人脑子有问题。不过，他倒不至于像国王、自大狂、商人和酒鬼那样可笑，因为他的工作起码还有些意义。每次点燃路灯时，就好像他又唤醒了一颗星或一朵花；熄灭路灯时，他又将花儿或星星送进梦乡。这是个美妙的差事。由于它美妙，所以也就真正有用了。”

到达这个星球时，他客气地向点灯人打招呼。

“早上好。刚才您为什么把灯熄灭呢？”

“这是命令，”点灯人回答，“早上好！”

“什么命令？”

“命令就是我要将灯熄灭。晚上好！”

于是他又将灯点燃。

“但是，刚才您怎么又将它点燃呢？”



“这都是命令。”点灯人答道。

“我不明白。”小王子说。

“没什么需要明白的，”点灯人说，“命令就是命令。早上好！”

接着他又将灯熄灭。随后，他用一块饰有红方格的手绢擦着额头。

“我从事的是一种可怕的职业。过去还好，我早上将灯熄灭，晚上又将它点燃。白天剩下的时间我可以休息，晚上剩下的时间则用来睡觉。”

“从那以后命令改了吗？”

“命令倒一直没有改，”点灯人说，“惨就惨在这里！这个星球转得一年比一年快，而命令却始终没有改！”

“随后呢？”小王子问。

“随后——这个星球现在每分钟就要转整整一圈，我连一秒钟的闲暇都没有。我每分钟就必须将路灯点一次、熄一次！”

“这太好玩了！你居住的这个地方每天才一分钟长！”

“一点也不好玩！”点灯人说，“把我们刚才说话的时间加起来，一个月便过去了。”

“一个月？”

“是啊，一个月。30分钟。30天。晚上好！”

他再次点燃了路灯。

小王子注视着他，觉得自己喜欢上了这个如此忠于执行命令的点灯人。他想起自己从前只用挪挪椅子便能看到心仪的落日的情景，希望能帮助这位朋友。

“您知道，”他说，“我可以教您一个办法，让你想什么时候休息就什么时候休息……”

“我一直想休息，”点灯人说。

因为对一个人来说，忠诚和偷懒是可以同时做到的。

小王子接着解释：

“您的星球太小了，您三大步就可以绕它一整圈。您只要慢慢地走，就可以一直处在阳光的照耀下。想休息了，您就走动——您想要白天有多长，它就有多长。”

“这一招对我没多大用，”点灯人说，“我这辈子喜欢做的一件事就是睡觉。”

“那您就不走运了，”小王子说。

“我是不走运，”点灯人说，“早上好！”

他熄灭了路灯。

“这个人，”小王子继续自己的旅行时，喃喃自语，“这个人会受到那位国王、自大狂、酒鬼、商人的一致嘲笑。然而，对我而言，他似乎是他们所有人当中惟一不可笑的人。也许这是由于他除了想着自己之外，还考虑别的事情吧。”

他惋惜地叹了一声，再次想：

“本来，在他们所有人当中，只有这个人应该成为我的朋友。但他的星球确实太小，住不下两个人……”

还有一点小王子不敢承认：之所以他为离开这个星球而遗憾，是因为那里每天能有幸看到1440次落日！





15





第六个星球比上一个要大上10倍，上面住着一位老先生，正在撰写大部头书。

“哦，瞧！来了一位探险家！”看到小王子来到，他不禁惊叫起来。

小王子坐在桌子旁边，有点上气不接下气。他跑了那么多地方、走了那么远的路！

“你从哪里来？”老先生问他。

“那本厚书是什么？”小王子问，“您在干什么？”

“我是个地理学家。”老先生对他说。

“什么是地理学家？”小王子问。

“地理学家就是了解所有海洋、河流、城镇、山脉和沙漠的地理位置的学者。”

“这真有意思，”小王子说，“这里总算有一个有真正职业的人！”他环顾四周，看了一眼这位地理学家的星球。他还从未见过如此壮观、如此庄严的星球呢。

“您的星球真漂亮，”他说，“上面有海洋吗？”



“我无法告诉你。”地理学家说。

“唉！”小王子大失所望，“上面有山脉吗？”

“我无法告诉你。”地理学家说。

“有没有城镇、河流和沙漠？”

“我也无法告诉你。”

“但您是地理学家呀！”

“一点不错，”地理学家说，“但我不是探险家。我的星球上一个探险家也没有。出去数城镇、河流、山脉、海洋和沙漠，那不是地理学家的事。地理学家太重要了，不能四处乱跑。他不能离开自己的书桌，但是可以在书房接见探险家。他向探险家提问，将探险家回忆的外出经历记下来。如果对其中某一位探险家回忆的内容感兴趣，地理学家就可以下令对该探险家的道德品质进行调查。”

“这是为什么呢？”

“这是因为，如果某位探险家说谎，他会给地理学家的著作带来灾难性的后果。好酒的探险家也会带来同样后果。”

“这又是为什么呢？”小王子问。

“因为醉酒者看什么都是成双的。所以，本来某个地方只有一座山，地理学家却会记成两座。”

“我认识一个人，”小王子说，“他要是当探险家肯定不合格。”

“这有可能。所以，如果调查结果证明探险家的道德品质不错，我就命令对他的发现成果进行审查。”

“派人实地查看？”

“不是，那太复杂了。而是要求探险家拿出证据来。比如说，如果接受调查的发现成果涉及一座高山，就要求探险家从那里带回几块大石头。”

地理学家突然莫名地激动起来。

“对了，你——你不是从大老远来的么！你是一位探险家！你可以向我描绘一下你的星球！”

地理学家将厚厚的登记本翻开，将铅笔削得尖尖的。他总要先用铅笔记下各位探险家的描述，一直等到探险家拿出证据以后，再用墨水笔将证据记下来。

“行吗？”

“哦，我住的地方啊，”小王子说，“那里没什么意思。那里太小了。我有三座火山，其中两座是活火山，另一座是死火山。不过，谁也不知道它是否会复活。”

“谁也不知道，”地理学家说。

“我还有一朵花。”

“我们不记录花卉，”地理学家说。

“为什么呢？那朵花可是我所在的星球最美丽的东西！”

“我们不记录它们，”地理学家，“因为它们稍纵即逝。”

“‘稍纵即逝’是什么意思？”

“地理学书籍是所有书籍中最关心大事的图书，”地理学家说，“它们永不过时。高山几乎从来不换地方，大海几乎从不干涸。我们只写永恒的现象。”

“但是，死火山有可能再次苏醒，”小王子打断他的话，“‘稍纵即逝’是什么意思？”

“无论火山是死是活，对我们来说都是一回事，”地理学家说，“我们关心的是高山，它不会变化。”

“但是，‘稍纵即逝’是什么意思呢？”小王子穷追不舍，他这辈子一旦提出某个问题，就绝对不会放过。





16





于是，小王子拜访的第七颗行星便是地球。

地球可是个不一般的行星！数一下便知道，地球上有111个国王（当然，不要少数了其中的黑人国王）、7000名地理学家、90万个商人、750万个酒鬼、3.11亿自大狂——也就是说，大约有20亿个大人。

为了让你对地球大小有个印象，我可以告诉你：在发明电以前，要在所有6大洲上点路灯，必须保持一支多达462,511人的点灯人大军。

从稍远处看，这只大军构成了一幅壮丽辉煌的风景，它的行动就像剧院里的芭蕾舞动作一样有条不紊。首先轮到的是新西兰和澳大利亚的点灯人。他们将自己的灯点亮之后，便回去睡觉了。接下来，中国和西伯利亚的点灯人便在舞蹈中施展舞步，随后，他们便退到舞台的侧翼。接下来轮到俄罗斯和印度的点灯人，接着是非洲和欧洲的点灯人，然后是南美洲的，再就是北美洲的。他们在出场顺序中绝对不会出错，这可真了不起。

只有两个点灯人过着悠闲散漫的生活：其中一个负责北极的那盏灯，另一个是他负责在南极点灯的同行。他们一年才忙上两次。





17





人想耍小聪明时，往往说话会有些掺假。我在对你讲点灯人的故事时，就没有完全忠于事实。而我也发现自己在冒险使那些不了解地球的人对它的认识产生曲解。人在地球上占的地方很小。如果居住在地球表面的20亿人全都站起来，像组织户外大型集会那样挤在一起，就可以轻而易举地将他们放在一个20英里长、20英里宽的广场上。地球上的全人类都可以堆放在太平洋上的一个小岛上。

如果你向大人们讲这些，他们肯定不会相信你。他们想当然地认为自己要占很大地方。他们自以为自己像猴面包树那样重要。因此，你应该劝他们亲自计算。大人崇拜数字，喜欢计算。不过，你没有必要将时间浪费在这种多余的事情上。我知道你们相信我。

小王子来到地球时没有看到一个人，这使他非常惊讶。他开始担心自己是不是到错了星球，正在此时，沙地上有一个类似月光颜色的金色圆环快速掠过。

“晚上好！”小王子亲切地说。

“晚上好！”蛇说。

“我落在哪个星球上？”小王子问。

“这是地球，地球上的非洲。”蛇答道。

“啊！那么。地球上没有人吗？”

“这里是沙漠。沙漠上是没有人的。地球很大。”蛇说。

小王子在一块石头上坐下来，抬眼向天空望去。

“我想，”他说，“这些星星是不是在天上燃烧，以便我们每个人有一天都能再次找到属于自己的那颗星呢……看，我住的那颗星星。它就在我们头顶上，但它离我们太远了！”

“它很好看，”蛇说，“你为何要到这里来？”

“我和一朵花闹了点别扭。”小王子说。

“哦！”蛇说。

它们都一言不发。

“人在哪里？”最后还是小王子拾起了话题，“沙漠上有点孤独。”

“到了有人的地方照样孤独。”蛇说。

小王子瞪着蛇看了很久。



“你是个可爱的动物，”他终于说，“一根手指头都比你粗……”



“但是，我比国王的手指有力气多了。”蛇说。

小王子笑了。

“你能有多大力气呢？你连脚都没有，甚至无法旅行……”

“我能把你背到任何船只都带不到的地方去！”蛇说。

它像一把金镯子那样，把自己缠绕在小王子的脚踝上。

“我无论碰到谁，也无论他从哪里来，我都会把他送回老家，”蛇又开口说话了。“不过，你既纯洁又忠诚，而且来自某一颗星星……”

“你激起了我的同情心——在这个花岗岩组成的地球上，你是那样柔弱，”蛇说，“如果你非常怀念自己的星球，那时我便可以帮助你。我还可以……”

“哦！我非常明白你的意思，”小王子说，“不过，你说话为什么总是打哑谜呢？”

“所有哑谜我都能解开。”蛇说。

随后，他们又都陷入了沉默。





18





小王子穿过沙漠，只遇到一朵花。这是一朵有三片花瓣的花儿，根本不起眼。

“早上好！”小王子说。

“早上好！”花儿说。

“人在哪里？”小王子彬彬有礼地问道。

花儿曾经见过一支驼队路过。

“人？”它重复着，“我想当时有六七个人。几年前我见过他们。但是，谁也不知道到哪里去找他们。风儿把他们吹走了。他们没有根基，这使他们的生活十分艰难。”

“再见！”小王子说。

“再见！”花儿说。





19





之后，小王子爬上一座高山。他过去知道的山只有那三座齐膝高的火山，并用那座死火山当垫脚的凳子。“站在这么高的山上，”他心想，“我就能将整个星球一览无余，还能看到所有的人了……”

但是，除了像针一样锋利的悬崖峭壁之外，他什么也没看见。

“早上好！”他很有礼貌地说。

“早上好——早上好——早上好！”对面传来回音。

“你是谁？”小王子问。

“你是谁——你是谁——你是谁？”声音在山谷回荡。



“做我的朋友吧，我很孤独。”他说。

“我很孤独——孤独——孤独。”回音又响起来。

“真是一个奇怪的星球！”他想，“它上面到处干巴巴的，到处都很尖锐，到处崎岖不平、令人生畏。这里的人一点想象力也没有。别人对他们说什么，他们就重复什么……在我的星球上，我有一朵花，它总是先开口说话……”





20





在沙地、岩石和雪地里走了很久之后，小王子终于走上了一条大路。所有道路都通往人的住所。

“早上好！”他说。

他站在一个花园前面，花园里四处盛开着玫瑰。

“早上好！”玫瑰答道。

小王子凝视着它们。它们看上去全都和他的花儿一样。

“你们是什么花？”他大吃一惊，急忙问。

“我们是玫瑰花。”玫瑰说。

一股悲哀之情涌上心头。他的花曾对他说，像它那种花茫茫宇宙中仅有一朵。然而在此处，仅在这一个花园里，就有5000朵和它一模一样的花！



“如果看到这些，它肯定十分恼怒，”小王子心想，“它会拼命地咳嗽，会佯装快要死去，以免遭人笑话。而我也必须装着照料它，等它苏醒——因为我如果不那样做，如果我不低声下气，它也许会真的任凭自己去死……”

接着，他继续想着：“我还以为自己很富足，有一朵世上独一无二的花儿呢，原来我拥有的只是一朵普通的玫瑰。一朵普通的玫瑰，加上三座齐膝高的火山，而且其中一座也许永远醒不过来……仅有这些，我也许不会成为一个很了不起的王子……”

他躺在草地上，失声哭起来。





21





正在眼里，狐狸出现了。

“早上好！”狐狸打着招呼。

“早上好！”尽管环顾四周什么也没看见，小王子还是礼貌地答应着。

“我就在苹果树下面”那个声音说。

“你是谁呀？”小王子问着，又说，“你真好看。”

“我是一只狐狸。”狐狸说。

“过来陪我玩吧！”小王子提议，“我很不开心。”

“我不能陪你玩，”狐狸说，“我还没有被驯服呢！”

“是吗！对不起！”小王子说。

不过，他想了想，又说：“‘驯服’——是什么意思？”

“你不是本地人，”狐狸说。“你在找什么？”

“我在找人，”小王子说，“‘驯服’——是什么意思？”

“人？”狐狸问，“他们有枪，而且还打猎，真让人讨厌。他们还养鸡，他们只有这点爱好了。你在找鸡吗？”

“不是，”小王子说，“我在找朋友。‘驯服’——是什么意思？”

“‘驯服’是一种很不被重视的行为，”狐狸说，“它的意思就是建立联系。”

“建立联系？”



“仅此而已，”狐狸说，“对我来说，你现在仍然只是个小男孩，和无数其他小男孩没什么两样。我不需要你。就你而言，你也不需要我。对你来说，我不过是一只狐狸，和无数其他狐狸也没什么两样。但是，如果你驯服了我，我们彼此就需要对方了。对我来说，你在这个世界上是惟一的人；而对你来说，我也是这个世界上惟一的狐狸……”



“我有点懂了，”小王子说，“有一朵花……我想它把我驯服了……”

“这有可能，”狐狸说，“地球上任何事都有可能看到。”

“是啊，不过我们不在地球上！”小王子说。

狐狸似乎很不解，而且非常好奇。

“难道在另一个星球上？”

“是的。”

“在那个星球上有猎人吗？”

“没有。”

“哦，真有意思！那儿有鸡吗？”

“也没有。”

“什么都没有最好。”狐狸长叹一声。

不过，它的思维又回到了眼前。

“我的生活十分单调，”狐狸说，“我逮鸡，人逮我。所有的鸡都一样，所有的人也没什么区别。所以我有些厌烦。不过，如果你驯服了我，我的生活就会艳阳高照。我将能辨别出与所有其他人的脚步声都不一样的脚步声。别人的脚步使我赶忙躲到地下去，而你的脚步声则像音乐一样，将我从洞穴里唤出来。对了，你看到那边的麦田没有？我不吃面包，麦子对我毫无用处，麦田与我毫不相干。这真让人伤心。不过，你有一头金色的头发。想一想，如果你已经驯服了我，那是多少美妙的事情啊！麦子也是金黄色，它会让我想起你。我甚至喜欢倾听风吹麦浪的声音……”



狐狸盯着小王子看了很久。

“请你驯服我！”他说。

“我很想驯服你，”小王子回答，“但我没有多少时间。我要去找朋友，还要了解许多事情。”

“只用了解自己驯服的事物就行了，”狐狸说，“人没有更多时间了解任何事物，他们到商店里去买现成的东西。但是，世上找不到能购买友谊的商店，所以人也就没有朋友。如果你想有个朋友，就驯服我吧……”

“要想驯服你，我应该怎么做？”小王子问。

“你必须很有耐心才行，”狐狸答道，“一开始，你就像现在这样坐在草地上，和我保持一点距离。我会斜着眼睛看你，而你什么都不说。语言是产生误解的根源。不过，你坐的位置每天都要向我靠近一点……”

第二天，小王子又来了。

“你最好在同一时间来，”狐狸说，“比如说，如果你下午4点钟来，那么，我在3点钟就开始觉得幸福。时间越迫近，我就越来越觉得幸福。到4点时，我应该已经焦躁不安、上窜下跳了。我将让你看到我是多么幸福！但是，如果你来的时间捉摸不定，我就永远不知道怎样做好心理准备迎候你……我们应该看到适当的仪式……”

“什么是仪式？”小王子问。

“仪式也是一种很不被重视的行为，”狐狸说，“仪式能使我们的某一天、某一时刻显得与众不同。譬如，我的猎人们就有一种仪式。他们每周四都要和村里的姑娘跳舞。这样一来，周四对我来说就是个美好的日子了！我可以一直散步到葡萄园。但是，如果猎人跳舞的时间捉摸不定，每一天和其他一天没什么区别，那我就永远也不得安生。”

于是小王子驯服了狐狸。当他出发的时间越来越迫近时——

“哦，”狐狸说，“我会哭的。”

“那是你的问题，”小王子说，“我根本不希望你受到半点伤害；而你却希望我驯服你……”

“是的，是这样！”狐狸说。

“但你现在却要哭了！”小王子说。

“是的，是这样！”狐狸说。

“但你没有得到任何好处！”

“我已经得到了好处，”狐狸说，“从麦田的颜色上。”他随后又补充道，“再来看看玫瑰花吧。现在你会发现，你的花是世上独一无二的花。然后你才回来和我道别，我会把一个秘密当礼物送给你。”



小王子离开狐狸，再次去看那些玫瑰花。

“你们和我的玫瑰一点也不同，”他说，“眼下你们什么都不是。没有人驯服你们，你们也没有驯服任何人。你们就像我刚认识时的狐狸一样。当时他只是一只普普通通的狐狸，和所有其他狐狸没什么两样。但是，我已经和它交上了朋友，现在它是世上独一无二的了。”

玫瑰们非常难堪。

“你们很美，却很空洞，”他接着说，“没有人为你们去死。是的，平常的过客会认为我的玫瑰和你们一模一样——虽然那枝玫瑰属于我。但是，仅它一朵便比你们所有这些玫瑰重要。是我为它浇的水，是我为它罩上了玻璃罩，是我放置屏风为它遮风挡雨，是我为它杀死了毛毛虫（不过，我们留了两三条毛毛虫，让它们变成蝴蝶）。当它发牢骚、吹牛皮，甚至偶尔一言不发时，我都是它的听众。它是我的玫瑰花。”

看完玫瑰，小王子又回到狐狸身边。

“再见！”他说。

“再见！”狐狸说，“对了，这便是我的秘密，一个非常简单的秘密：只有用心去看，才能看得准；重要的东西眼睛是看不见的。”

“重要的东西眼睛是看不见的，”小王子重复着，以便能够牢记在心。

“正是你在那朵玫瑰上花费的时间，才使得你的玫瑰如此非凡。”

“正是我在那朵玫瑰上花费的时间……”小王子说着，以便够牢记在心。

“人们已经忘记了这条道理，”狐狸说，“但是你必须记住它。从现在起，你要永远对你驯服的事物负责。你要对你的玫瑰花负责……”

“我对我的玫瑰花负责。”小王子重复着，以便能够牢记在心。





22





“早上好！”小王子说。

“早上好！”铁路扳道工说。

“您在这里干什么？”小王子问道。

“我按每千人一包，一包包地分拣旅客，”扳道工说，“我将运载旅客的列车送走，一会儿送往右车道，一会儿又送往左车道。”

一列灯火明亮的特快列车隆隆地呼啸而过，把扳道工的小屋震得晃荡起来。

“他们跑得可真匆忙，”小王子说，“他们在寻找什么呢？”

“连火车司机也不知道！”扳道工说。

第二列灯火明亮的特快列车沿相反方向隆隆驶过。

“他们这就回来了吗？”小王子急切地问。

“他们已经换了一群人，”扳道工说，“两辆列车对开呢。”

“旅客们对以前的地方不满意？”小王子问。

“从来就没有人对自己的地方满意。”扳道工说。

接着，他们听到第三辆灯火通明的特快列车雷鸣般的吼叫声。

“他们在追第一批旅客吗？”小王子急忙问。

“他们什么也不追，”扳道工说，“他们在车里睡觉，就算不在睡觉，也在打哈欠。只有孩子们把鼻子平贴在窗玻璃上向外张望。”

“只有孩子们知道自己在找什么，”小王子说，“对他们而言，如果花时间玩布娃娃，这个布娃娃便成了非常重要的东西；要是有人从他们那里拿走布娃娃，他们就哭……”

“他们真幸运！”小王子说。





23





“早上好！”小王子说。

“早上好！”生意人说。

这是一位生意人，他出售用于止渴的药丸。你一周只用口服一粒这种药丸，就觉得什么东西都不用喝了。

“您为什么卖这些药丸？”小王子问。

“因为它们能节省人们的大量时间，”生意人说，“有专家曾经计算过，服用了这些药丸，你每周便能节省53分钟时间。”

“那我用这53分钟干什么呢？”

“想干什么都可以……”

“拿我来说吧，”小王子暗想，“如果我有53分钟可以随便花，我就会悠闲地走向一股甘冽的泉水。”





24





此时，我在沙漠上出事已经第8天了。听小王子讲述生意人的故事时，我喝完了备用的最后一滴水。

“唉，”我对小王子说，“你的这些往事听起来很美，不过，我到现在为止，飞机还没有修好。我已经没有水可喝，因此，如果我可以悠闲地走向一股甘冽的泉水，那我肯定特别高兴！”

“我的朋友狐狸……”小王子对我说。

“我的小宝贝，这件事和狐狸可一点关系也没有！”

“为什么无关呢？”

“因为我都快要渴死了……”

他并没有紧随我的思路，而是回答道：

“哪怕你快要死了，有一个朋友也是好事。拿我说吧，我就为自己有一个狐狸朋友而非常高兴……”

“他可想不到危险，”我心里想，“他从来就不会饥渴。他需要的仅仅是一点点阳光……”

但是，他却目不转睛地看着我，回应我的想法：

“我也渴了。我们不妨去找口井……”

我做了一个疲惫的姿势。在广袤无垠的沙漠上漫无目的地寻找水井是荒唐的。不过，尽管如此，我们还是开始去寻找。

当我们艰难地默默走了几小时之后，天色渐黑，天上出现了星星。由于口渴，我开始有点发烧。我看着星星，就像在梦境里一样。小王子刚才说的话又回到了我的脑海。

“这么说，你也渴？”我问他。

他没有回答我的问题，只是对我说：

“水可能对心也有益……”

我没有听懂他的回答，但什么也没说。反复盘问他不可能有什么结果，这一点我非常清楚。

他走累了，坐了下来。我坐在他身边。须臾沉默之后，他再次开口：“星星是美丽的，因为有一朵看不见的花。”

我答道：“是啊，是这样。”我没有再说什么，看着月光下在我们面前延伸的沙丘。

“沙漠真美！”小王子又说。

的确很美。他一直很喜欢沙漠。坐在沙漠的一个沙丘上，什么也看不见，什么也听不到。然而透过沉默，却有某种东西在悸动、在闪光……

“沙漠之所以美丽，”小王子说，“是由于在某个地方藏着一口井……”

我很惊讶，突然明白了沙地为什么散发出神秘的光芒。我小时候住在一间老房子里，传说房子下面埋藏着珍宝。当然，从来没有人知道怎样找到这块珍宝，也许是因为从来没有人去找它吧！不过，这块珍宝给那套房子笼罩了一层神奇的光环。我的家在它的内心深处隐藏着一个秘密……

“是啊，”我对小王子说，“房子、星星、沙漠——正是某种看不见的东西使它们那么美丽！”

“很高兴你和我的狐狸看法一致。”他说。

小王子睡着了。我把他搂在怀里，继续向前走。我深深地感动着，心潮澎湃。我就像搂着一块怕摔的宝贝，甚至觉得整个地球上没有什么比它更脆弱。我在月光的照耀下看着他苍白的前额、他闭上的眼睛、他一绺绺随风飘拂的头发，自言自语：“我此处所看到的仅仅是一具躯壳。最重要的东西是看不见的……”

看到他的嘴唇似笑非笑地微微张开，我再次自言自语：“这个熟睡的小王子身上让我如此感动的，是他对一朵花的忠贞——是那朵玫瑰花的形象。这一形象如同一盏明灯上跳跃的火苗，哪怕他已经入睡，都能照亮他的整个身心……”我觉得他还会变得更加脆弱。我觉得自己应该保护他，就像他真的是一束微风吹来便会熄灭的火苗一样……

我就这样走着，在拂晓时找到了水井。





25





小王子说：“人们出门坐上特快列车，却不知道自己在寻找什么。所以，他们就跑来跑去、忙忙碌碌，不停地转圈……”

接着他又说：“这多麻烦呐……”

我们找到的那口井不同于撒哈拉沙漠上的那些井。撒哈拉沙漠上的水井不过是沙地上挖出的洞，而这口井却像村子里的水井。不过，这里并没有村庄，我想自己肯定在做梦……

“这可真奇怪，”我对小王子说，“所有东西都是现成的：辘轳、水桶、井绳……”

他笑起来，拿起绳子，将辘轳转动起来。辘轳吱吱响着，像一个很久没有风儿吹动的风标。

“你听到了吗？”小王子说，“我们唤醒了水井，它在唱歌呢……”

我不想让井绳把他搞得筋疲力尽。

“让我来吧，”我说，“你转不动。”

我把水桶慢慢提到井沿，放在上面——虽然很累，但取得的成就让我开心。辘轳的歌声依然在我耳边回荡。桶里的水还在晃动，我能看到日头在水面上泛出微光。

“我太想喝桶里的水了，”小王子说，“让我喝一点……”



我现在才知道他一直在找什么。

我将水桶提到他的唇边，他闭着眼睛喝水，像在某个特殊的节日上受到礼遇那样过瘾。的确，这水与普通的营养品不同，它的甘甜来自于我们披星戴月地行走，来自于辘轳的歌声，来自于我双臂的运动。它像一件礼物抚慰着心田。小时候，圣诞树上的灯光、午夜弥撒的音乐、亲切的微笑，这一切都使我收到的圣诞礼物熠熠生辉。

“你们这里的人在同一个花园里种植了5000朵玫瑰，却不能从中找到自己想要的东西。”小王子说。

“他们确实没有找到。”我答道。

“可是，他们寻找的东西却能够从一朵玫瑰或一点水中找到。”

“是啊，没错儿！”我说。小王子又说：“不过，用眼睛是看不到的，我们必须用心去看……”

我已经喝完了水。呼吸顺畅多了。沙漠在日出时发出蜂蜜般的光芒，而这种蜂蜜色也让我觉得幸福。那么，这种忧伤感由何而起呢？

“你必须信守诺言。”小王子再次坐到我旁边，柔声说。

“什么诺言？”

“你知道啊……为我的羊戴一个口套……我要对我的花儿负责……”

我从口袋里掏出我的涂鸦之作。小王子仔细看着，笑着说：“你画的猴面包树……它们有点像卷心菜。”

“啊！”

我还一直为我的猴面包树无比自豪呢！

“你画的狐狸……它的右耳朵有点像犄角，而且画得也太长了些。”

他又笑了。

“小王子，你对我可不公平，”我说，“除了画巨蟒的‘外视图’和‘透视图’之外，我还什么都不会画呢！”

“哦，那好吧，”他说，“孩子看得出来就行了。”

于是我用铅笔勾出一副口套的轮廓。把画递给他时，我感到一阵心酸。

“我还不知道你的打算。”我说。

但他没有回答，而是对我说：“你知道——我落到地球上——明年就整整一年了。”

片刻沉默之后，他接着说：“我就落在这旁边。”

随后他双颊菲红。

不知为什么，我再次感到一阵莫名其妙的酸楚。不过我想起了一个问题：

“一星期以前，我第一次遇到你的那个早上，你在这千里之外才有人烟的地方独自徘徊，这么说，这件事并非偶然？你是不是要回到你降落的地方去？”

小王子的脸颊又红了。

我有些迟疑地接着问：“是不是由于周年纪念的缘故？”

小王子的脸颊再次发红。他从不回答此类问题——不过，脸红难道不表示承认吗？

“哎，”我对他说，“我有点害怕……”

他打断了我的话：“现在你该干活了。你应该回去修理你的发动机。我会在这里等你。明天晚上你再回来吧……”

但是我还是对他放心不下。我想起了那只狐狸。如果一个人听任自己被人驯服，那他就要冒流泪的风险……





26





在井旁有一堵陈旧的石墙废墟。当我第二天晚上干完工作返回时，我远远看见我的小王子坐在墙顶上，双脚晃来晃去。我听到他说：“那就是你忘记了。这里并非准确地点。”

肯定有另一个声音在和他对话，因为他回答说：“是啊，是啊！日子没有错，但地点不是在这里。”

我继续朝着石墙走去。一直没有看到有人，也没有听到声音。然而，小王子却再次答道：

“——一点不错。你可以在沙地上看看我的足迹从哪里开始。你只用在那里等着我就行了。我今天晚上会去那里。”

我此时离石墙仅有20米远，但仍然什么也没看见。

安静了一会儿，小王子又开口了：“你的毒液很管用？你保证毒液不会让我痛苦很长时间？”

我停住了脚步，已经肝肠寸断，但是仍然听不懂。

“现在走吧！”小王子说，“你想从墙上下来。”

于是，我低下头向墙脚看去——吓了一大跳。在那里，我看到面前有一条蛇正对着小王子。这是一种30秒钟就能要人命的黄蛇。我将手伸进衣袋去掏我的左轮手枪，同时赶忙后退一步。但是，一听到我这里有动静，那条蛇便像一条稍纵即逝的水柱一样，轻快地在沙地上穿梭，一转眼便无影无踪，只在石头缝里留下轻轻的金属撞击的声音。

我一个箭步奔向石墙，一把将我的小宝贝抱进臂弯，他的脸色雪一样地白。

“这是怎么回事？”我急忙问，“你怎么和蛇说起话来了？”



我将他始终戴着的金黄色围巾解开，用水浸湿他的太阳穴，又喂他喝了一点水。此时，我再也不敢问他任何问题。他神情肃穆地看着我，双臂搂着我的脖子。我感到他的心脏像一只被猎人的枪支击中、奄奄一息的小鸟的心脏那样跳动……

“很高兴你找到了发动机的故障所在，”他说，“现在你可以回家了……”

“你是怎么知道的？”

我正打算告诉他：我的修理工作已经成功完成，虽然我对此想都不敢想。

他并没有回答我的问题，但他又说：“我，今天也要回家了……”

接着，他伤感地说——“我回去的路要远得多……回家也要难得多……”

我清醒地意识到一定在发生某种不同寻常的事。我把他搂得更紧，就像他是一个小孩，可是我觉得他正在径直冲向一座悬崖，而我却无力阻止他……

他的脸色十分凝重，就像在离家很远的地方迷路了一样。

“我有你画的小羊，有装羊的盒子，还有口套……”

他忧伤地对着我笑了。

我等了很长时间。我能看到他在一点点地恢复精神。

“亲爱的小宝贝，”我对他说，“你受惊了……”

他是受惊了，这一点毋庸置疑。但他却轻轻地笑了。

“今天晚上我会受到更多惊吓……”

我再次感到发生了某种无法挽回的事，觉得自己手脚冰凉。我知道，只要想起再也听不到这种笑声，我就会无法忍受。对我来说，他的笑声就像沙漠中的一股清泉。

“小宝贝，”我说，“我还想听你的笑声。”

他却对我说：“到今晚，就是一年了……所以，在我一年前来到地球的那个地方的正上方，应该能找到我的星球……”

“小宝贝，”我说，“告诉我：这蛇的事、见面地点以及星星，都不过是一场噩梦……”

但他对我的请求却没有回应，而是对我说：“重要的东西是看不见的……”

“是啊，我知道……”

“花儿就是这样。如果你爱上了一朵生长在某颗星星上的花儿，晚上仰望夜空便会感到甜蜜。所有星星上都似乎盛开着花朵……”

“是啊，我知道……”

“水也是这样。由于辘轳和井绳的存在，你给我喝的水就像音乐一样甘冽。你肯定记得——它多好喝啊！”

“是啊，我知道……”

“到了晚上，你会抬头仰望星星。我居住的那种地方，任何东西都很小，我甚至无法告诉你到哪里找我的星星。这样也不错。对你而言，我的星星就是那些星星的其中之一。因此，你将喜欢观看天空中的所有星星……它们都会成为你的朋友。此外，我打算送给你一件礼物……”

他又笑起来。

“哦，小王子，亲爱的小王子！我喜欢听到这种笑声！”

“这便是我的礼物。就是它了。事实上，我们俩喝水的时候那样……”

“你想说什么？”

“所有人都有星星，”他答道，“但是，对于不同的人，星星的含义不同。对那些旅行者来说，星星是向导。对另一些人来说，星星不过是天空中的点点亮光。对那些学者来说，星星是他们研究的对象。对我遇到的那位商人来说，星星就是财富。但是，所有这些星星都不会说话。而你——仅就你而言——你拥有其他任何人都不曾拥有的星星……”

“你想说什么？”

“我会住在其中的一颗星星上，会在其中的某颗星星上笑着。所以，当你晚上守望夜空时，你会觉得所有星星似乎都在笑……你——只有你——拥有会笑的星星！”他又笑了。

“哀伤之情得到慰籍时（时间能缓解一切哀伤），你将为认识了我而高兴。你永远都是我的朋友。你将希望和我一起笑。所以，你有时会打开窗户，去追寻这种快乐……而你的朋友也会为看到你凝视夜空时发出笑声而相当吃惊！然后，你会对他们说，‘是啊，天上的繁星总是让我笑出声！’他们于是认为你是个疯子。我在你身上开的玩笑，将是一个非常拙劣的玩笑……”

他再次笑了。

“这就像我给你许多懂得如何发出笑声的小铃铛，而不是给你星星……”

他又笑了起来。然后又马上变得神情肃穆：

“今晚——你知道……你不要来了。”小王子说。

“我不会离开你。”我说。

“我看上去会很痛苦，会有点奄奄一息的样子。反正都差不多吧，你别来看这些情景。费那个劲没有必要……”

“我不会离开你。”

可他却担心。

“我对你说吧——这也是因为那条蛇的缘故。它应该不会咬你。蛇——它们是毒物。这条蛇可能仅仅为了取乐而咬你……”

“我不会离开你。”

而他转念一想，又放心了：“没错，它们咬第二口时，就没有毒液了。”

那天晚上，我没有亲眼看到他启程。他一声不响地离开了我。当我赶上他的时候，他正坚定地快步走着，只是对我说：“哦！你来了……”

他抓住我的手，但是仍然还在担心。

“你不该来。你会难过的。我看上去将像死了一样，不过不会真的死去……”

我什么也没说。

“你知道……路太远了。我不能带着这幅躯体上路，它太沉了。”

我仍然一言不发。

“不过，它就像一块剥落的旧树皮。旧树皮没什么让人伤感的地方……”

我默不做声。

他有一点泄气，但又在做另一次努力：

“你知道，它将变得非常美。我也肯定会看星星。所有星星都是水井，带有锈蚀的辘轳。所有星星都会流出甘泉让我喝……”

我什么也没说。

“那多么好玩啊！你将有5亿个小铃铛，而我也将有5亿个泉眼……”

这时他也说不出话，因为他哭了……

“就在这里。让我自己往前走吧！”

他坐下来，因为他害怕。接着，他又开了口：“你知道——我的花儿……我要对它负责。而它是那么柔弱！那么天真！它有四根刺保护自己免遭所有外界侵害，但是一点用也没有……”

我也坐下来，因为我再也站不住了。

“呶，就是这些了……”

他仍然有点踌躇，然后他站起来。他向前迈了一步，我却无法动弹。

只见一道黄色的光在他脚踝旁边一闪。刹那间他不动了。他没有喊叫，只是优雅地慢慢倒下，就像倒下一棵树。由于沙地的原因，他甚至没有发出半点响声。





27





现在，6年已经过去了……

我至今从未讲过这个故事。我在归途中遇到的同伴都为看到我安然回来而欣喜万分。我很伤心，却对他们说：“我累了。”

现在，我的哀伤稍有缓解。这也就是说——我尚未完全缓过劲来。不过，我知道他确实已经回到了自己的星球，因为我在天亮时并没有发现他的躯体。他的躯体并没有多重……晚上，我喜欢倾听星星，就像倾听5亿个小铃铛发出的声音……

不过，有一件事不寻常……我给小王子画口套的时候，忘了给口套加上皮带。他再也无法将口套牢牢地固定在他的小羊脖子上了。所以我现在始终在想：在他的星球上正在发生什么事？也许小羊已经将那朵花吃掉了吧……

有时我又对自己说：“肯定不会！小王子每天晚上都将他的花罩在玻璃罩底下，而且他对小羊的看管也非常认真……”这样一想，我便很高兴。此时，所有星星发出的笑声都那样甜蜜。

不过，在另一些时候，我又对自己说：“人总有懈怠的时候，那可够呛！也许某天晚上他忘了罩上玻璃罩，或者小羊在夜间不声不响地跑出来……”此时，那些小铃铛便变成了泪珠……



因此，这里有一个难以破解的秘密。对于同样喜欢小王子的你、我而言，如果在某个地方（我们并不知道在哪里），有一只我们从未见过的羊吃掉（也许没有吃掉）了一朵玫瑰花，宇宙万物都将从此改变。

仰望天空吧！扪心自问：小羊到底是不是吃掉了花儿？你将发现一切都变了模样……

这是一件如此重要的大事，但大人们永远也理解不了！

对我来说，这是世界上最秀美、最凄凉的景观。它与前一页画的是同一个地方，但我还是再次将它画出来，以便让你铭记心头。小王子出现在地球上时就落在这里，而他也是从这里消失的。

好好看看吧！这样的话，如果有一天你到非洲的撒哈拉沙漠旅行，就能准确地辨认出这个地方。如果你刚好路过此处，请不要匆匆而过，站在星星的正下方等一会儿吧！之后，如果有个小人出现在你面前，如果他笑着、有一头金色的头发、拒绝回答任何问题，你就会知道他是谁了。如果发生了这一切，请及时告诉我，好让我得到安慰。请给我捎个话，就说他已经回来了。





The Littele Prince

Chapter Ⅰ





Once when I was six years old I saw a magnificent picture in a book, called True Stories from Nature, about the primeval forest. It was a picture of a boa constrictor in the act of swallowing an animal. Here is a copy of the drawing.

In the book it said: "Boa constrictors swallow their prey whole, without chewing it. After that they are not able to move, and they sleep through the six months that they need for digestion."

I pondered deeply, then, over the adventures of the jungle. And after some work with a colored pencil I succeeded in making my first drawing. My Drawing Number One. It looked like this:

I showed my masterpiece to the grown-ups, and asked them whether the drawing frightened them.

But they answered: "Frighten? Why should any one be frightened by a hat?"

My drawing was not a picture of a hat. It was a picture of a boa constrictor digesting an elephant. But since the grown-ups were not able to understand it, I made another drawing: I drew the inside of the boa constrictor, so that the grown-ups could see it clearly. They always need to have things explained. My Drawing Number Two looked like this:

The grown-ups' response, this time, was to advise me to lay aside my drawings of boa constrictors, whether from the inside or the outside, and devote myself instead to geography, history, arithmetic and grammar. That is why, at the age of six, I gave up what might have been a magnificent career as a painter. I had been disheartened by the failure of my Drawing Number One and my Drawing Number Two. Grown-ups never understand anything by themselves, and it is tiresome for children to be always and forever explaining things to them.

So then I chose another profession, and learned to pilot airplanes. I have flown a little over all parts of the world; and it is true that geography has been very useful to me. At a glance I can distinguish China from Arizona. If one gets lost in the night, such knowledge is valuable.

In the course of this life I have had a great many encounters with a great many people who have been concerned with matters of consequence. I have lived a great deal among grown-ups. I have seen them intimately, close at hand. And that hasn't much improved my opinion of them.

Whenever I met one of them who seemed to me at all clear-sighted, I tried the experiment of showing him my Drawing Number One, which I have always kept. I would try to find out, so, if this was a person of true understanding. But, whoever it was, he, or she, would always say: "That is a hat."

Then I would never talk to that person about boa constrictors, or primeval forests, or stars. I would bring myself down to his level. I would talk to him about bridge, and golf, and politics, and neckties. And the grown-up would be greatly pleased to have met such a sensible man.





Chapter Ⅱ





So I lived my life alone, without anyone that I could really talk to, until I had an accident with my plane in the Desert of Sahara, six years ago. Something was broken in my engine. And as I had with me neither a mechanic nor any passengers, I set myself to attempt the difficult repairs all alone. It was a question of life or death for me: I had scarcely enough drinking water to last a week. The first night, then, I went to sleep on the sand, a thousand miles from any human habitation. I was more isolated than a shipwrecked sailor on a raft in the middle of the ocean. Thus you can imagine my amazement, at sunrise, when I was awakened by an odd little voice. It said:

"If you please—draw me a sheep!"

"What!"

"Draw me a sheep!"

I jumped to my feet, completely thunderstruck. I blinked my eyes hard. I looked carefully all around me. And I saw a most extraordinary small person, who stood there examining me with great seriousness. Here you may see the best potrait that, later, I was able to make of him. But my drawing is certainly very much less charming than its model.

That, however, is not my fault. The grown-ups discouraged me in my painter's career when I was six years old, and I never learned to draw anything, except boas from the outside and boas from the inside.

Now I stared at this sudden apparition with my eyes fairly starting out of my head in astonishment. Remember, I had crashed in the desert a thousand miles from any inhabited region. And yet my little man seemed neither to be straying uncertainly among the sands, nor to be fainting from fatigue or hunger or thirst or fear. Nothing about him gave any suggestion of a child lost in the middle of the desert, a thousand miles from any human habitation. When at last I was able to speak, I said to him:

"But—what are you doing here?"

And in answer he repeated, very slowly, as if he were speaking of a matter of great consequence:

"If you please—draw me a sheep..."

When a mystery is too overpowering, one dare not disobey. Absurd as it might seem to me, a thousand miles from any human habitation and in danger of death, I took out of my pocket a sheet of paper and my fountain-pen. But then I remembered how my studies had been concentrated on geography, history, arithmetic, and grammar, and I told the little chap (a little crossly, too) that I did not know how to draw. He answered me:

"That doesn't matter. Draw me a sheep..."

But I had never drawn a sheep. So I drew for him one of the two pictures I had drawn so often. It was that of the boa constrictor from the outside. And I was astounded to hear the little fellow greet it with,

"No, no, no! I do not want an elephant inside a boa constrictor. A boa constrictor is a very dangerous creature, and an elephant is very cumbersome. Where I live, everything is very small. What I need is a sheep. Draw me a sheep."

So then I made a drawing.

He looked at it carefully, then he said:

"No. This sheep is already very sickly. Make me another."

So I made another drawing.

My friend smiled gently and indulgently.

"You see yourself," he said, "that this is not a sheep. This is a ram. It has horns."

So then I did my drawing over once more.

But it was rejected too, just like the others.

"This one is too old. I want a sheep that will live a long time."

By this time my patience was exhausted, because I was in a hurry to start taking my engine apart. So I tossed off this drawing.

And I threw out an explanation with it.

"This is only his box. The sheep you asked for is inside."

I was very surprised to see a light break over the face of my young judge:

"That is exactly the way I wanted it! Do you think that this sheep will have to have a great deal of grass?"

"Why?"

"Because where I live everything is very small..."

"There will surely be enough grass for him," I said, "It is a very small sheep that I have given you."

He bent his head over the drawing:

"Not so small that—Look! He has gone to sleep..."

And that is how I made the acquaintance of the little prince.





Chapter Ⅲ





It took me a long time to learn where he came from. The little prince, who asked me so many questions, never seemed to hear the ones I asked him. It was from words dropped by chance that, little by little, everything was revealed to me.

The first time he saw my airplane, for instance (I shall not draw my airplane; that would be much too complicated for me), he asked me:

"What is that object?"

"That is not an object. It flies. It is an airplane. It is my airplane."

And I was proud to have him learn that I could fly.

He cried out, then:

"What! You dropped down from the sky?"

"Yes," I answered, modestly.

"Oh! That is funny!"

And the little prince broke into a lovely peal of laughter, which irritated me very much. I like my misfortunes to be taken seriously.

Then he added:

"So you, too, come from the sky! Which is your planet?"

At that moment I caught a gleam of light in the impenetrable mystery of his presence; and I demanded, abruptly:

"Do you come from another planet?"

But he did not reply. He tossed his head gently, without taking his eyes from my plane:

"It is true that on that you can't have come from very far away..."

And he sank into a reverie, which lasted a long time. Then, taking my sheep out of his pocket, he buried himself in the contemplation of his treasure.

You can imagine how my curiosity was aroused by this half-confidence about the "other planets." I made a great effort, therefore, to find out more on this subject.

"My little man, where do you come from? What is this 'where I live,' of which you speak? Where do you want to take your sheep?"

After a reflective silence he answered:

"The thing that is so good about the box you have given me is that at night he can use it as his house."

"That is so. And if you are good I will give you a string, too, so that you can tie him during the day, and a post to tie him to."

But the little prince seemed shocked by this offer:

"Tie him! What a queer idea!"

"But if you don't tie him," I said, "he will wander off somewhere, and get lost."

My friend broke into another peal of laughter:

"But where do you think he would go?"

"Anywhere. Straight ahead of him."

Then the little prince said, earnestly:

"That doesn't matter. Where I live, everything is so small!"

And, with perhaps a hint of sadness, he added:

"Straight ahead of him, nobody can go very far..."





Chapter Ⅳ





I had thus learned a second fact of great importance: this was that the planet the little prince came from was scarcely any larger than a house!

But that did not really surprise me much. I knew very well that in addition to the great planets—such as the Earth, Jupiter, Mars, Venus—to which we have given names, there are also hundreds of others, some of which are so small that one has a hard time seeing them through the telescope. When an astronomer discovers one of these he does not give it a name, but only a number. He might call it, for example, "Asteroid 325."

I have serious reason to believe that the planet from which the little prince came is the asteroid known as B-612.

This asteroid has only once been seen through the telescope. That was by a Turkish astronomer, in 1909.

On making his discovery, the astronomer had presented it to the International Astronomical Congress, in a great demonstration. But he was in Turkish costume, and so nobody would believe what he said.

Grown-ups are like that...

Fortunately, however, for the reputation of Asteroid B-612, a Turkish dictator made a law that his subjects, under pain of death, should change to European costume. So in 1920 the astronomer gave his demonstration all over again, dressed with impressive style and elegance. And this time everybody accepted his report.

If I have told you these details about the asteroid, and made a note of its number for you, it is on account of the grown-ups and their ways. When you tell them that you have made a new friend, they never ask you any questions about essential matters. They never say to you, "What does his voice sound like? What games does he love best? Does he collect butterflies?" Instead, they demand: "How old is he? How many brothers has he? How much does he weigh? How much money does his father make?" Only from these figures do they think they have learned anything about him.

If you were to say to the grown-ups: "I saw a beautiful house made of rosy brick, with geraniums in the windows and doves on the roof," they would not be able to get any idea of that house at all. You would have to say to them: "I saw a house that cost $20,000." Then they would exclaim: "Oh, what a pretty house that is!"

Just so, you might say to them: "The proof that the little prince existed is that he was charming, that he laughed, and that he was looking for a sheep. If anybody wants a sheep, that is a proof that he exists." And what good would it do to tell them that? They would shrug their shoulders, and treat you like a child. But if you said to them: "The planet he came from is Asteroid B-612," then they would be convinced, and leave you in peace from their questions.

They are like that. One must not hold it against them. Children should always show great forbearance toward grown-up people.

But certainly, for us who understand life, figures are a matter of indifference. I should have liked to begin this story in the fashion of the fairy-tales. I should have like to say: "Once upon a time there was a little prince who lived on a planet that was scarcely any bigger than himself, and who had need of a sheep..."

To those who understand life, that would have given a much greater air of truth to my story.

For I do not want any one to read my book carelessly. I have suffered too much grief in setting down these memories. Six years have already passed since my friend went away from me, with his sheep. If I try to describe him here, it is to make sure that I shall not forget him. To forget a friend is sad. Not every one has had a friend. And if I forget him, I may become like the grown-ups who are no longer interested in anything but figures...

It is for that purpose, again, that I have bought a box of paints and some pencils. It is hard to take up drawing again at my age, when I have never made any pictures except those of the boa constrictor from the outside and the boa constrictor from the inside, since I was six. I shall certainly try to make my portraits as true to life as possible. But I am not at all sure of success. One drawing goes along all right, and another has no resemblance to its subject. I make some errors, too, in the little prince's height: in one place he is too tall and in another too short. And I feel some doubts about the color of his costume. So I fumble along as best I can, now good, now bad, and I hope generally fair-to-middling.

In certain more important details I shall make mistakes, also. But that is something that will not be my fault. My friend never explained anything to me. He thought, perhaps, that I was like himself. But I, alas, do not know how to see sheep through the walls of boxes. Perhaps I am a little like the grown-ups. I have had to grow old.





Chapter Ⅴ





As each day passed I would learn, in our talk, something about the little prince's planet, his departure from it, his journey. The information would come very slowly, as it might chance to fall from his thoughts. It was in this way that I heard, on the third day, about the catastrophe of the baobabs.

This time, once more, I had the sheep to thank for it. For the little prince asked me abruptly—as if seized by a grave doubt—"It is true, isn't it, that sheep eat little bushes?"

"Yes, that is true."

"Ah! I am glad!"

I did not understand why it was so important that sheep should eat little bushes. But the little prince added:

"Then it follows that they also eat baobabs?"

I pointed out to the little prince that baobabs were not little bushes, but, on the contrary, trees as big as castles; and that even if he took a whole herd of elephants away with him, the herd would not eat up one single baobab.

The idea of the herd of elephants made the little prince laugh.

"We would have to put them one on top of the other," he said.

But he made a wise comment:

"Before they grow so big, the baobabs start out by being little."

"That is strictly correct," I said. "But why do you want the sheep to eat the little baobabs?"

He answered me at once, "Oh, come, come!", as if he were speaking of something that was self-evident. And I was obliged to make a great mental effort to solve this problem, without any assistance.

Indeed, as I learned, there were on the planet where the little prince lived—as on all planets—good plants and bad plants. In consequence, there were good seeds from good plants, and bad seeds from bad plants. But seeds are invisible. They sleep deep in the heart of the earth's darkness, until some one among them is seized with the desire to awaken. Then this little seed will stretch itself and begin—timidly at first—to push a charming little sprig inoffensively upward toward the sun. If it is only a sprout of radish or the sprig of a rose-bush, one would let it grow wherever it might wish. But when it is a bad plant, one must destroy it as soon as possible, the very first instant that one recognizes it.

Now there were some terrible seeds on the planet that was the home of the little prince; and these were the seeds of the baobab. The soil of that planet was infested with them. A baobab is something you will never, never be able to get rid of if you attend to it too late. It spreads over the entire planet. It bores clear through it with its roots. And if the planet is too small, and the baobabs are too many, they split it in pieces...

"It is a question of discipline," the little prince said to me later on. "When you've finished your own toilet in the morning, then it is time to attend to the toilet of your planet, just so, with the greatest care. You must see to it that you pull up regularly all the baobabs, at the very first moment when they can be distinguished from the rosebushes which they resemble so closely in their earliest youth. It is very tedious work," the little prince added, "but very easy."

And one day he said to me: "You ought to make a beautiful drawing, so that the children where you live can see exactly how all this is. That would be very useful to them if they were to travel some day. Sometimes," he added, "there is no harm in putting off a piece of work until another day. But when it is a matter of baobabs, that always means a catastrophe. I knew a planet that was inhabited by a lazy man. He neglected three little bushes..."

So, as the little prince described it to me, I have made a drawing of that planet. I do not much like to take the tone of a moralist. But the danger of the baobabs is so little understood, and such considerable risks would be run by anyone who might get lost on an asteroid, that for once I am breaking through my reserve. "Children," I say plainly, "watch out for the baobabs!"

My friends, like myself, have been skirting this danger for a long time, without ever knowing it; and so it is for them that I have worked so hard over this drawing. The lesson which I pass on by this means is worth all the trouble it has cost me.

Perhaps you will ask me, "Why are there no other drawing in this book as magnificent and impressive as this drawing of the baobabs?"

The reply is simple. I have tried. But with the others I have not been successful. When I made the drawing of the baobabs I was carried beyond myself by the inspiring force of urgent necessity.





Chapter Ⅵ





Oh, little prince! Bit by bit I came to understand the secrets of your sad little life... For a long time you had found your only entertainment in the quiet pleasure of looking at the sunset. I learned that new detail on the morning of the fourth day, when you said to me:

"I am very fond of sunsets. Come, let us go look at a sunset now."

"But we must wait," I said.

"Wait? For what?"

"For the sunset. We must wait until it is time."

At first you seemed to be very much surprised. And then you laughed to yourself. You said to me:

"I am always thinking that I am at home!"

Just so. Everybody knows that when it is noon in the United States the sun is setting over France.

If you could fly to France in one minute, you could go straight into the sunset, right from noon. Unfortunately, France is too far away for that. But on your tiny planet, my little prince, all you need do is move your chair a few steps. You can see the day end and the twilight falling whenever you like...

"One day," you said to me, "I saw the sunset forty-four times!"

And a little later you added:

"You know—one loves the sunset, when one is so sad..."

"Were you so sad, then?" I asked, "on the day of the forty-four sunsets?"

But the little prince made no reply.





Chapter Ⅶ





On the fifth day—again, as always, it was thanks to the sheep—the secret of the little prince's life was revealed to me. Abruptly, without anything to lead up to it, and as if the question had been born of long and silent meditation on his problem, he demanded:

"A sheep—if it eats little bushes, does it eat flowers, too?"

"A sheep," I answered, "eats anything it finds in its reach."

"Even flowers that have thorns?"

"Yes, even flowers that have thorns."

"Then the thorns—what use are they?"

I did not know. At that moment I was very busy trying to unscrew a bolt that had got stuck in my engine. I was very much worried, for it was becoming clear to me that the breakdown of my plane was extremely serious. And I had so little drinking-water left that I had to fear for the worst.

"The thorns—what use are they?"

The little prince never let go of a question, once he had asked it. As for me, I was upset over that bolt. And I answered with the first thing that came into my head:

"The thorns are of no use at all. Flowers have thorns just for spite!"

"Oh!"

There was a moment of complete silence. Then the little prince flashed back at me, with a kind of resentfulness:

"I don't believe you! Flowers are weak creatures. They are naive. They reassure themselves as best they can. They believe that their thorns are terrible weapons..."

I did not answer. At that instant I was saying to myself: "If this bolt still won't turn, I am going to knock it out with the hammer." Again the little prince disturbed my thoughts.

"And you actually believe that the flowers—"

"Oh, no!" I cried. "No, no no! I don't believe anything. I answered you with the first thing that came into my head. Don't you see—I am very busy with matters of consequence!"

He stared at me, thunderstruck.

"Matters of consequence!"

He looked at me there, with my hammer in my hand, my fingers black with engine-grease, bending down over an object which seemed to him extremely ugly...

"You talk just like the grown-ups!"

That made me a little ashamed. But he went on, relentlessly:

"You mix everything up together... You confuse everything..."

He was really very angry. He tossed his golden curls in the breeze.

"I know a planet where there is a certain red-faced gentleman. He has never smelled a flower. He has never looked at a star. He has never loved any one. He has never done anything in his life but add up figures. And all day he says over and over, just like you: 'I am busy with matters of consequence!' And that makes him swell up with pride. But he is not a man—he is a mushroom!"

"A what?"

"A mushroom!"

The little prince was now white with rage.

"The flowers have been growing thorns for millions of years. For millions of years the sheep have been eating them just the same. And is it not a matter of consequence to try to understand why the flowers go to so much trouble to grow thorns which are never of any use to them? Is the warfare between the sheep and the flowers not important? Is this not of more consequence than a fat red-faced gentleman's sums? And if I know—I, myself—one flower which is unique in the world, which grows nowhere but on my planet, but which one little sheep can destroy in a single bite some morning, without even noticing what he is doing—Oh! You think that is not important!"

His face turned from white to red as he continued:

"If some one loves a flower, of which just one single blossom grows in all the millions and millions of stars, it is enough to make him happy just to look at the stars. He can say to himself, 'Somewhere, my flower is there...' But if the sheep eats the flower, in one moment all his stars will be darkened... And you think that is not important!" He could not say anything more. His words were choked by sobbing.

The night had fallen. I had let my tools drop from my hands. Of what moment now was my hammer, my bolt, or thirst, or death? On one star, one planet, my planet, the Earth, there was a little prince to be comforted. I took him in my arms, and rocked him. I said to him:

"The flower that you love is not in danger. I will draw you a muzzle for your sheep. I will draw you a railing to put around your flower. I will—"

I did not know what to say to him. I felt awkward and blundering. I did not know how I could reach him, where I could overtake him and go on hand in hand with him once more.

It is such a secret place, the land of tears.





Chapter Ⅷ





I soon learned to know this flower better. On the little prince's planet the flowers had always been very simple. They had only one ring of petals; they took up no room at all; they were a trouble to nobody. One morning they would appear in the grass, and by night they would have faded peacefully away. But one day, from a seed blown from no one knew where, a new flower had come up; and the little prince had watched very closely over this small sprout which was not like any other small sprouts on his planet. It might, you see, have been a new kind of baobab.

The shrub soon stopped growing, and began to get ready to produce a flower. The little prince, who was present at the first appearance of a huge bud, felt at once that some sort of miraculous apparition must emerge from it. But the flower was not satisfied to complete the preparations for her beauty in the shelter of her green chamber. She chose her colours with the greatest care. She adjusted her petals one by one. She did not wish to go out into the world all rumpled, like the field poppies. It was only in the full radiance of her beauty that she wished to appear. Oh, yes! She was a coquettish creature! And her mysterious adornment lasted for days and days.

Then one morning, exactly at sunrise, she suddenly showed herself.

And, after working with all this painstaking precision, she yawned and said:

"Ah! I am scarcely awake. I beg that you will excuse me. My petals are still all disarranged..."

But the little prince could not restrain his admiration:

"Oh! How beautiful you are!"

"Am I not?" the flower responded, sweetly. "And I was born at the same moment as the sun..."

The little prince could guess easily enough that she was not any too modest—but how moving —and exciting—she was!

"I think it is time for breakfast," she added an instant later. "If you would have the kindness to think of my needs—"

And the little prince, completely abashed, went to look for a sprinkling-can of fresh water. So, he tended the flower.

So, too, she began very quickly to torment him with her vanity—which was, if the truth be known, a little difficult to deal with. One day, for instance, when she was speaking of her four thorns, she said to the little prince:

"Let the tigers come with their claws!"

"There are no tigers on my planet," the little prince objected. "And, anyway, tigers do not eat weeds."

"I am not a weed," the flower replied, sweetly.

"Please excuse me..."

"I am not at all afraid of tigers," she went on, "but I have a horror of drafts. I suppose you wouldn't have a screen for me?"

"A horror of drafts—that is bad luck, for a plant," remarked the little prince, and added to himself, "This flower is a very complex creature..."

"At night I want you to put me under a glass globe. It is very cold where you live. In the place I came from—"

But she interrupted herself at that point. She had come in the form of a seed. She could not have known anything of any other worlds. Embarassed over having let herself be caught on the verge of such a naive untruth, she coughed two or three times, in order to put the little prince in the wrong.

"The screen?"

"I was just going to look for it when you spoke to me..."

Then she forced her cough a little more so that he should suffer from remorse just the same.

So the little prince, in spite of all the good will that was inseparable from his love, had soon come to doubt her. He had taken seriously words which were without importance, and it made him very unhappy.

"I ought not to have listened to her," he confided to me one day. "One never ought to listen to the flowers. One should simply look at them and breathe their fragrance. Mine perfumed all my planet. But I did not know how to take pleasure in all her grace. This tale of claws, which disturbed me so much, should only have filled my heart with tenderness and pity."

And he continued his confidences:

"The fact is that I did not know how to understand anything! I ought to have judged by deeds and not by words. She cast her fragrance and her radiance over me. I ought never to have run away from her... I ought to have guessed all the affection that lay behind her poor little strategems. Flowers are so inconsistent! But I was too young to know how to love her..."





Chapter Ⅸ





I believe that for his escape he took advantage of the migration of a flock of wild birds. On the morning of his departure he put his planet in perfect order. He carefully cleaned out his active volcanoes. He possessed two active volcanoes; and they were very convenient for heating his breakfast in the morning. He also had one volcano that was extinct. But, as he said, "One never knows!" So he cleaned out the extinct volcano, too. If they are well cleaned out, volcanoes burn slowly and steadily, without any eruptions. Volcanic eruptions are like fires in a chimney.

On our earth we are obviously much too small to clean out our volcanoes. That is why they bring no end of trouble upon us.

The little prince also pulled up, with a certain sense of dejection, the last little shoots of the baobabs. He believed that he would never want to return. But on this last morning all these familiar tasks seemed very precious to him. And when he watered the flower for the last time, and prepared to place her under the shelter of her glass globe, he realised that he was very close to tears.

"Goodbye," he said to the flower.

But she made no answer.

"Goodbye," he said again.

The flower coughed. But it was not because she had a cold.

"I have been silly," she said to him, at last. "I ask your forgiveness. Try to be happy..."

He was surprised by this absence of reproaches. He stood there all bewildered, the glass globe held arrested in mid-air. He did not understand this quiet sweetness.

"Of course I love you," the flower said to him. "It is my fault that you have not known it all the while. That is of no importance. But you—you have been just as foolish as I. Try to be happy... let the glass globe be. I don't want it any more."

"But the wind—"

"My cold is not so bad as all that... the cool night air will do me good. I am a flower."

"But the animals—"

"Well, I must endure the presence of two or three caterpillars if I wish to become acquainted with the butterflies. It seems that they are very beautiful. And if not the butterflies—and the caterpillars—who will call upon me? You will be far away... as for the large animals—I am not at all afraid of any of them. I have my claws."

And, naively, she showed her four thorns. Then she added:

"Don't linger like this. You have decided to go away. Now go!"

For she did not want him to see her crying. She was such a proud flower...





Chapter Ⅹ





He found himself in the neighborhood of the asteroids 325, 326, 327, 328, 329, and 330. He began, therefore, by visiting them, in order to add to his knowledge.

The first of them was inhabited by a king. Clad in royal purple and ermine, he was seated upon a throne which was at the same time both simple and majestic.

"Ah! Here is a subject," exclaimed the king, when he saw the little prince coming.

And the little prince asked himself:

"How could he recognize me when he had never seen me before?"

He did not know how the world is simplified for kings. To them, all men are subjects.

"Approach, so that I may see you better," said the king, who felt consumingly proud of being at last a king over somebody.

The little prince looked everywhere to find a place to sit down; but the entire planet was crammed and obstructed by the king's magnificent ermine robe. So he remained standing upright, and, since he was tired, he yawned.

"It is contrary to etiquette to yawn in the presence of a king," the monarch said to him. "I forbid you to do so."

"I can't help it. I can't stop myself," replied the little prince, thoroughly embarrassed. "I have come on a long journey, and I have had no sleep..."

"Ah, then," the king said. "I order you to yawn. It is years since I have seen anyone yawning. Yawns, to me, are objects of curiosity. Come, now! Yawn again! It is an order."

"That frightens me... I cannot, any more..." murmured the little prince, now completely abashed.

"Hum! Hum!" replied the king. "Then I—I order you sometimes to yawn and sometimes to—"

He sputtered a little, and seemed vexed.

For what the king fundamentally insisted upon was that his authority should be respected. He tolerated no disobedience. He was an absolute monarch. But, because he was a very good man, he made his orders reasonable.

"If I ordered a general," he would say, by way of example, "if I ordered a general to change himself into a sea bird, and if the general did not obey me, that would not be the fault of the general. It would be my fault."

"May I sit down?" came now a timid inquiry from the little prince.

"I order you to do so," the king answered him, and majestically gathered in a fold of his ermine mantle.

But the little prince was wondering... The planet was tiny. Over what could this king really rule?

"Sire," he said to him, "I beg that you will excuse my asking you a question—"

"I order you to ask me a question," the king hastened to assure him.

"Sire—over what do you rule?"

"Over everything," said the king, with magnificent simplicity.

"Over everything?"

The king made a gesture, which took in his planet, the other planets, and all the stars.

"Over all that?" asked the little prince.

"Over all that," the king answered.

For his rule was not only absolute: it was also universal.

"And the stars obey you?"

"Certainly they do," the king said. "They obey instantly. I do not permit insubordination."

Such power was a thing for the little prince to marvel at. If he had been master of such complete authority, he would have been able to watch the sunset, not forty-four times in one day, but seventy-two, or even a hundred, or even two hundred times, with out ever having to move his chair. And because he felt a bit sad as he remembered his little planet which he had forsaken, he plucked up his courage to ask the king a favor:

"I should like to see a sunset... do me that kindness... Order the sun to set..."

"If I ordered a general to fly from one flower to another like a butterfly, or to write a tragic drama, or to change himself into a sea bird, and if the general did not carry out the order that he had received, which one of us would be in the wrong?" the king demanded. "The general, or myself?"

"You," said the little prince firmly.

"Exactly. One much require from each one the duty which each one can perform," the king went on. "Accepted authority rests first of all on reason. If you ordered your people to go and throw themselves into the sea, they would rise up in revolution. I have the right to require obedience because my orders are reasonable."

"Then my sunset?" the little prince reminded him: for he never forgot a question once he had asked it.

"You shall have your sunset. I shall command it. But, according to my science of government, I shall wait until conditions are favorable."

"When will that be?" inquired the little prince.

"Hum! Hum!" replied the king; and before saying anything else he consulted a bulky almanac. "Hum! Hum! That will be about—about—that will be this evening about twenty minutes to eight. And you will see how well I am obeyed."

The little prince yawned. He was regretting his lost sunset. And then, too, he was already beginning to be a little bored.

"I have nothing more to do here," he said to the king. "So I shall set out on my way again."

"Do not go," said the king, who was very proud of having a subject. "Do not go. I will make you a Minister!"

"Minister of what?"

"Minster of—of Justice!"

"But there is nobody here to judge!"

"We do not know that," the king said to him. "I have not yet made a complete tour of my kingdom. I am very old. There is no room here for a carriage. And it tires me to walk."

"Oh, but I have looked already!" said the little prince, turning around to give one more glance to the other side of the planet. On that side, as on this, there was nobody at all...

"Then you shall judge yourself," the king answered. "that is the most difficult thing of all. It is much more difficult to judge oneself than to judge others. If you succeed in judging yourself rightly, then you are indeed a man of true wisdom."

"Yes," said the little prince, "but I can judge myself anywhere. I do not need to live on this planet.

"Hum! Hum!" said the king. "I have good reason to believe that somewhere on my planet there is an old rat. I hear him at night. You can judge this old rat. From time to time you will condemn him to death. Thus his life will depend on your justice. But you will pardon him on each occasion; for he must be treated thriftily. He is the only one we have."

"I," replied the little prince, "do not like to condemn anyone to death. And now I think I will go on my way."

"No," said the king.

But the little prince, having now completed his preparations for departure, had no wish to grieve the old monarch.

"If Your Majesty wishes to be promptly obeyed," he said, "he should be able to give me a reasonable order. He should be able, for example, to order me to be gone by the end of one minute. It seems to me that conditions are favorable..."

As the king made no answer, the little prince hesitated a moment. Then, with a sigh, he took his leave.

"I made you my Ambassador," the king called out, hastily.

He had a magnificent air of authority.

"The grown-ups are very strange," the little prince said to himself, as he continued on his journey.





Chapter Ⅺ





The second planet was inhabited by a conceited man.

"Ah! Ah! I am about to receive a visit from an admirer!" he exclaimed from afar, when he first saw the little prince coming.

For, to conceited men, all other men are admirers.

"Good morning," said the little prince. "That is a queer hat you are wearing."

"It is a hat for salutes," the conceited man replied. "It is to raise in salute when people acclaim me. Unfortunately, nobody at all ever passes this way."

"Yes?" said the little prince, who did not understand what the conceited man was talking about.

"Clap your hands, one against the other," the conceited man now directed him.

The little prince clapped his hands. The conceited man raised his hat in a modest salute.

"This is more entertaining than the visit to the king," the little prince said to himself. And he began again to clap his hands, one against the other. The conceited man against raised his hat in salute.

After five minutes of this exercise the little prince grew tired of the game's monotony.

"And what should one do to make the hat come down?" he asked.

But the conceited man did not hear him. Conceited people never hear anything but praise.

"Do you really admire me very much?" he demanded of the little prince.

"What does that mean—'admire'?"

"To admire mean that you regard me as the handsomest, the best-dressed, the richest, and the most intelligent man on this planet."

"But you are the only man on your planet!"

"Do me this kindness. Admire me just the same."

"I admire you," said the little prince, shrugging his shoulders slightly, "but what is there in that to interest you so much?"

And the little prince went away.

"The grown-ups are certainly very odd," he said to himself, as he continued on his journey.





Chapter Ⅻ





The next planet was inhabited by a tippler. This was a very short visit, but it plunged the little prince into deep dejection.

"What are you doing there?" he said to the tippler, whom he found settled down in silence before a collection of empty bottles and also a collection of full bottles.

"I am drinking," replied the tippler, with a lugubrious air.

"Why are you drinking?" demanded the little prince.

"So that I may forget," replied the tippler.

"Forget what?" inquired the little prince, who already was sorry for him.

"Forget that I am ashamed," the tippler confessed, hanging his head.

"Ashamed of what?" insisted the little prince, who wanted to help him.

"Ashamed of drinking!" The tippler brought his speech to an end, and shut himself up in an impregnable silence.

And the little prince went away, puzzled.

"The grown-ups are certainly very, very odd," he said to himself, as he continued on his journey.





Chapter ⅩⅢ





The fourth planet belonged to a businessman. This man was so much occupied that he did not even raise his head at the little prince's arrival.

"Good morning," the little prince said to him. "Your cigarette has gone out."

"Three and two make five. Five and seven make twelve. Twelve and three make fifteen. Good morning. Fifteen and seven make twenty-two. Twenty-two and six make twenty-eight. I haven't time to light it again. Twenty-six and five make thirty-one. Phew! Then that makes five-hundred-and-one-million, six-hundred-twenty-two-thousand, seven-hundred-thirty-one."

"Five hundred million what?" asked the little prince.

"Eh? Are you still there? Five-hundred-and-one million—I can't stop... I have so much to do! I am concerned with matters of consequence. I don't amuse myself with balderdash. Two and five make seven..."

"Five-hundred-and-one million what?" repeated the little prince, who never in his life had let go of a question once he had asked it.

The businessman raised his head.

"During the fifty-four years that I have inhabited this planet, I have been disturbed only three times. The first time was twenty-two years ago, when some giddy goose fell from goodness knows where. He made the most frightful noise that resounded all over the place, and I made four mistakes in my addition. The second time, eleven years ago, I was disturbed by an attack of rheumatism. I don't get enough exercise. I have no time for loafing. The third time—well, this is it! I was saying, then, five-hundred-and-one millions—"

"Millions of what?"

The businessman suddenly realized that there was no hope of being left in peace until he answered this question.

"Millions of those little objects," he said, "which one sometimes sees in the sky."

"Flies?"

"Oh, no. Little glittering objects."

"Bees?"

"Oh, no. Little golden objects that set lazy men to idle dreaming. As for me, I am concerned with matters of consequence. There is no time for idle dreaming in my life."

"Ah! You mean the stars?"

"Yes, that's it. The stars."

"And what do you do with five-hundred millions of stars?"

"Five-hundred-and-one million, six-hundred-twenty-two thousand, seven-hundred-thirty-one. I am concerned with matters of consequence: I am accurate."

"And what do you do with these stars?"

"What do I do with them?"

"Yes."

"Nothing. I own them."

"You own the stars?"

"Yes."

"But I have already seen a king who..."

"Kings do not own, they reign over. It is a very different matter."

"And what good does it do you to own the stars?"

"It does me the good of making me rich."

"And what good does it do you to be rich?"

"It makes it possible for me to buy more stars, if any are ever discovered."

"This man," the little prince said to himself, "reasons a little like my poor tippler..."

Nevertheless, he still had some more questions.

"How is it possible for one to own the stars?"

"To whom do they belong?" the businessman retorted, peevishly.

"I don't know. To nobody."

"Then they belong to me, because I was the first person to think of it."

"Is that all that is necessary?"

"Certainly. When you find a diamond that belongs to nobody, it is yours. When you discover an island that belongs to nobody, it is yours. When you get an idea before any one else, you take out a patent on it: it is yours. So with me: I own the stars, because nobody else before me ever thought of owning them."

"Yes, that is true," said the little prince. "And what do you do with them?"

"I administer them," replied the businessman, "I count them and recount them. It is difficult. But I am a man who is naturally interested in matters of consequence."

The little prince was still not satisfied.

"If I owned a silk scarf," he said, "I could put it around my neck and take it away with me. If I owned a flower, I could pluck that flower and take it away with me. But you cannot pluck the stars from heaven..."

"No. But I can put them in the bank."

"Whatever does that mean?"

"That means that I write the number of my stars on a little paper. And then I put this paper in a drawer and lock it with a key."

"And that is all?"

"That is enough," said the businessman.

"It is entertaining," thought the little prince. "It is rather poetic. But it is of no great consequence."

On matters of consequence, the little prince had ideas which were very different from those of the grown-ups.

"I myself own a flower," he continued his conversation with the businessman, "which I water every day. I own three volcanoes, which I clean out every week (for I also clean out the one that is extinct; one never knows). It is of some use to my volcanoes, and it is of some use to my flower, that I own them. But you are of no use to the stars..."

The businessman opened his mouth, but he found nothing to say in answer. And the little prince went away.

"The grown-ups are certainly altogether extraordinary," he said simply, talking to himself as he continued on his journey.





Chapter ⅩⅣ





The fifth planet was very strange. It was the smallest of all. There was just enough room on it for a street lamp and a lamplighter. The little prince was not able to reach any explanation of the use of a street lamp and a lamplighter, somewhere in the heavens, on a planet which had no people, and not one house. But he said to himself, nevertheless:

"It may well be that this man is absurd. But he is not so absurd as the king, the conceited man, the businessman, and the tippler. For at least his work has some meaning. When he lights his street lamp, it is as if he brought one more star to life, or one flower. When he puts out his lamp, he sends the flower, or the star, to sleep. That is a beautiful occupation. And since it is beautiful, it is truly useful."

When he arrived on the planet he respectfully saluted the lamplighter.

"Good morning. Why have you just put out your lamp?"

"Those are the orders," replied the lamplighter. "Good morning."

"What are the orders?"

"The orders are that I put out my lamp. Good evening."

And he lighted his lamp again.

"But why have you just lighted it again?"

"Those are the orders," replied the lamplighter.

"I do not understand," said the little prince.

"There is nothing to understand," said the lamplighter. "Orders are orders. Good morning."

And he put out his lamp. Then he mopped his forehead with a handkerchief decorated with red squares.

"I follow a terrible profession. In the old days it was reasonable. I put the lamp out in the morning, and in the evening I lighted it again. I had the rest of the day for relaxation and the rest of the night for sleep."

"And the orders have been changed since that time?"

"The orders have not been changed," said the lamplighter. "That is the tragedy! From year to year the planet has turned more rapidly and the orders have not been changed!"

"Then what?" asked the little prince.

"Then—the planet now makes a complete turn every minute, and I no longer have a single second for repose. Once every minute I have to light my lamp and put it out!"

"That is very funny! A day lasts only one minute, here where you live!"

"It is not funny at all!" said the lamplighter. "While we have been talking together a month has gone by."

"A month?"

"Yes, a month. Thirty minutes. Thirty days. Good evening."

And he lighted his lamp again.

As the little prince watched him, he felt that he loved this lamplighter who was so faithful to his orders. He remembered the sunsets which he himself had gone to seek, in other days, merely by pulling up his chair; and he wanted to help his friend.

"You know," he said, "I can tell you a way you can rest whenever you want to..."

"I always want to rest," said the lamplighter.

For it is possible for a man to be faithful and lazy at the same time.

The little prince went on with his explanation:

"Your planet is so small that three strides will take you all the way around it. To be always in the sunshine, you need only walk along rather slowly. When you want to rest, you will walk—and the day will last as long as you like."

"That doesn't do me much good," said the lamplighter. "The one thing I love in life is to sleep."

"Then you're unlucky," said the little prince.

"I am unlucky," said the lamplighter. "Good morning."

And he put out his lamp.

"That man," said the little prince to himself, as he continued farther on his journey, "that man would be scorned by all the others: by the king, by the conceited man, by the tippler, by the businessman. Nevertheless he is the only one of them all who does not seem to me ridiculous. Perhaps that is because he is thinking of something else besides himself."

He breathed a sigh of regret, and said to himself, again:

"That man is the only one of them all whom I could have made my friend. But his planet is indeed too small. There is no room on it for two people..."

What the little prince did not dare confess was that he was sorry most of all to leave this planet, because it was blest every day with 1440 sunsets!





Chapter XV





The sixth planet was ten times larger than the last one. It was inhabited by an old gentleman who wrote voluminous books.

"Oh, look! Here is an explorer!" he exclaimed to himself when he saw the little prince coming.

The little prince sat down on the table and panted a little. He had already traveled so much and so far!

"Where do you come from?" the old gentleman said to him.

"What is that big book?" said the little prince. "What are you doing?"

"I am a geographer," the old gentleman said to him.

"What is a geographer?" asked the little prince.

"A geographer is a scholar who knows the location of all the seas, rivers, towns, mountains, and deserts."

"That is very interesting," said the little prince. "Here at last is a man who has a real profession!" And he cast a look around him at the planet of the geographer. It was the most magnificent and stately planet that he had ever seen.

"Your planet is very beautiful," he said. "Has it any oceans?"

"I couldn't tell you," said the geographer.

"Ah!" The little prince was disappointed. "Has it any mountains?"

"I couldn't tell you," said the geographer.

"And towns, and rivers, and deserts?"

"I couldn't tell you that, either."

"But you are a geographer!"

"Exactly," the geographer said. "But I am not an explorer. I haven't a single explorer on my planet. It is not the geographer who goes out to count the towns, the rivers, the mountains, the seas, the oceans, and the deserts. The geographer is much too important to go loafing about. He does not leave his desk. But he receives the explorers in his study. He asks them questions, and he notes down what they recall of their travels. And if the recollections of any one among them seem interesting to him, the geographer orders an inquiry into that explorer's moral character."

"Why is that?"

"Because an explorer who told lies would bring disaster on the books of the geographer. So would an explorer who drank too much."

"Why is that?" asked the little prince.

"Because intoxicated men see double. Then the geographer would note down two mountains in a place where there was only one."

"I know some one," said the little prince, "who would make a bad explorer."

"That is possible. Then, when the moral character of the explorer is shown to be good, an inquiry is ordered into his discovery."

"One goes to see it?"

"No. That would be too complicated. But one requires the explorer to furnish proofs. For example, if the discovery in question is that of a large mountain, one requires that large stones be brought back from it."

The geographer was suddenly stirred to excitement.

"But you—you come from far away! You are an explorer! You shall describe your planet to me!"

And, having opened his big register, the geographer sharpened his pencil. The recitals of explorers are put down first in pencil. One waits until the explorer has furnished proofs, before putting them down in ink.

"Well?" said the geographer expectantly.

"Oh, where I live," said the little prince, "it is not very interesting. It is all so small. I have three volcanoes. Two volcanoes are active and the other is extinct. But one never knows."

"One never knows," said the geographer.

"I have also a flower."

"We do not record flowers," said the geographer.

"Why is that? The flower is the most beautiful thing on my planet!"

"We do not record them," said the geographer, "because they are ephemeral."

"What does that mean—'ephemeral'?"

"Geographies," said the geographer, "are the books which, of all books, are most concerned with matters of consequence. They never become old-fashioned. It is very rarely that a mountain changes its position. It is very rarely that an ocean empties itself of its waters. We write of eternal things."

"But extinct volcanoes may come to life again," the little prince interrupted. "What does that mean—'ephemeral'?"

"Whether volcanoes are extinct or alive, it comes to the same thing for us," said the geographer. "The thing that matters to us is the mountain. It does not change."

"But what does that mean—'ephemeral'?" repeated the little prince, who never in his life had let go of a question, once he had asked it.

"It means, 'which is in danger of speedy disappearance.'"

"Is my flower in danger of speedy disappearance?"

"Certainly it is."

"My flower is ephemeral," the little prince said to himself, "and she has only four thorns to defend herself against the world. And I have left her on my planet, all alone!"

That was his first moment of regret. But he took courage once more.

"What place would you advise me to visit now?" he asked.

"The planet Earth," replied the geographer. "It has a good reputation."

And the little prince went away, thinking of his flower.





Chapter ⅩⅥ





So then the seventh planet was the Earth.

The Earth is not just an ordinary planet! One can count, there 111 kings (not forgetting, to be sure, the Negro kings among them), 7000 geographers, 900,000 businessmen, 7,500,000 tipplers, 311,000,000 conceited men—that is to say, about 2,000,000,000 grown-ups.

To give you an idea of the size of the Earth, I will tell you that before the invention of electricity it was necessary to maintain, over the whole of the six continents, a veritable army of 462,511 lamplighters for the street lamps.

Seen from a slight distance, that would make a splendid spectacle. The movements of this army would be regulated like those of the ballet in the opera. First would come the turn of the lamplighters of New Zealand and Australia. Having set their lamps alight, these would go off to sleep. Next, the lamplighters of China and Siberia would enter for their steps in the dance, and then they too would be waved back into the wings. After that would come the turn of the lamplighters of Russia and the Indies; then those of Africa and Europe, then those of South America; then those of South America; then those of North America. And never would they make a mistake in the order of their entry upon the stage. It would be magnificent.

Only the man who was in charge of the single lamp at the North Pole, and his colleague who was responsible for the single lamp at the South Pole—only these two would live free from toil and care: they would be busy twice a year.





Chapter ⅩⅦ





When one wishes to play the wit, he sometimes wanders a little from the truth. I have not been altogether honest in what I have told you about the lamplighters. And I realize that I run the risk of giving a false idea of our planet to those who do not know it. Men occupy a very small place upon the Earth. If the two billion inhabitants who people its surface were all to stand upright and somewhat crowded together, as they do for some big public assembly, they could easily be put into one public square twenty miles long and twenty miles wide. All humanity could be piled up on a small Pacific islet.

The grown-ups, to be sure, will not believe you when you tell them that. They imagine that they fill a great deal of space. They fancy themselves as important as the baobabs. You should advise them, then, to make their own calculations. They adore figures, and that will please them. But do not waste your time on this extra task. It is unnecessary. You have, I know, confidence in me.

When the little prince arrived on the Earth, he was very much surprised not to see any people. He was beginning to be afraid he had come to the wrong planet, when a coil of gold, the color of the moonlight, flashed across the sand.

"Good evening," said the little prince courteously.

"Good evening," said the snake.

"What planet is this on which I have come down?" asked the little prince.

"This is the Earth; this is Africa," the snake answered.

"Ah! Then there are no people on the Earth?"

"This is the desert. There are no people in the desert. The Earth is large," said the snake.

The little prince sat down on a stone, and raised his eyes toward the sky.

"I wonder," he said, "whether the stars are set alight in heaven so that one day each one of us may find his own again... Look at my planet. It is right there above us. But how far away it is!"

"It is beautiful," the snake said. "What has brought you here?"

"I have been having some trouble with a flower," said the little prince.

"Ah!" said the snake.

And they were both silent.

"Where are the men?" the little prince at last took up the conversation again. It is a little lonely in the desert...

"It is also lonely among men," the snake said.

The little prince gazed at him for a long time.

"You are a funny animal," he said at last. "You are no thicker than a finger..."

"But I am more powerful than the finger of a king," said the snake.

The little prince smiled.

"You are not very powerful. You haven't even any feet. You cannot even travel..."

"I can carry you farther than any ship could take you," said the snake.

He twined himself around the little prince's ankle, like a golden bracelet.

"Whomever I touch, I send back to the earth from whence he came," the snake spoke again. "But you are innocent and true, and you come from a star..."

The little prince made no reply.

"You move me to pity—you are so weak on this Earth made of granite," the snake said. "I can help you, some day, if you grow too homesick for your own planet. I can—"

"Oh! I understand you very well," said the little prince. "But why do you always speak in riddles?"

"I solve them all," said the snake.

And they were both silent.





Chapter ⅩⅧ





The little prince crossed the desert and met with only one flower. It was a flower with three petals, a flower of no account at all.

"Good morning," said the little prince.

"Good morning," said the flower.

"Where are the men?" the little prince asked, politely.

The flower had once seen a caravan passing.

"Men?" she echoed. "I think there are six or seven of them in existence. I saw them, several years ago. But one never knows where to find them. The wind blows them away. They have no roots, and that makes their life very difficult."

"Goodbye," said the little prince.

"Goodbye," said the flower.





Chapter ⅩⅨ





After that, the little prince climbed a high mountain. The only mountains he had ever known were the three volcanoes, which came up to his knees. And he used the extinct volcano as a footstool. "From a mountain as high as this one," he said to himself, "I shall be able to see the whole planet at one glance, and all the people..."

But he saw nothing, save peaks of rock that were sharpened like needles.

"Good morning," he said courteously.

"Good morning—Good morning—Good morning," answered the echo.

"Who are you?" said the little prince.

"Who are you—Who are you—Who are you?" answered the echo.

"Be my friends. I am all alone," he said.

"I am all alone—all alone—all alone," answered the echo.

"What a queer planet!" he thought. "It is altogether dry, and altogether pointed, and altogether harsh and forbidding. And the people have no imagination. They repeat whatever one says to them... On my planet I had a flower; she always was the first to speak..."





Chapter ⅩⅩ





But it happened that after walking for a long time through sand, and rocks, and snow, the little prince at last came upon a road. And all roads lead to the abodes of men.

"Good morning," he said.

He was standing before a garden, all a-bloom with roses.

"Good morning," said the roses.

The little prince gazed at them. They all looked like his flower.

"Who are you?" he demanded, thunderstruck.

"We are roses," the roses said.

And he was overcome with sadness. His flower had told him that she was the only one of her kind in all the universe. And here were five thousand of them, all alike, in one single garden!

"She would be very much annoyed," he said to himself, "if she should see that... she would cough most dreadfully, and she would pretend that she was dying, to avoid being laughed at. And I should be obliged to pretend that I was nursing her back to life—for if I did not do that, to humble myself also, she would really allow herself to die..."

Then he went on with his reflections: "I thought that I was rich, with a flower that was unique in all the world; and all I had was a common rose. A common rose, and three volcanoes that come up to my knees—and one of them perhaps extinct forever... that doesn't make me a very great prince..."

And he lay down in the grass and cried.





Chapter ⅩⅪ





It was then that the fox appeared.

"Good morning," said the fox.

"Good morning," the little prince responded politely, although when he turned around he saw nothing.

"I am right here," the voice said, "under the apple tree."

"Who are you?" asked the little prince, and added, "You are very pretty to look at."

"I am a fox," said the fox.

"Come and play with me," proposed the little prince. "I am so unhappy."

"I cannot play with you," the fox said. "I am not tamed."

"Ah! Please excuse me," said the little prince.

But, after some thought, he added: "What does that mean—'tame'?"

"You do not live here," said the fox. "What is it that you are looking for?"

"I am looking for men," said the little prince. "What does that mean—'tame'?"

"Men," said the fox. "They have guns, and they hunt. It is very disturbing. They also raise chickens. These are their only interests. Are you looking for chickens?"

"No," said the little prince. "I am looking for friends. What does that mean—'tame'?"

"It is an act too often neglected," said the fox. It means to establish ties.

"'To establish ties'?"

"Just that," said the fox. "To me, you are still nothing more than a little boy who is just like a hundred thousand other little boys. And I have no need of you. And you, on your part, have no need of me. To you, I am nothing more than a fox like a hundred thousand other foxes. But if you tame me, then we shall need each other. To me, you will be unique in all the world. To you, I shall be unique in all the world..."

"I am beginning to understand," said the little prince. "There is a flower... I think that she has tamed me..."

"It is possible," said the fox. "On the Earth one sees all sorts of things."

"Oh, but this is not on the Earth!" said the little prince.

The fox seemed perplexed, and very curious.

"On another planet?"

"Yes."

"Are there hunters on this planet?"

"No."

"Ah, that is interesting! Are there chickens?"

"No."

"Nothing is perfect," sighed the fox.

But he came back to his idea.

"My life is very monotonous," the fox said. "I hunt chickens; men hunt me. All the chickens are just alike, and all the men are just alike. And, in consequence, I am a little bored. But if you tame me, it will be as if the sun came to shine on my life. I shall know the sound of a step that will be different from all the others. Other steps send me hurrying back underneath the ground. Yours will call me, like music, out of my burrow. And then look: you see the grain-fields down yonder? I do not eat bread. Wheat is of no use to me. The wheat fields have nothing to say to me. And that is sad. But you have hair that is the colour of gold. Think how wonderful that will be when you have tamed me! The grain, which is also golden, will bring me back the thought of you. And I shall love to listen to the wind in the wheat..."

The fox gazed at the little prince, for a long time.

"Please—tame me!" he said.

"I want to, very much," the little prince replied. "But I have not much time. I have friends to discover, and a great many things to understand."

"One only understands the things that one tames," said the fox. "Men have no more time to understand anything. They buy things all ready made at the shops. But there is no shop anywhere where one can buy friendship, and so men have no friends any more. If you want a friend, tame me..."

"What must I do, to tame you?" asked the little prince.

"You must be very patient," replied the fox. "First you will sit down at a little distance from me—like that—in the grass. I shall look at you out of the corner of my eye, and you will say nothing. Words are the source of misunderstandings. But you will sit a little closer to me, every day..."

The next day the little prince came back.

"It would have been better to come back at the same hour," said the fox. "If, for example, you come at four o'clock in the afternoon, then at three o'clock I shall begin to be happy. I shall feel happier and happier as the hour advances. At four o'clock, I shall already be worrying and jumping about. I shall show you how happy I am! But if you come at just any time, I shall never know at what hour my heart is to be ready to greet you... One must observe the proper rites..."

……

"What is a rite?" asked the little prince.

"Those also are actions too often neglected," said the fox. "They are what make one day different from other days, one hour from other hours. There is a rite, for example, among my hunters. Every Thursday they dance with the village girls. So Thursday is a wonderful day for me! I can take a walk as far as the vineyards. But if the hunters danced at just any time, every day would be like every other day, and I should never have any vacation at all."

So the little prince tamed the fox. And when the hour of his departure drew near-

"Ah," said the fox, "I shall cry."

"It is your own fault," said the little prince. "I never wished you any sort of harm; but you wanted me to tame you..."

"Yes, that is so," said the fox.

"But now you are going to cry!" said the little prince.

"Yes, that is so," said the fox.

"Then it has done you no good at all!"

"It has done me good," said the fox, "because of the color of the wheat fields." And then he added: "Go and look again at the roses. You will understand now that yours is unique in all the world. Then come back to say goodbye to me, and I will make you a present of a secret."

The little prince went away, to look again at the roses.

"You are not at all like my rose," he said. "As yet you are nothing. No one has tamed you, and you have tamed no one. You are like my fox when I first knew him. He was only a fox like a hundred thousand other foxes. But I have made him my friend, and now he is unique in all the world."

And the roses were very much embarrassed.

"You are beautiful, but you are empty," he went on. "One could not die for you. To be sure, an ordinary passerby would think that my rose looked just like you—the rose that belongs to me. But in herself alone she is more important than all the hundreds of you other roses: because it is she that I have watered; because it is she that I have put under the glass globe; because it is she that I have sheltered behind the screen; because it is for her that I have killed the caterpillars (except the two or three that we saved to become butterflies); because it is she that I have listened to, when she grumbled, or boasted, or even sometimes when she said nothing. Because she is my rose.

And he went back to meet the fox.

"Goodbye," he said.

"Goodbye," said the fox. "And now here is my secret, a very simple secret: It is only with the heart that one can see rightly; what is essential is invisible to the eye."

"What is essential is invisible to the eye," the little prince repeated, so that he would be sure to remember.

"It is the time you have wasted for your rose that makes your rose so important."

"It is the time I have wasted for my rose—" said the little prince, so that he would be sure to remember.

"Men have forgotten this truth," said the fox. "But you must not forget it. You become responsible, forever, for what you have tamed. You are responsible for your rose..."

"I am responsible for my rose," the little prince repeated, so that he would be sure to remember.





Chapter ⅩⅫ





"Good morning," said the little prince.

"Good morning," said the railway switchman.

"What do you do here?" the little prince asked.

"I sort out travelers, in bundles of a thousand," said the switchman. "I send off the trains that carry them; now to the right, now to the left."

And a brilliantly lighted express train shook the switchman's cabin as it rushed by with a roar like thunder.

"They are in a great hurry," said the little prince. "What are they looking for?"

"Not even the locomotive engineer knows that," said the switchman.

And a second brilliantly lighted express thundered by, in the opposite direction.

"Are they coming back already?" demanded the little prince.

"These are not the same ones," said the switchman. "It is an exchange."

"Were they not satisfied where they were?" asked the little prince.

"No one is ever satisfied where he is," said the switchman.

And they heard the roaring thunder of a third brilliantly lighted express.

"Are they pursuing the first travelers?" demanded the little prince.

"They are pursuing nothing at all," said the switchman. "They are asleep in there, or if they are not asleep they are yawning. Only the children are flattening their noses against the windowpanes."

"Only the children know what they are looking for," said the little prince. "They waste their time over a rag doll and it becomes very important to them; and if anybody takes it away from them, they cry..."

"They are lucky," the switchman said.





Chapter ⅩⅩⅢ





"Good morning," said the little prince.

"Good morning," said the merchant.

This was a merchant who sold pills that had been invented to quench thirst. You need only swallow one pill a week, and you would feel no need of anything to drink.

"Why are you selling those?" asked the little prince.

"Because they save a tremendous amount of time," said the merchant. "Computations have been made by experts. With these pills, you save fifty-three minutes in every week."

"And what do I do with those fifty-three minutes?"

"Anything you like..."

"As for me," said the little prince to himself, "if I had fifty-three minutes to spend as I liked, I should walk at my leisure toward a spring of fresh water."





Chapter ⅩⅩⅣ





It was now the eighth day since I had had my accident in the desert, and I had listened to the story of the merchant as I was drinking the last drop of my water supply.

"Ah," I said to the little prince, "these memories of yours are very charming; but I have not yet succeeded in repairing my plane; I have nothing more to drink; and I, too, should be very happy if I could walk at my leisure toward a spring of fresh water!"

"My friend the fox—" the little prince said to me.

"My dear little man, this is no longer a matter that has anything to do with the fox!"

"Why not?"

"Because I am about to die of thirst..."

He did not follow my reasoning, and he answered me:

"It is a good thing to have had a friend, even if one is about to die. I, for instance, am very glad to have had a fox as a friend..."

"He has no way of guessing the danger," I said to myself. "He has never been either hungry or thirsty. A little sunshine is all he needs..."

But he looked at me steadily, and replied to my thought:

"I am thirsty, too. Let us look for a well..."

I made a gesture of weariness. It is absurd to look for a well, at random, in the immensity of the desert. But nevertheless we started walking.

When we had trudged along for several hours, in silence, the darkness fell, and the stars began to come out. Thirst had made me a little feverish, and I looked at them as if I were in a dream. The little prince's last words came reeling back into my memory:

"Then you are thirsty, too?" I demanded.

But he did not reply to my question. He merely said to me:

"Water may also be good for the heart..."

I did not understand this answer, but I said nothing. I knew very well that it was impossible to cross-examine him.

He was tired. He sat down. I sat down beside him. And, after a little silence, he spoke again: "The stars are beautiful, because of a flower that cannot be seen."

I replied, "Yes, that is so." And, without saying anything more, I looked across the ridges of sand that were stretched out before us in the moonlight.

"The desert is beautiful," the little prince added.

And that was true. I have always loved the desert. One sits down on a desert sand dune, sees nothing, hears nothing. Yet through the silence something throbs, and gleams...

"What makes the desert beautiful," said the little prince, "is that somewhere it hides a well..."

I was astonished by a sudden understanding of that mysterious radiation of the sands. When I was a little boy I lived in an old house, and legend told us that a treasure was buried there. To be sure, no one had ever known how to find it; perhaps no one had ever even looked for it. But it cast an enchantment over that house. My home was hiding a secret in the depths of its heart...

"Yes," I said to the little prince. "The house, the stars, the desert—what gives them their beauty is something that is invisible!"

"I am glad," he said, "that you agree with my fox."

As the little prince dropped off to sleep, I took him in my arms and set out walking once more. I felt deeply moved, and stirred. It seemed to me that I was carrying a very fragile treasure. It seemed to me, even, that there was nothing more fragile on all Earth. In the moonlight I looked at his pale forehead, his closed eyes, his locks of hair that trembled in the wind, and I said to myself: "What I see here is nothing but a shell. What is most important is invisible..."

As his lips opened slightly with the suspicious of a half-smile, I said to myself, again: "What moves me so deeply, about this little prince who is sleeping here, is his loyalty to a flower—the image of a rose that shines through his whole being like the flame of a lamp, even when he is asleep..." And I felt him to be more fragile still. I felt the need of protecting him, as if he himself were a flame that might be extinguished by a little puff of wind...

And, as I walked on so, I found the well, at daybreak.





Chapter ⅩⅩⅤ





"Men," said the little prince, "set out on their way in express trains, but they do not know what they are looking for. Then they rush about, and get excited, and turn round and round..."

And he added: "It is not worth the trouble..."

The well that we had come to was not like the wells of the Sahara. The wells of the Sahara are mere holes dug in the sand. This one was like a well in a village. But there was no village here, and I thought I must be dreaming...

"It is strange," I said to the little prince. "Everything is ready for use: the pulley, the bucket, the rope..."

He laughed, touched the rope, and set the pulley to working. And the pulley moaned, like an old weathervane which the wind has long since forgotten.

"Do you hear?" said the little prince. "We have wakened the well, and it is singing..."

I did not want him to tire himself with the rope.

"Leave it to me," I said. "It is too heavy for you."

I hoisted the bucket slowly to the edge of the well and set it there—happy, tired as I was, over my achievement. The song of the pulley was still in my ears, and I could see the sunlight shimmer in the still trembling water.

"I am thirsty for this water," said the little prince. "Give me some of it to drink..."

And I understood what he had been looking for.

I raised the bucket to his lips. He drank, his eyes closed. It was as sweet as some special festival treat. This water was indeed a different thing from ordinary nourishment. Its sweetness was born of the walk under the stars, the song of the pulley, the effort of my arms. It was good for the heart, like a present. When I was a little boy, the lights of the Christmas tree, the music of the Midnight Mass, the tenderness of smiling faces, used to make up, so, the radiance of the gifts I received.

"The men where you live," said the little prince, "raise five thousand roses in the same garden—and they do not find in it what they are looking for."

"They do not find it," I replied.

"And yet what they are looking for could be found in one single rose, or in a little water."

"Yes, that is true," I said.

And the little prince added:

"But the eyes are blind. One must look with the heart..."

I had drunk the water. I breathed easily. At sunrise the sand is the color of honey. And that honey color was making me happy, too. What brought me, then, this sense of grief?

"You must keep your promise," said the little prince, softly, as he sat down beside me once more.

"What promise?"

"You know—a muzzle for my sheep... I am responsible for this flower..."

I took my rough drafts of drawings out of my pocket. The little prince looked them over, and laughed as he said:

"Your baobabs—they look a little like cabbages."

"Oh!"

I had been so proud of my baobabs!

"Your fox—his ears look a little like horns; and they are too long."

And he laughed again.

"You are not fair, little prince," I said. "I don't know how to draw anything except boa constrictors from the outside and boa constrictors from the inside."

"Oh, that will be all right," he said, "children understand."

So then I made a pencil sketch of a muzzle. And as I gave it to him my heart was torn.

"You have plans that I do not know about," I said.

But he did not answer me. He said to me, instead:

"You know—my descent to the earth... Tomorrow will be its anniversary."

Then, after a silence, he went on:

"I came down very near here."

And he flushed.

And once again, without understanding why, I had a queer sense of sorrow. One question, however, occurred to me:

"Then it was not by chance that on the morning when I first met you—a week ago—you were strolling along like that, all alone, a thousand miles from any inhabited region? You were on the your back to the place where you landed?"

The little prince flushed again.

And I added, with some hesitancy:

"Perhaps it was because of the anniversary?"

The little prince flushed once more. He never answered questions—but when one flushes does that not mean "Yes"?





"Ah," I said to him, "I am a little frightened—"

But he interrupted me.

"Now you must work. You must return to your engine. I will be waiting for you here. Come back tomorrow evening..."

But I was not reassured. I remembered the fox. One runs the risk of weeping a little, if one lets himself be tamed...





Chapter ⅩⅩⅥ





Beside the well there was the ruin of an old stone wall. When I came back from my work, the next evening, I saw from some distance away my little price sitting on top of a wall, with his feet dangling. And I heard him say:

"Then you don't remember. This is not the exact spot."

Another voice must have answered him, for he replied to it:

"Yes, yes! It is the right day, but this is not the place."

I continued my walk toward the wall. At no time did I see or hear anyone. The little prince, however, replied once again:

"—Exactly. You will see where my track begins, in the sand. You have nothing to do but wait for me there. I shall be there tonight."

I was only twenty metres from the wall, and I still saw nothing.

After a silence the little prince spoke again:

"You have good poison? You are sure that it will not make me suffer too long?"

I stopped in my tracks, my heart torn asunder; but still I did not understand.

"Now go away," said the little prince. "I want to get down from the wall."

I dropped my eyes, then, to the foot of the wall—and I leaped into the air. There before me, facing the little prince, was one of those yellow snakes that take just thirty seconds to bring your life to an end. Even as I was digging into my pocked to get out my revolver I made a running step back. But, at the noise I made, the snake let himself flow easily across the sand like the dying spray of a fountain, and, in no apparent hurry, disappeared, with a light metallic sound, among the stones.

I reached the wall just in time to catch my little man in my arms; his face was white as snow.

"What does this mean?" I demanded. "Why are you talking with snakes?"

I had loosened the golden muffler that he always wore. I had moistened his temples, and had given him some water to drink. And now I did not dare ask him any more questions. He looked at me very gravely, and put his arms around my neck. I felt his heart beating like the heart of a dying bird, shot with someone's rifle...

"I am glad that you have found what was the matter with your engine," he said. "Now you can go back home..."

"How do you know about that?"

I was just coming to tell him that my work had been successful, beyond anything that I had dared to hope.

He made no answer to my question, but he added: "I, too, am going back home today..."

Then, sadly—"It is much farther... it is much more difficult..."

I realised clearly that something extraordinary was happening. I was holding him close in my arms as if he were a little child; and yet it seemed to me that he was rushing headlong toward an abyss from which I could do nothing to restrain him...

His look was very serious, like some one lost far away.

"I have your sheep. And I have the sheep's box. And I have the muzzle..."

And he gave me a sad smile.

I waited a long time. I could see that he was reviving little by little.

"Dear little man," I said to him, "you are afraid..."

He was afraid, there was no doubt about that. But he laughed lightly.

"I shall be much more afraid this evening..."

Once again I felt myself frozen by the sense of something irreparable. And I knew that I could not bear the thought of never hearing that laughter any more. For me, it was like a spring of fresh water in the desert.

"Little man," I said, "I want to hear you laugh again."

But he said to me:

"Tonight, it will be a year... my star, then, can be found right above the place where I came to the Earth, a year ago..."

"Little man," I said, "tell me that it is only a bad dream—this affair of the snake, and the meeting-place, and the star..."

But he did not answer my plea. He said to me, instead:

"The thing that is important is the thing that is not seen..."

"Yes, I know..."

"It is just as it is with the flower. If you love a flower that lives on a star, it is sweet to look at the sky at night. All the stars are a-bloom with flowers..."

"Yes, I know..."

"It is just as it is with the water. Because of the pulley, and the rope, what you gave me to drink was like music. You remember—how good it was."

"Yes, I know..."

"And at night you will look up at the stars. Where I live everything is so small that I cannot show you where my star is to be found. It is better, like that. My star will just be one of the stars, for you. And so you will love to watch all the stars in the heavens... they will all be your friends. And, besides, I am going to make you a present..."

He laughed again.

"Ah, little prince, dear little prince! I love to hear that laughter!"

"That is my present. Just that. It will be as it was when we drank the water..."

"What are you trying to say?"

"All men have the stars," he answered, "but they are not the same things for different people. For some, who are travelers, the stars are guides. For others they are no more than little lights in the sky. For others, who are scholars, they are problems. For my businessman they were wealth. But all these stars are silent. You—you alone—will have the stars as no one else has them—"

"What are you trying to say?"

"In one of the stars I shall be living. In one of them I shall be laughing. And so it will be as if all the stars were laughing, when you look at the sky at night... you—only you—will have stars that can laugh!" And he laughed again.

"And when your sorrow is comforted (time soothes all sorrows) you will be content that you have known me. You will always be my friend. You will want to laugh with me. And you will sometimes open your window, so, for that pleasure... and your friends will be properly astonished to see you laughing as you look up at the sky! Then you will say to them, 'Yes, the stars always make me laugh!' And they will think you are crazy. It will be a very shabby trick that I shall have played on you..."

And he laughed again.

"It will be as if, in place of the stars, I had given you a great number of little bells that knew how to laugh..."

And he laughed again. Then he quickly became serious:

"Tonight—you know... do not come," said the little prince.

"I shall not leave you," I said.

"I shall look as if I were suffering. I shall look a little as if I were dying. It is like that. Do not come to see that. It is not worth the trouble..."

"I shall not leave you."

But he was worried.

"I tell you—it is also because of the snake. He must not bite you. Snakes—they are malicious creatures. This one might bite you just for fun..."

"I shall not leave you."

But a thought came to reassure him:

"It is true that they have no more poison for a second bite."

That night I did not see him set out on his way. He got away from me without making a sound. When I succeeded in catching up with him he was walking along with a quick and resolute step. He said to me merely:

"Ah! You are there..."

And he took me by the hand. But he was still worrying.

"It was wrong of you to come. You will suffer. I shall look as if I were dead; and that will not be true..."

I said nothing.

"You understand... it is too far. I cannot carry this body with me. It is too heavy."

I said nothing.

"But it will be like an old abandoned shell. There is nothing sad about old shells..."

I said nothing.

He was a little discouraged. But he made one more effort:

"You know, it will be very nice. I, too, shall look at the stars. All the stars will be wells with a rusty pulley. All the stars will pour out fresh water for me to drink..."

I said nothing.

"That will be so amusing! You will have five hundred million little bells, and I shall have five hundred million springs of fresh water..."

And he too said nothing more, becuase he was crying...

"Here it is. Let me go on by myself."

And he sat down, because he was afraid. Then he said, again:

"You know—my flower... I am responsible for her. And she is so weak! She is so naive! She has four thorns, of no use at all, to protect herself against all the world..."

I too sat down, because I was not able to stand up any longer.

"There now—that is all..."

He still hesitated a little; then he got up. He took one step. I could not move.

There was nothing but a flash of yellow close to his ankle. He remained motionless for an instant. He did not cry out. He fell as gently as a tree falls. There was not even any sound, because of the sand.





Chapter ⅩⅩⅦ





And now six years have already gone by...

I have never yet told this story. The companions who met me on my return were well content to see me alive. I was sad, but I told them: "I am tired."

Now my sorrow is comforted a little. That is to say—not entirely. But I know that he did go back to his planet, because I did not find his body at daybreak. It was not such a heavy body... and at night I love to listen to the stars. It is like five hundred million little bells...

But there is one extraordinary thing... when I drew the muzzle for the little prince, I forgot to add the leather strap to it. He will never have been able to fasten it on his sheep. So now I keep wondering: what is happening on his planet? Perhaps the sheep has eaten the flower...

At one time I say to myself: "Surely not! The little prince shuts his flower under her glass globe every night, and he watches over his sheep very carefully..." Then I am happy. And there is sweetness in the laughter of all the stars.

But at another time I say to myself: "At some moment or other one is absent-minded, and that is enough! On some one evening he forgot the glass globe, or the sheep got out, without making any noise, in the night..." And then the little bells are changed to tears...

Here, then, is a great mystery. For you who also love the little prince, and for me, nothing in the universe can be the same if somewhere, we do not know where, a sheep that we never saw has—yes or no?—eaten a rose...

Look up at the sky. Ask yourselves: is it yes or no? Has the sheep eaten the flower? And you will see how everything changes...

And no grown-up will ever understand that this is a matter of so much importance!

This is, to me, the loveliest and saddest landscape in the world. It is the same as that on the preceding page, but I have drawn it again to impress it on your memory. It is here that the little prince appeared on Earth, and disappeared.

Look at it carefully so that you will be sure to recognise it in case you travel some day to the African desert. And, if you should come upon this spot, please do not hurry on. Wait for a time, exactly under the star. Then, if a little man appears who laughs, who has golden hair and who refuses to answer questions, you will know who he is. If this should happen, please comfort me. Send me word that he has come back.





Le Petit Prince

À Léon Werth





Je demande pardon aux enfants d'avoir dédié ce livre à une grande personne. J'aiune excuse sérieuse: cette grande personne est le meilleur ami que j'ai au monde. J'ai une autre excuse: cette grande personne peut tout comprendre, même les livres pour enfants. J'ai une troisième excuse: cette grande personne habite la France où elle a faim et froid. Elle abien besoin d'être consolée. Si toutes ces excuses ne suffisent pas, je veux bien dédier ce livre à l'enfant qu'a été autrefois cette grande personne. Toutes les grandes personnes ont d'abord été des enfants. (Mais peu d'entre elles s'en souviennent). Je corrige donc ma dédicace:

À Léon Werth

quand il était petit garçon





Le Chapitre Ⅰ

Lorsque j'avais six ans j'ai vu, une fois, une magnifique image, dans un livre sur la Forêt Vierge qui s'appelait "Histoires Vécues”. Ça représentait un serpent boa qui avalait un fauve. Voilà la copie du dessin.

On disait dans le livre: "Les serpents boas avalent leur proie tout entière, sans la mâcher. Ensuite ils ne peuvent plus bouger et ils dorment pendant les six mois de leur digestion”.

J'ai alors beaucoup réfléchi sur les aventures de la jungle et, à mon tour, j'ai réussi, avec un crayon de couleur, à tracer mon premier dessin. Mon dessin numéro 1. Il était comme ça:

J'ai montré mon chef-d'œuvre aux grandes personnes et je leur ai demandé si mon dessin leur faisait peur.

Elles m'ont répondu: "Pourquoi un chapeau ferait-il peur?”

Mon dessin ne représentait pas un chapeau. Il représentait un serpent boa qui digérait un éléphant. J'ai alors dessiné l'intérieur du serpent boa, afin que les grandes personnes puissent comprendre. Elles ont toujours besoin d'explications. Mon dessin numéro 2 était comme ça:

Les grandes personnes m'ont conseillé de laisser de côté les dessins de serpents boas ouverts ou fermés, et de m'intéresser plutôt à la géographie, à l'histoire, au calcul et à la grammaire. C'est ainsi que j'ai abandonné, à l'âge de six ans, une magnifique carrière de peinture. J'avais été découragé par l'insuccès de mon dessin numéro 1 et de mon dessin numéro 2. Les grandes personnes ne comprennent jamais rien toutes seules, et c'est fatigant, pour les enfants, de toujours et toujours leur donner des explications.

J'ai donc dû choisir un autre métier et j'ai appris à piloter des avions. J'ai volé un peu partout dans le monde. Et la géographie, c'est exact, m'a beaucoup servi. Je savais reconnaître, du premier coup d'œil, la Chine de l'Arizona. C'est trèsutile, si l'on S'est égaré pendant la nuit.

Quand j'en rencontrais une qui me paraissait un peu lucide, je faisait l'expérience sur elle de mon dessin numéro 1 que j'ai toujours conservé. Je voulais savoir si elle était vraiment compréhensive. Mais toujours elle me répondait:

"C'est un chapeau.” Alors je ne lui parlais ni de serpents boas, ni de forêts vierges, ni d'étoiles. Je me mettais à sa portée. Je lui parlais de bridge, de golf, de politique et de cravates. Et la grande personne était bien contente de connaître un homme aussi raisonnable.





Le Chapitre Ⅱ





J'ai ainsi vécu seul, sans personne avec qui parler véritablement, jusqu'à une panne dans le désert du Sahara, il y a six ans. Quelque chose s'était cassé dans mon moteur, Et comme je n'avais avec moi ni méchanicien, ni passagers, je me préparai à essayer de réussir, tout seul, une réparation difficile. C'était pour moi une question de vie ou de mort. J'avais à peine de l'eau à boire pour huit jours.

Le premier soir je me suis donc endormi sur le sable à mille milles de toute terre habitée. J'étais bien plus isolé qu'un naufragé sur un radeau au milieu de l'océan. Alors vous imaginez ma surprise, au levé du jour, quand une drôle de petite voix m'a réveillé. Elle disait:

—S'il vous plaît... dessine-moi un mouton!

—Hein!

—Dessine-moi un mouton...

J'ai sauté sur mes pieds comme si j'avais été frappé par la foudre. J'ai bien frotté mes yeux. J'ai bien regardé. Et j'ai vu un petit bonhomme tout à fait extraordinaire qui me considérait gravement. Voilà le meilleur portrait que, plus tard, j'ai réussi à faire de lui. Mais mon dessin, bien sûr, est beaucoup moins ravissant que le modèle. Ce n'est pas de ma faute. J'avais été découragé dans ma carrière de peintre par les grandes personnes, à l'âge de six ans, et je n'avais rien appris à dessiner, sauf les boas fermés et les boas ouverts.

Je regardai donc cette apparition avec des yeux tout ronds d'étonnement.

N'oubliez pas que je me trouvais à mille milles de toute région habitée. Or mon petit bonhomme ne me semblait ni égaré, ni mort de fatigue, ni mort de faim, ni mort de soif, ni mort de peur. Il n'avait en rien l'apparence d'un enfant perdu au milieu du désert, à mille milles de toute région habitée. Quand je réussis enfin de parler, je lui dis:

—Mais... qu'est-ce que tu fais là?

Et il me répéta alors, tout doucement, comme une chose très sérieuse:

—S'il vous plaît... dessine-moi un mouton...

Quand le mystère est trop impressionnant, on n'ose pas désobéir. Aussi absurde que cela me semblât à mille milles de tous les endroits habités et en danger de mort, je sortis de ma poche une feuille de papier et un stylographe. Mais je me rappelai alors que j'avais surtout étudié la géographie, l'histoire, le calcul et la grammaire et je dis au petit bonhomme (avec un peu de mauvaise humeur) que je ne savais pas dessiner. Il me répondit:

—Ca ne fait rien. Dessine-moi un mouton.

Comme je n'avais jamais dessiné un mouton je refis, pour Lui, l'un des deux seuls dessins dont j'étais capable. Celui du boa fermé. ET je fus stupéfait d'entendre le petit bonhomme me répondre:

—Non! Non! Je ne veux pas d'un éléphant dans un boa. Un boa c'est très dangereux, et un éléphant c'est très encombrant. Chez moi c'est tout petit. J'ai besoin d'un mouton. Dessine-moi un mouton.

Alors j'ai dessiné.

Il regarda attentivement, puis:

—Non! Celui-là est déjà très malade. Fais-en un autre.

Je dessinai:

Mon ami sourit gentiment, avec indulgence:

—Tu vois bien... ce n'est pas un mouton, c'est un bélier. Il a des cornes...

Je refis donc encore mon dessin: Mais il fut refusé, comme les précédents:

—Celui-là est trop vieux. Je veux un mouton qui vive longtemps.

Alors, faute de patience, comme j'avais hâte de commencer le démontage de mon moteur, je griffonnai ce dessin-ci.

Et je lançai:

—Ça c'est la caisse. le mouton que tu veux est dedans.

Mais je fus bien surpris de voir s'illuminer le visage de mon jeune juge:

—C'est tout à fait comme ça que je le voulais! Crois-tu qu'il faille beaucoup d'herbe à ce mouton?

—Pourquoi?

—Parce que chez moi c'est tout petit...

—Ça suffira sûrement. Je t'ai donné un tout petit mouton.

Il pencha la tête vers le dessin:

—Pas si petit que ça... Tiens! Il s'est endormi...

ET c'est ainsi que je fis la connaissance du petit prince.





Le Chapitre Ⅲ





Il me fallut longtemps pour comprendre d'où il venait. Le petit prince, qui me posait beaucoup de questions, ne semblait jamais entendre les miennes. Ce sont des mots prononcés par hasard qui, peu à peu, m'ont tout révélé. Ainsi, quand il aperçu pour la première fois mon avion (je ne dessinerai pas mon avion, c'est un dessin beaucoup trop compliqué pour moi) il me demanda:

—Qu'est ce que c'est que cette chose-là?

—Ce n'est pas une chose. Ça vole. C'est un avion. C'est mon avion.

Et j'étais fier de lui apprendre que je volais. Alors il s'écria:

—Comment! tu es tombé du ciel!

—Oui, fis-je modestement.

—Ah! ça c'est drôle...

Et le petit prince eut un très joli éclat de rire qui m'irrita beaucoup. Je désire que l'on prenne mes malheurs au sérieux. Puis il ajouta:

—Alors, toi aussi tu viens du ciel! De quelle planète es-tu?

J'entrevis aussitôt une lueur, dans le mystère de sa présence, et j'interrogeai brusquement:

—Tu viens donc d'une autre planète?

Mais il ne me répondit pas. Il hochait la tête doucement tout en regardant mon avion:

—C'est vrai que, là-dessus, tu ne peux pas venir de bien loin...

Et il s'enfonça dans une rêverie qui dura longtemps. Puis, sortant mon mouton de sa poche, il se plongea dans la contemplation de son trésor.





Vous imaginez combien j'avais pu être intrigué par cette demi -confidence sur "les autres planètes”. Je m'efforçai donc d'en savoir plus long:

—D'où viens-tu mon petit bonhomme? Où est-ce "chez toi”? Où veux-tu emporter mon mouton?

Il me répondit après un silence méditatif:

—Ce qui est bien, avec la caisse que tu m'as donnée, c'est que, la nuit, ça lui servira de maison.

—Bien sûr. Et si tu es gentil, je te donnerai aussi une corde pour l'attacher pendant le jour. Et un piquet.

La proposition parut choquer le petit prince:

—L'attacher? Quelle drôle d'idée!

—Mais si tu ne l'attaches pas, il ira n'importe où, et il se perdra.

Et mon ami eut un nouvel éclat de rire:

—Mais où veux-tu qu'il aille!

—N'importe où. Droit devant lui...

Alors le petit prince remarqua gravement:

—Ça ne fait rien, c'est tellement petit, chez moi!

Et, avec un peu de mélancolie, peut-être, il ajouta:

—Droit devant soi on ne peut pas aller bien loin...





Le Chapitre Ⅳ





J'avais ainsi appris une seconde chose très importante: C'est que sa planète d'origine était à peine plus grande qu'une maison!





Ça ne pouvait pas m'étonner beaucoup. Je savais bien qu'en dehors des grosses planètes comme la Terre, Jupiter, Mars, Vénus, auxquelles on a donné des noms, il y en a des centaines d'autres qui sont quelque-fois si petites qu'on a beaucoup de mal à les apercevoir au téléscope. Quand un astronome découvre l'une d'elles, il lui donne pour nom un numéro. Il l'appelle par example: "l'astéroide 325.”

J'ai de sérieuses raisons de croire que la planète d'ou venait le petit prince est l'astéroïde B 612. Cet astéroide n'a été aperçu qu'une fois au télescope, en 1909, par un astronome turc.

Il avait fait alors une grande démonstration de sa découverte à un Congrès International d'Astronomie. Mais personne ne l'avait cru à cause de son costume. Les grandes personnes sont comme ça.

Heureusement, pour la réputation de l'astéroïde B 612, un dictateur turc imposa à son peuple, sous peine de mort, de s'habiller à l'européenne. L'astronome refit se démonstration en 1920, dans un habit très élégant. Et cette fois-ci tout le monde fut de son avis.

Si je vous ai raconté ces détails sur l'astéroïde B 612 et si je vous ai confié son numéro, c'est à cause des grandes personnes. Les grandes personnes aiment les chiffres. Quand vous leur parlez d'un nouvel ami, elles ne vous questionnent jamais sur l'essentiel. Elles ne vous disent jamais: "Quel est le son de sa voix? Quels sont les jeux qu'il préfère? Est-ce qu'il collectionne les papillons?” Elles vous demandent: "Quel âge a-t-il? Combien a-t-il de frères? Combien pèse-t-il? Combien gagne son père?” Alors seulement elles croient le connaître. Si vous dites aux grandes personnes: "J'ai vu une belle maison en briques roses, avec des géraniums aux fenêtres et des colombes sur le toit...” elles ne parviennent pas à s'imaginer cette maison. Il faut leur dire: "J'ai vu une maison de cent mille francs.” Alors elles s'écrient: "Comme c'est joli!”

Ainsi, si vous leur dites: "La preuve que le petit prince a éxisté c'est qu'il était ravissant, qu'il voulait un mouton. Quand on veut un mouton, c'est la preuve qu'on existe”, elles hausseront les épaules et vous traiteront d'enfant! Mais si vous leur dites: "La planète d'où il venait est l'astéroide B 612”, alors elles seront convincues, et elles vous laisseront tranquille avec leurs questions. Elles sont comme ça. Il ne faut pas leur en vouloir. les enfants doivent être très indulgents envers les grandes personnes.

Mais, bien sûr, nous qui comprenons la vie, nous nous moquons bien des numéros! J'aurais aimé commencer cette histoire à la façon des contes de fées. J'aurais aimé dire:





"Il était une fois un petit prince qui habitait une planète à peine plus grande que lui, et qui avait besoin d'un ami...” Pour ceux qui comprennent la vie, ça aurait eu l'air beaucoup plus vrai.





Car je n'aime pas qu'on lise mon livre à la légère, J'éprouve tant de chagrin à raconter ces souvenirs. Il y a six ans déjà que mon ami s'en est allé avec son mouton. Si j'essaie ici de le décrire, c'est afin de ne pas l'oublier. C'est triste d'oublier un ami. Tout le monde n'a pas eu un ami. Et je puis devenir comme les grandes personnes qui ne s'intéressent plus qu'aux chiffres. C'est donc pour ça encore que j'ai acheté une boîte de couleurs et des crayons. C'est dur de se remettre au dessin, à mon âge, quand on n'a jamais fait d'autres tentatives que celle d'un boa fermé et celle d'un boa ouvert, à l'âge de six ans! J'essayerai bien sûr, de faire des portraits le plus ressemblants possible. Mais je ne suis pas tout à fait certain de réussir. Un dessin va, et l'autre ne ressemble plus. Je me trompe un peu aussi sur la taille. Ici le petit prince est trop grand. Là il est trop petit. J'hésite aussi sur la couleur de son costume. Alors je tâtonne comme ci et comme ça, tant bien que mal. Je me tromperai enfin sur certains détails plus importants. Mais ça, il faudra me le pardonner. Mon ami ne donnait jamais d'explications. Il me croyait peut-être semblable à lui. Mais moi, malheureusement, je ne sais pas voir les moutons à travers les caisses. Je suis peut-être un peu comme les grandes personnes. J'ai dû vieillir.





Le Chapitre Ⅴ





Chaque jour j'apprennais quelque chose sur la planète, sur le départ, sur le voyage. Ça venait tout doucement, au hasard des réflexions. C'est ainsi que, le troisième jour, je connus le drame des baobabs.

Cette fois-ci encore fut grâce au mouton, car brusquement le petit prince m'interrogea, comme pris d'un doute grave:

—C'est bien vrai, n'est-ce pas, que les moutons mangent les arbustes?

—Oui. C'est vrai.

—Ah! Je suis content.

Je ne compris pas pourquoi il était si important que les moutons mangeassent les arbustes. Mais le petit prince ajouta:

—Par conséquent ils mangent aussi les baobabs?

Je fis remarquer au petit prince que les baobabs ne sont pas des arbustes, mais des arbres grand comme des églises et que, si même il emportait avec lui tout un troupeau d'éléphants, ce troupeau ne viendrait pas à bout d'un seul baobab.

L'idée du troupeau d'éléphants fit rire le petit prince:

—Il faudrait les mettre les uns sur les autres...

Mais il remarqua avec sagesse:

—Les baobabs, avant de grandir, ça commence par être petit.

—C'est exact! Mais pourquoi veux-tu que tes moutons mangent les petits baobabs?

Il me répondit: "Ben! Voyons!” comme s'il s'agissait là d'une évidence. Et il me fallut un grand effort d'intelligence pour comprendre à moi seul ce problème.

Et en effet, sur la planète du petit prince, il y avait comme sur toutes les planètes, de bonnes herbes et de mauvaises herbes. Par conséquent de bonnes graines de bonnes herbes et de mauvaises graines de mauvaises herbes. Mais les graines sont invisibles. Elles dorment dans le secret de la terre jusqu'à ce qu'il prenne fantaisie à l'une d'elles de se réveiller. Alors elle s'étire, et pousse d'abord timidement vers le soleil une ravissante petite brindille de radis ou de rosier, on peut la laisser pousser comme elle veut. Mais s'il s'agit d'une mauvaise plante, il faut arracher la plante aussitôt, dès qu'on a su la reconnaître. Or il y avait des graines terribles sur la planète du petit prince... c'étaient les graines de baobabs. Le sol de la planète en était infesté. Or un baobab, si l'on si prend trop tard, on ne peut jamais plus s'en débarasser. Il encombre toute la planète. Il la perfore de ses racines. Et si la planète est trop petite, et si les baobabs sont trop nombreux, ils la font éclater.





"C'est une question de discipline, me disait plus tard le petit prince. Quand on a terminé sa toilette du matin, il faut faire soigneusement la toilette de la planète. Il faut s'astreindre réguliérement à arracher les baobabs dès qu'on les distingue d'avec les rosiers auxquels ils se ressemblent beaucoup quand ils sont très jeunes. C'est un travail très ennuyeux, mais très facile.”





Et un jour il me conseilla de m'appliquer à réussir un beau dessin, pour bien faire entrer ça dans la tête des enfants de chez moi. "S'ils voyagent un jour, me disait -il, ça pourra leur servir. Il est quelquefois sans inconvénient de remettre à plus tard son travail. Mais, s'il s'agit des baobabs, c'est toujours une catastrophe. J'ai connu une planète, habitée par un paresseux. Il avait négligé trois arbustes..."

Et, sur les indications du petit prince, j'ai dessiné cette planète-là. Je n'aime guère prendre le ton d'un moraliste. Mais le danger des baobabs est si peu connu, et les risques courus par celui qui s'égarerait dans un astéroïde sont si considérables, que, pour une fois, je fais exception à ma réserve. Je dis: "Enfants! Faites attention aux baobabs!” C'est pour avertir mes amis du danger qu'ils frôlaient depuis longtemps, comme moi-même, sans le connaître, que j'ai tant travaillé ce dessin-là. La leçon que je donnais en valait la peine.

Vous vous demanderez peut-être: Pourquoi n'y a-t-il pas dans ce livre, d'autres dessins aussi grandioses que le dessin des baobabs? La réponse est bien simple:

J'ai essayé mais je n'ai pas pu réussir. Quand j'ai dessiné les baobabs j'ai été animé par le sentiment de l'urgence.





Le Chapitre Ⅵ





Ah! petit prince, j'ai compris, peu à peu, ainsi, ta petite vie mélancolique. Tu n'avais eu longtemps pour distraction que la douceur des couchers de soleil. J'ai appris ce détail nouveau, le quatrième jour au matin, quand tu m'as dit:

—J'aime bien les couchers de soleil. Allons voir un coucher de soleil...

—Mais il faut attendre...

—Attendre quoi?

—Attendre que le soleil se couche.

Tu as eu l'air très surpris d'abord, et puis tu as ri de toi-même. Et tu m'as dit:

—Je me crois toujours chez moi!

En effet. Quand il est midi aux États-Unis, le soleil, tout le monde sait, se couche sur la France. Il suffirait de pouvoir aller en France en une minute pour assister au coucher de soleil. Malheureusement la France est bien trop éloignée. Mais, sur ta si petite planète, il te suffirait de tirer ta chaise de quelques pas. Et tu regardais le crépuscule chaque fois que tu le désirais...

—Un jour, j'ai vu le soleil se coucher quarrante-quatre fois!

Et un peu plus tard tu ajoutais:

—Tu sais... quand on est tellement triste on aime les couchers de soleil...

—Le jour des quarante-quatre fois tu étais donc tellement triste?

Mais le petit prince ne répontit pas.





Le Chapitre Ⅶ





Le cinquième jour, toujours grâce au mouton, ce secret de la vie du petit prince me fut révélé. Il me demanda avec brusquerie, sans préambule, comme le fruit d'un problème longtemps médité en silence:

—Un mouton, s'il mange les arbustes, il mange aussi les fleurs?

—Un mouton mange tout ce qu'il rencontre.

—Même les fleurs qui ont des épines?

—Oui. Même les fleurs qui ont des épines.

—Alors les épines, à quoi servent-elles?

Je ne le savais pas. J'étais alors très occupé à essayer de dévisser un boulon trop serré de mon moteur. J'étais très soucieux car ma panne commençait de m'apparaître comme très grave, et l'eau à boire qui s'épuisait me faisait craindre le pire.

—Les épines, à quoi servent-elles?

Le petit prince ne renonçait jamais à une question, une fois qu'il l'avait posée. J'étais irrité par mon boulon et je répondis n'importe quoi:

—Les épines, ça ne sert à rien, c'est de la pure méchanceté de la part des fleurs!

—Oh!

Mais après un silence il me lança, avec une sorte de rancune:

—Je ne te crois pas! Les fleures sont faibles. Elles sont naïves. Elles se rassurent comme elles peuvent. Elles se croient terribles avec leurs épines...

Je ne répondis rien. À cet instant-là je me disais: "Si ce boulon résiste encore, je le ferai sauter d'un coup de marteau.” Le petit prince dérangea de nouveau mes reflexions:

—Et tu crois, toi, que les fleurs...

—Mais non! Mais non! Je ne crois rien! J'ai répondu n'importe quoi. Je m'occupe, moi, des choses sérieuses!

Il me regarda stupéfiait.

—De choses sérieuses!

Il me voyait, mon marteau à la main, et les doigts noirs de cambouis, penché sur un objet qui lui semblait très laid.

—Tu parles comme les grandes personnes!

Ça me fit un peu honte. Mais, impitoyable, il ajouta:

—Tu confonds tout... tu mélanges tout!

Il était vraiment très irrité. Il secouait au vent des cheveux tout dorés:

—Je connais une planète où il y a un Monsieur cramoisi. Il n'a jamais respiré une fleur. Il n'a jamais regardé une étoile. Il n'a jamais aimé personne. Il n'a jamais rien fait d'autre que des additions. Et toute la journée il répète comme toi: "Je suis un homme sérieux! Je suis un homme sérieux!” et ça le fait gonfler d'orgueil. Mais ce n'est pas un homme, c'est un champignon!

—Un quoi?

—Un champignon!

Le petit prince était maintenant tout pâle de colère.

—Il y a des millions d'années que les fleures fabriquent des épines. Il y a des millions d'années que les moutons mangent quand même les fleurs. Et ce n'est pas sérieux de chercher à comprendre pourquoi elles se donnent tant de mal pour se fabriquer des épines qui ne servent jamais à rien? Ce n'est pas important la guerre des moutons et des fleurs? Ce n'est pas sérieux et plus important que les additions d'un gros Monsieur rouge? Et si je connais, moi, une fleur unique au monde, qui n'existe nulle part, sauf dans ma planète, et qu'un petit mouton peut anéantir d'un seul coup, comme ça, un matin, sans se rendre compte de ce qu'il fait, ce n'est pas important ça?

Il rougit, puis reprit:

—Si quelqu'un aime une fleure qui n'existe qu'à un exemplaire dans les millions d'étoiles, ça suffit pour qu'il soit heureux quand il les regarde. Il se dit: "Ma fleur est là quelque part...” Mais si le mouton mange la fleur, c'est pour lui comme si, brusquement, toutes les étoiles s'éteignaient! Et ce n'est pas important ça!

Il ne put rien dire de plus. Il éclata brusquement en sanglots. la nuit était tombée. J'avais lâché mes outils. Je me moquais bien de mon marteau, de mon boulon, de la soif et de la mort. Il y avait sur une étoile, une planète, la mienne, la Terre, un petit prince à consoler! Je le pris dans les bras. Je le berçai. Je lui disais: "La fleur que tu aimes n'est pas en danger... Je lui dessinerai une muselière, à ton mouton... Je te dessinerais une armure pour ta fleur... Je...” Je ne savais pas trop quoi dire. Je me sentais très maladroit. Je ne savais comment l'atteindre, où le rejoindre... C'est tellement mystérieux, le pays des larmes.





Le Chapitre Ⅷ





J'appris bien vite à mieux connaître cette fleur. Il y avait toujours eu, sur la planète du petit prince, des fleurs très simples, ornées d'un seul rang de pétales, et qui ne tenaient point de place, et qui ne dérangeaient personne. Elles apparaissaient un matin dans l'herbe, et puis elles s'éteignaient le soir. Mais celle-là avait germé un jour, d'une graine apportée d'on ne sais où, et le petit prince avait surveillé de très près cette brindille qui ne ressemblait pas aux autres brindilles. Ça pouvait être un nouveau genre de baobab. Mais l'arbuste cessa vite de croître, et commença de préparer une fleur. Le petit prince, qui assistait à l'installation d'un bouton énorme, sentait bien qu'il en sortirait une apparition miraculeuse, mais la fleur n'en finissait pas de se préparer à être belle, à l'abri de sa chambre verte. Elle choisissait avec soin ses couleures. Elle s'habillait lentement, elle ajustait un à un ses pétales. Elle ne voulait pas sortir toute fripée comme les coquelicots. Elle ne voulait apparaître que dans le plein rayonnement de sa beauté. Eh! oui. Elle était très coquette! Sa toilette mystérieuse avait donc duré des jours et des jours. Et puis voici qu'un matin, justement à l'heure du lever du soleil, elle s'était montrée.

Et elle, qui avait travaillé avec tant de précision, dit en bâillant:

—Ah! Je me réveille à peine... Je vous demande pardon... Je suis encore toute décoifée...

Le petit prince, alors, ne put contenir son admiration:

—Que vous êtes belle!

—N'est-ce pas, répondit doucement la fleur. Et je suis née en même temps que le soleil...

Le petit prince devina bien qu'elle n'était pas trop modeste, mais elle était si émouvante!

—C'est l'heure, je crois, du petit déjeuner, avait-elle bientôt ajouté, auriez-vous la bonté de penser à moi...

Et le petit prince, tout confus, ayant été chercher un arrosoir d'eau fraîche, avait servi la fleur.

Ainsi l'avait-elle bien vite tourmenté par sa vanité un peu ombrageuse. Un jour, par exemple, parlant de ses quatres épines, elle avait dit au petit prince:

—Ils peuvent venir, les tigres, avec leurs griffes!

—Il n'y a pas de tigres sur ma planète, avait objecté le petit prince, et puis les tigres ne mangent pas d'herbe.

—Je ne suis pas une herbe, avait doucement répondu la fleur.

—Pardonnez-moi...

—Je ne crains rien des tigres, mais j'ai horreur des courrants d'air. Vous n'auriez pas un paravent?

"Horreur des courrants d'air... ce n'est pas de chance, pour une plante, avait remarqué le petit prince. Cette fleur est bien compliquée...”

—Le soir vous me mettrez sous un globe. Il fait très froid chez vous. C'est mal installé. Là d'ou je viens...

Mais elle s'était interrompue. Elle était venue sous forme de graine. Elle n'avait rien pu connaître des autres mondes. Humiliée de s'être laissé surprendre à préparer un mensonge aussi naïf, elle avait toussé deux ou trois fois, pour mettre le petit prince dans son tort:

—Ce paravent?...

—J'allais le chercher mais vous me parliez!

Alors elle avait forcé sa toux pour lui infliger quand même des remords.

Ainsi le petit prince, malgré la bonne volonté de son amour, avait vite douté d'elle. Il avait pris au sérieux des mots sans importance, et il est devenu très malheureux.

"J'aurais dû ne pas l'écouter, me confia-t-il un jour, il ne faut jamais écouter les fleures. Il faut les regarder et les respirer. La mienne embaumait ma planète, mais je ne savais pas m'en réjouir. Cette histoire de griffes, qui m'avait tellement agacé, eût dû m'attendrir...”

Il me confia encore:

"Je n'ai alors rien su comprendre! J'aurais dû la juger sur les actes et non sur les mots. Elle m'embaumait et m'éclairait. Je n'aurais jamais dû m'enfuir! J'aurais dû devinre sa tendresse derrière ses pauvres ruses. les fleurs sont si contradictoires! Mais j'étais trop jeune pour savoir l'aimer.”





Le Chapitre Ⅸ





Je crois qu'il profita, pour son évasion, d'une migration d'oiseaux sauvages. Au matin du départ il mit sa planète bien en ordre. Il ramona soigneusement ses volcans en activité. Il possédait deux volcans en activité. Et c'était bien commode pour faire chauffer le petit déjeuner du matin. Il possédait aussi un volcan étent. Mais, comme il disait, "On ne sais jamais!” Il ramona donc également le volcan éteint. S'ils sont bien ramonés, les volcans brûlent doucement et régulièrement, sans éruptions. les éruptions volcaniques sont comme des feux de cheminée. Evidemment sur notre terre nous sommes beaucoup trop petits pour ramoner nos volcans. C'est pourquoi ils nous causent tant d'ennuis.

Le petit prince arracha aussi, avec un peu de mélancolie, les dernières pousses de baobabs. Il croyait ne plus jamais devoir revenir. Mais tout ces travaux familiers lui parurent, ce matin-là, extrêmement doux. Et, quand il arrosa une dernière fois la fleur, et se prépara à la mettre à l'abri sous son globe, il se découvrit l'envie de pleurer.

—Adieu, dit-il à la fleur.

Mais elle ne lui répondit pas.

—Adieu, répéta-t-il.

La fleur toussa. Mais ce n'était pas à cause de son rhume.

—J'ai été sotte, lui dit-elle enfin. Je te demande pardon. Tâche d'être heureux.

Il fut surpris par l'absence de reproches. Il restait là tout déconcentré, le globe en l'air. Il ne comprennait pas cette douceur calme.

—Mais oui, je t'aime, lui dit la fleur. Tu n'en a rien su, par ma faute. Cela n'a aucune importance. Mais tu as été aussi sot que moi. Tâche d'être heureux...

Laisse ce globe tranquille. Je n'en veux plus.

—Mais le vent...

—Je ne suis pas si enrhumée que ça... L'air frais de la nuit me fera du bien. Je suis une fleur.

—Mais les bêtes...

—Il faut bien que je supporte deux ou trois chenilles si je veux connaître les papillons. Il paraît que c'est tellement beau. Sinon qui me rendra visite? Tu seras loin, toi. Quant aux grosses bêtes, je ne crains rien. J'ai mes griffes.

Et elle montrait naïvement ses quatre épines. Puis elle ajouta:

—Ne traîne pas comme ça, c'est agaçant. Tu as décidé de partir. Va-t'en.

Car elle ne voulait pas qu'il la vît pleurer. C'était une fleur tellement orgueilleuse...





Le Chapitre Ⅹ





Il se trouvait dans la région des astéro&iuml;des 325, 326, 327, 328, 329 et 330. Il commença donc par les visiter pour y chercher une occupation et pour s'instruire.

Le premier était habitée par un roi. le roi siégeait, habillé de pourpre et d'hermine, sur un trône très simple et cependant majesteuex.

—Ah! Voilà un sujet, s'écria le roi quand il aperçut le petit prince.

Et le petit prince se demanda:

—Comment peut-il me connaître puisqu'il ne m'a encore jamais vu!

Il ne savait pas que, pour les rois, le monde est très simplifié. Tous les hommes sont des sujets.

—Approche-toi que je te voie mieux, lui dit le roi qui était tout fier d'être roi pour quelqu'un.

Le petit prince chercha des yeux où s'asseoir, mais la planète était toute encombrée par le magnifique manteau d'hermine. Il resta donc debout, et, comme il était fatigué, il bâilla.

—Il est contraire à l'étiquette de bâiller en présence d'un roi, lui dit le monarque. Je te l'interdis.

—Je ne peux pas m'en empêcher, répondit le petit prince tout confus. J'ai fait un long voyage et je n'ai pas dormi...

—Alors, lui dit le roi, je t'ordonne de bâiller. Je n'ai vu personne bâiller depuis des années. les bâillements sont pour moi des curiosités. Allons! bâille encore. C'est un ordre.

—Ça m'intimide... je ne peux plus... fit le petit prince tout rougissant.

—Hum! Hum! répontit le roi. Alors je... je t'ordonne tantôt de bâiller et tantôt de... Il bredouillait un peu et paraissait vexé.

Car le roi tenait essentiellement à ce que son autorité fût respectée. Il ne tolérait pas le désobéissance. C'était un monarque absolu. Mais comme il était très bon, il donnait des ordres raisonnables.

"Si j'ordonnais, disait-il couramment, si j'ordonnais à un général de se changer en oiseau de mer, et si le général n'obéissait pas, ce ne serait pas la faute du général. Ce serait ma faute.”

—Puis-je m'asseoir? s'enquit timidement le petit prince.

—Je t'ordonne de t'asseoir, lui répondit le roi, qui ramena majestueusement un pan de son manteau d'hermine.

Mais le petit prince s'étonnait. la planète était minuscule. Sur quoi le roi pouvait-il bien réigner?

—Sire, lui dit-il... je vous demande pardon de vous interroger...

—Je t'ordonne de m'interroger, se hâta de dire le roi.

—Sire... sur quoi régnez-vous?

—Sur tout, répondit le roi, avec une grande simplicité.

—Sur tout?

Le roi d'un geste discret désigna sa planète, les autres planètes et les étoiles.

—Sur tout ça? dit le petit prince.

—Sur tout ça... répondit le roi.

Car non seulement c'était un monarque absolu mais c'était un monarque universel.

—Et les étoiles vous obéissent?

—Bien sûr, lui dit le roi. Elles obéissent aussitôt. Je ne tolère pas l'indiscipline.

Un tel pouvoir émerveilla le petit prince. S'il l'avait détendu lui-même, il aurait pu assister, non pas à quarante-quatre, mais à soixante-douze, ou même à cent, ou même à deux cents couchers de soleil dans la même journée, sans avoir jamais à tirer sa chaise! Et comme il se sentait un peu triste à cause du souvenir de sa petite planète abandonnée, il s'enhardit à solliciter une grâce du roi:

—Je voudrais voire un coucher de soleil... Faites-moi plaisir... Ordonnez au soleil de se coucher...

—Si j'ordonnais à un général de voler une fleur à l'autre à la façon d'un papillon, ou d'écrire une tragédie, ou de se changer en oiseau de mer, et si le général n'exécutait pas l'ordre reçu, qui, de lui ou de moi, serait dans son tort?

—Ce serait vous, dit fermement le petit prince.

—Exact. Il faut exiger de chacun ce que chacun peut donner, reprit le roi.

L'autorité repose d'abord sur la raison. Si tu ordonnes à ton peuple d'aller se jeter à la mer, il fer-a la révollution. J'ai le droit d'exiger l'obéissance parce que mes ordres sont raisonnables.

—Alors mon coucher de soleil? rappela le petit prince qui jamais n'oubliait une question une fois qu'il l'avait posée.

—Ton coucher de soleil, tu l'auras. Je l'exigerai. Mais j'attendrai, dans ma science du gouvernement, que les conditions soient favorables.

—Quand ça sera-t-il? s'informa le petit prince.

—Hem! Hem! lui répondit le roi, qui consulta d'abord un gros calendrier, hem! hem! ce sera, vers... vers... ce sera ce soir vers sept heures quarante! Et tu verras comme je suis bien obéi.

Le petit prince bâilla. Il regrettait son coucher de soleil manqué. Et puis il s'ennuyait déjà un peu:

—Je n'ai plus rien à faire ici, dit-il au roi. Je vais repartir!

—Ne pars pas, répontit le roi qui était si fier d'avoir un sujet. Ne pars pas, je te fais ministre!

—Ministre de quoi?

—De... de la justice!

—Mais il n'y a personne à juger!

—On ne sait pas, lui dit le roi. Je n'ai pas fait encore le tour de mon royaume.

Je suis très vieux, je n'ai pas de place pour un carrosse, et ça me fatigue de marcher.

—Oh! Mais j'ai déjà vu, dit le petit prince qui se pencha pour jeter encore un coup d'œil sur l'autre côté de la planète. Il n'y a personne là-bas non plus...

—Tu te jugeras donc toi-même, lui répondit le roi. C'est le plus difficile. Il est bien plus difficile de se juger soi-même que de juger autrui. Si tu réussis à bien te juger, c'est que tu es un véritable sage.

—Moi, dit le petit prince, je puis me juger moi-même n'importe où. Je n'ai pas besoin d'habiter ici.

—Hem! Hem! dit le roi, je crois bien que sur ma planète il y a quelque part un vieux rat. Je l'entends la nuit. Tu pourras juger ce vieux rat. Tu le condamneras à mort de temps en temps. Ainsi sa vie dépendera de ta justice. Mais tu le gracieras chaque fois pour l'économiser. Il n'y en a qu'un.

—Moi, répondit le petit prince, je n'aime pas condamner à mort, et je crois bien que je m'en vais.

—Non, dit le roi.

Mais le petit prince, ayant achevé ses préparatifs, ne voulut point peiner le vieux monarque:

—Si votre majesté désirait être obéie ponctuellement, elle pourrait me donner un ordre raisonnable. Elle pourrait m'ordonner, par exemple, de partir avant une minute. Il me semble que les conditions sont favorables...

Le roi n'ayant rien répondu, le petit prince hésita d'abord, puis, avec un soupir, pris le départ.

—Je te fais mon ambassadeur, se hâta alors de crier le roi.

Il avait un grand air d'autorité.

Les grandes personnes sont bien étranges, se dit le petit prince, en lui-même, durant son voyage.





Le Chapitre Ⅺ





La seconde planète était habitée par un vaniteux:

—Ah! Ah! Voilà la vistit d'un admirateur! s'écria de loin le vaniteux dès qu'il aperçut le petit prince.

Car, pour les vaniteux, les autres hommes sont des admirateurs.

—Bonjour, dit le petit prince. Vous avez un drôle de chapeau.

—C'est pour saluer, lui répondit le vaniteux. C'est pour saluer quand on m'acclame. Malheureusement il ne passe jamais personne par ici.

—Ah oui? dit le petit prince qui ne comprit pas.

—Frappe tes mains l'une contre l'autre, conseilla donc le vaniteux.

Le petit prince frappa ses mains l'une contre l'autre. Le vaniteux salua modestement en soulevant son chapeau.

—Ça c'est plus amusant que la visite du roi, se dit en lui même le petit prince.

Et il recommença de frapper ses mains l'une contre l'autre. le vaniteux recommença de saluer en soulevant son chapeau.

Après cinq minutes d'exercice le petit prince se fatigua de la monotonie du jeu:

—Et, pour que le chapeau tombe, demanda-t-il, que faut-il faire?

Mais le vaniteux ne l'entendit pas. les vaniteux n'entendent jamais que les louanges.

—Est-ce que tu m'admires vraiment beaucoup? demanda-t-il au petit prince.

—Qu'est-ce que signifie admirer?

—Admirer signifie reconnaître que je suis l'homme le plus beau, le mieux habillé, le plus riche et le plus intelligent de la planète.

—Mais tu es seul sur ta planète!

—Fais-moi ce plaisir. Admire-moi quand-même!

—Je t'admire, dit le petit prince, en haussant un peu les épaules, mais en quoi cela peut-il bien t'intéresser?

Et le petit prince s'en fut.

Les grandes personnes sont décidément bien bizarres, se dit-il en lui-même durant son voyage.





Le Chapitre Ⅻ





A planète suivante était habitée par un buveur. Cette visite fut très courte, mais elle plongea le petit prince dans une grande mélancolie:

—Que fais-tu là? dit-il au buveur, qu'il trouva installé en silence devant une collection de bouteilles vides et une collection de bouleilles pleines.

—Je bois, répondit le buveur, d'un air lugubre.

—Pourquoi bois-tu? lui demanda le petit prince.

—Pour oublier, répondit le buveur.

—Pour oublier quoi? s'enquit le petit prince qui déjà le paignait.

—Pour oublier que j'ai honte, avoua le buveur en baissant la tête.

—Honte de quoi? s'informa le petit prince qui désirait le secourir.

—Honte de boire! acheva le buveur qui s'enferma définitivement dans le silence.

Et le petit prince s'en fut, perplexe.

"Les grandes personnes sont décidément très très bizarres”, se disait-il en lui-même durant le voyage.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅢ





La quatrième planète était celle du businessman. Cet homme était si occupé qu'il ne leva même pas la tête à l'arrivée du petit prince.

—Bonjour, lui dit celui-ci. Votre cigarette est éteinte.

—Trois et deux font cinq. Cinq et sept douze. Douze et trois quinze. Bonjour.

Quinze et sept vingt-deux. Vingt-deux et six vingt-huit. Pas de temps de la rallumer. Vingt-six et cinq trente et un. Ouf! Ça fait donc cinq cent un millions six cent vingt-deux mille sept cent trente et un.

—Cinq cents millions de quoi?

—Hein? Tu es toujours là? Cinq cent un million de... je ne sais plus... J'ai tellement de travail! Je suis sérieux, moi, je ne m'amuse pas à des balivernes!

Deux et cinq sept...

—Cinq cent millions de quoi, répéta le petit prince qui jamais de sa vie, n'avait-il renoncé à une question, une fois qu'il l'avait posée.

Le businessman leva la tête:

—Depuis cinquante-quatre ans que j'habite cette planète-ci, je n'ai été dérangé que trois fois. la première fois ç'a été, il y a vingt-deux ans, par un hanneton qui était tombé Dieu sait d'où. Il répandait un bruit épouvantable, et j'ai fait quatre erreurs dans une addition. La seconde fois ç'à été, il y a onze ans, par une crise de rhumatisme. Je suis sérieux, moi. La troisième fois... la voici! Je disais donc cinq cent un millions...

—Millions de quoi?

Le businessman comprit qu'il n'était point d'espoir de paix:

—Millions de ces petites choses que l'on voit quelquefois dans le ciel.

—Des mouches?

—Mais non, des petites choses qui brillent.

—Des abeilles?

—Mais non. Des petites choses dorées qui font rêvasser les fainéants. Mais je suis sérieux, moi! Je n'ai pas le temps de rêvasser.

—Ah! des étoiles?

—C'est bien ça. Des étoiles.

—Et que fais-tu des cinq cent millions d'étoiles?

—Cinq cent un millions six cent vingt-deux mille sept cent trente-et-un. Je suis un homme sérieux, moi, je suis précis.

—Et que fais-tu de ces étoiles?

—Ce que j'en fais?

—Oui.

—Rien. Je les possède.

—Tu possèdes les étoiles?

—Oui.

—Mais j'ai déjà vu un roi qui...

—Les rois ne possèdent pas. Ils "règnent” sur. C'est très différent.

—Et à quoi cela te sert-il de posséder les étoiles?

—Ça me sert à être riche.

—Et à quoi cela te sert-il d'être riche?

—A acheter d'autres étoiles, si quelqu'un en trouve.

"Celui-là, se dit en lui-même le petit prince, il raisonne un peu comme mon ivrogne."

Cependant il posa encore des questions:

—Comment peut-on posséder les étoiles?

—A qui sont-elles? riposta, grincheux, le businessman. —Je ne sais pas. À personne.

—Alors elles sont à moi, car j'y ai pensé le premier.

—Ça suffit?

—Bien sûr. Quand tu trouves un diament qui n'est à personne, il est à toi. Quand tu trouves une île qui n'est à personne, elle est à toi. Quand tu as une idée le premier, tu la fais breveter: elle est à toi. Et moi je possède les étoiles, puisque jamais personne avant moi n'a songé à les posséder.

—Ça c'est vrai, dit le petit prince. Et qu'en fais-tu?

—Je les gère. Je les compte et je les recompte, dit le businessman. C'est difficile. Mais je suis un homme sérieux!

Le petit prince n'était pas satisfait encore.

—Moi, si je possède un foulard, je puis le mettre autour de mon cou et l'emporter. Moi, si je possède une fleur, je puis cueillir ma fleur et l'emporter. Mais tu ne peux pas cueillir les étoiles!

—Non, mais je puis les placer en banque.

—Qu'est-ce que ça veut dire?

—Ça veut dire que j'écris sur un petit papier le nombre de mes étoiles. Et puis j'enferme à clef ce papier-là dans un tiroir.

—Et c'est tout?

—Ça suffit!

"C'est amusant, pensa le petit prince. C'est assez poétique. Mais ce n'est pas très sérieux.”

Le petit prince avait sur les choses sérieuses des idées très différentes des idées des grandes personnes.

—Moi, dit-il encore, je possède une fleur que j'arrose tous les jours. Je possède trois volcans que je ramone toutes les semaines. Car je ramone aussi celui qui est éteint. On ne sait jamais. C'est utile à mes volcans, et c'est aussi utile à ma fleur, que je les possède. Mais tu n'est pas utile aux étoiles...

Le businessman ouvrit la bouche mais ne trouva rien à répondre, et le petit prince s'en fut.

"Les grandes personnes sont décidément tout à fait extraordinaires”, se disait-il en lui même durant son voyage.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅣ





La cinquième planète était très curieuse. C'était la plus petite de toutes. Il y avait là juste assez de place pour loger un réverbère et un allumeur de réverbères. Le petit prince ne parvenait pas à s'expliquer à quoi pouvaient servir, quelque part dans le ciel, sur une planète sans maison, ni population, un réverbère et un allumeur de réverbères. Cependant il se dit en lui-même:

"Peut-être bien que cette homme est absurde. Cependant il est moins absurde que le roi, que le vaniteux, que le businessman et que le buveur. Au moins son travail a-t-il un sens. Quand il allume son réverbère, c'est comme s'il faisait naître une étoile de plus, ou une fleur. Quand il éteint son réverbère ça endort la fleur ou l'étoile. C'est une occupation très jolie. C'est véritablement utile puisque c'est joli.

Lorsqu'il aborda la planète il salua respectueusement l'allumeur:

—Bonjour. Pourquoi viens-tu dd'éteindre ton réverbère?

—C'est la consigne, répondit l'allumeur. Bonjour.

—Qu'est-ce la consigne?

—C'est d'éteindre mon réverbère. Bonsoir.

Et il le ralluma.

—Mais pourquoi viens-tu de le rallumer?

—C'est la consigne, répondit l'allumeur.

—Je ne comprends pas, dit le petit prince.

—Il n'y a rien à comprendre, dit l'allumeur. La consigne c'est la consigne. Bonjour.

Et il éteignit son réverbère.

Puis il s'épongea le front avec un mouchoir à carreaux rouges.

—Je fais là un métiter terrible. C'était raisonnable autrefois. J'éteignais le matin et j'allumais le soir. J'avais le reste du jour pour me reposer, et le reste de la nuit pour dormir...

—Et, depuis cette époque, la consigne a changé?

—La consigne n'a pas changé, dit l'allumeur. C'est bien là le drame! La planète d'année en année a tourné de plus en plus vite, et la consigne n'a pas changé!

—Alors? dit le petit prince.

—Alors maintenant qu'elle fait un tour par minute, je n'ai plus un seconde de repos. J'allume et j'éteins une fois par minute!

—Ça c'est drôle! Les jours chez toi durent une minute!

—Ce n'est pas drôle du tout, dit l'allumeur. Ça fait déjà un mois que nous parlons ensemble.

—Un mois?

—Oui. Trente minutes. Trente jours! Bonsoir.

Et il ralluma son réverbère.

Le petit prince le regarda et il aima cet allumeur qui était tellement fidèle à la consigne. Il se souvint des couchers de soleil que lui-même allait autrefois chercher, en tirant sa chaise. Il voulut aider son ami:

—Tu sais... je connais un moyen de te reposer quand tu voudras...

—Je veux toujours, dit l'allumeur.

Car on peut être, à la fois, fidèle et paresseux.

Le petit prince poursuivit:

—Ta planète est tellement petite que tu en fais le tour en trois enjambées. Tu n'as qu'à marcher assez lentement pour rester toujours au soleil. Quand tu voudras te reposer tu marcheras... et le jour durera aussi longtemps que tu voudras.

—Ça ne m'avance pas à grand chose, dit l'allumeur. Ce que j'aime dans la vie, c'est dormir.

—Ce n'est pas de chance, dit le petit prince.

—Ce n'est pas de chance, dit l'allumeur. Bonjour.

Et il éteignit son réverbère.

Celui-là, se dit le petit prince, tandis qu'il poursuivait plus loin son voyage, celui-là serait méprisé par tous les autres, par le roi, par le vaniteux, par le buveur, par le businessman. Cependant c'est le seul qui ne me paraisse pas ridicule. C'est, peut-être, parce qu'il s'occupe d'autre chose que de soi-même.

Il eut un soupir de regret et se dit encore:

—Celui-là est le seul dont j'eusse pu faire mon ami. Mais sa planète est vraiment trop petite. Il n'y a pas de place pour deux...

Ce que le petit prince n'osait pas s'avouer, c'est qu'il regrettait cette planète bénie à cause, surtout, des mille quatre cent quarrante couchers de soleil par vingt-quatre heures!





Le Chapitre ⅩⅤ





La sixième planète était une planète dix fois plus vaste. Elle était habitée par un vieux Monsieur qui écrivait d'énormes livres.

—Tiens! voilà un explorateur! s'écria-t-il, quand il aperçut le petit prince.

Le petit prince s'assit sur la table et souffla un peu. Il avait déjà tant voyagé!

—D'où viens-tu? lui dit le vieux Monsieur.

—Quel est ce gros livre? dit le petit prince. Que faites-vous ici?

—Je suis géographe, dit le vieux Monsieur.

—Qu'est-ce un géographe?

—C'est un savant qui connaît où se trouvent les mers, les fleuves, les villes, les montagnes et les déserts.

—Ça c'est intéressant, dit le petit prince. Ca c'est enfin un véritable métier! Et il jeta un coup d'oeil autour de lui sur la planète du géographe. Il n'avait jamais vu encore une planète aussi ma jestueuse.

—Elle est bien belle, votre planète. Est-ce qu'il y a des océans?

—Je ne puis pas le savoir, dit le géographe.

—Ah! (Le petit prince était déçu.) Et des montagnes?

—Je ne puis pas le savoir, dit le géographe.

—Et des villes et des fleuves et des déserts?

—Je ne puis pas le savoir non plus, dit le géographe.

—Mais vous êtes géographe!

—C'est exact, dit le géographe, mais je ne suis pas explorateur. Je manque absolument d'explorateurs. Ce n'est pas le géographe qui va faire le compte des villes, des fleuves, des montagnes, des mers et des océans. Le géographe est trop important pour flâner. Il ne quitte pas son bureau. Mais il reçoit les explorateurs. Il les interroge, et il prend note leurs souvenirs. Et si les souvenirs de l'un d'entre eux lui paraissent intéressants, le géographe fait une enquète sur la moralité de l'explorateur.

—Pourquoi ça?

—Parce qu'un explorateur qui mentait entraînerait des catastrophes dans les livres de géographie. Et aussi un explorateur qui boirait trop.

—Pourquoi ça? fit le petit prince.

—Parce que les ivrognes voient double. Alors le géographe noterait deux montagnes, là où il n'y en a qu'un seule.

—Je connais quelqu'un, dit le petit prince, qui serait mauvais explorateur.

—C'est possible. Donc, quand la moralité de l'explorateur paraît bonne, on fait une enquète sur sa découverte.

—On va voir?

—Non. C'est trop compliqué. Mais on exige qu'il en rapporte de grosses pierres.

Le géographe soudain s'émut.

—Mais toi, tu viens de loin! Tu es explorateur! Tu vas me décrire ta planète!

Et le géographe, ayant ouvert son régistre, tailla son crayon. On note d'abord au crayon les récits des explorateurs. On attend, pour noter à l'encre, que l'explorateur ait fourni des preuves.

—Alors? interrogea le géographe.

—Oh! chez moi, dit le petit prince, ce n'est pas très intéressant, c'est tout petit. J'ai trois volcans. Deux volcans en activité, et un volcan éteint. Mais on ne sait jamais.

—On ne sait jamais, dit le géographe.

—J'ai aussi une fleur.

—Nous ne notons pas les fleurs, dit le géographe.

—Pourquoi ça! c'est pas joli!

—Parce que les fleurs sont éphémères.

—Qu'est ce que signifie: "éphémère”?

—Les géographies, dit le géographe, sont les livres les plus précieux de tous les livres. Elles ne se démodent jamais. Il est rare qu'une montagne change de place. Il est très rare qu'un océan se vide de son eau. Nous écrivons des choses éternelles.

—Mais les volcans éteints peuvent se réveiller, interrompit le petit prince. Qu'est -ce que signifie "éphémère”?

—Que les volcans soient éteints ou soient éveillés, ça revient au même pour nous autres, dit le géographe. Ce qui compte pour nous, c'est la montagne. Elle ne change pas.

—Mais qu'est-ce que signifie "éphémère”? répéta le petit prince qui, de sa vie, n'avait renoncé à une question, une fois qu'il l'avait posée.

—Ça signifie "qui est menacé de disparition prochaine”.

—Ma fleur est menacée de disparition prochaine?

—Bien sûr.

Ma fleur est éphémère, se dit le petit prince, et elle n'a que quatre épines pour se défendre contre le monde! Et je l'ai laissée toute seule chez moi!

Ce fut là son premier mouvement de regret. Mais il reprit courage:

—Que me conseillez-vous d'aller visiter? demanda-t-il.

—La planète Terre, lui répondit le géographe. Elle a une bonne réputation...

Et le petit prince s'en fut, songeant à sa fleur.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅥ





La septième planète fut donc la Terre.

La Terre n'est pas une planète quelconque! On y compte cent onze rois (en n'oubliant pas, bien sûr, les rois nègres), sept mille géographes, neuf cent mille businessmen, sept millions et demi d'ivrognes, trois cent deux milliards de grandes personnes.

Pour vous donner une idée des dimensions de la Terre je vous dirai qu'avant l'invention de l'électricité on y devait entretenir, sur l'ensemble des six continents, une véritable armée de quatre cent soixante-deux mille cinq cent onze allumeurs de réverbères.

Vu d'un peu loin ça faisait un effet splandide. Les mouvements de cette armeé étaient réglés comme ceux d'un ballet d'opéra. D'abord venait le tour des allumeurs de réverbères de Nouvelle-Zélande et d'Australie. Puis ceux-ci, ayant allumé leurs lampions, s'en allaient dormir. Alors entraient à leur tour dans la danse les allumeurs de réverbères de Chine et de Sibérie. Puis eux aussi s'escamon-taient dans les coulisses. Alors venait le tour des allumeurs de réverbères de Russie et des Indes. Puis de ceux d'Afrique et d'Europe. Puis de ceux d'Amérique du Sud. Puis de ceux d'Amérique du Nord. Et jamais ils ne se trompaient dans leur ordre d'entrée en scène. C'était grandoise.

Seuls, l'allumeur de l'unique réverbère du pôle Nord, et son confrère de l'unique réverbère du pôle Sud, menaient des vies d'oisiveté et de nonchalance:

Ils travaillaient deux fois par an.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅦ





Quand on veut faire de l'esprit, il arrive que l'on mente un peu. Je n'ai pas été très honnaîte en vous parlant des allumeurs de réverbères. Je risque de donner une fausse idée de notre planète à ceux qui ne la connaissent pas. Les hommes occupent très peu de place sur la terre. Si les deux milliards d'habitants qui peuplent la terre se tenaient debout et un peu serrés, comme pour un meeting, ils logeraient aisément sur une place publique de vingt milles de long sur vingt milles de large. On pourrait entasser l'humanité sur le moindre petit îlot du Pacifique.

Les grandes personnes, bien sûr, ne vous croiront pas. Elles s'imaginent tenir beaucoup de place. Elles se voient importantes comme les baobabs. Vous leur conseillerez donc de faire le calcul. Elles adorent les chiffres: ça leur plaira. Mais ne perdez pas votre temps à ce pensum. C'est inutile. Vous avez confiance en moi.

Le petit prince, une fois sur terre, fut donc bien surpris de ne voir personne. Il avait déjà peur de s'être trompé de planète, quand un anneau couleur de lune remua dans le sable.

—Bonne nuit, fit le petit prince à tout hasard.

—Bonne nuit, fit le serpent.

—Sur quelle planète suis-je tombé? demanda le petit prince.

—Sur la Terre, en Afrique, répondit le serpent.

—Ah! ... Il n'y a donc personne sur la Terre?

—Ici c'est le désert. Il n'y a personne dans les déserts. La Terre est grande, dit le serpent.

Le petit prince s'assit sur une pierre et leva les yeux vers le ciel:

—Je me demande, dit-il, si les étoiles sont éclairées afin que chacun puisse un jour retrouver la sienne. Regarde ma planète. Elle est juste au-dessus de nous... Mais comme elle est loin!

—Elle est belle, dit le serpent. Que viens-tu faire ici?

—J'ai des difficultés avec une fleur, dit le petit prince.

—Ah! fit le serpent.

Et ils se turent.

—Où sont les hommes? reprit enfin le petit prince. On est un peu seul dans le désert...

—On est seul aussi chez les hommes, dit le serpent.

Le petit prince le regarda longtemps:

—Tu es un drôle de bête, lui dit-il enfin, mince comme un doigt...

—Mais je suis plus puissant que le doigt d'un roi, dit le serpent.

Le petit prince eut un sourire:

—Tu n'est pas bien puissant... tu n'as même pas de pattes... tu ne peux même pas voyager...

—Je puis t'emporter plus loin qu'un navire, dit le serpent.

Il s'enroula autour de la cheville du petit prince, comme un bracelet d'or:

—Celui que je touche, je rends à la terre dont il est sorti, dit-il encore. Mais tu es pur et tu viens d'une étoile...

Le petit prince ne répondit rien.

—Tu me fais pitié, toi si faible, sur cette Terre de granit. Je puis t'aider un jour si tu regrettes trop ta planète. Je puis...

—Oh! J'ai très bien compris, fit le petit prince, mais pourquoi parles-tu toujours par énigmes? —Je les résous toutes, dit le serpent.

Et ils se turent.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅧ





Le petit prince traversa le désert et ne rencontra qu'une fleur. Une fleur à trois pétales, une fleur de rien du tout...

—Bonjour, dit le petit prince.

—Bonjour, dit la fleur.

—Où sont les hommes? demanda poliment le petit prince.

La fleur, un jour, avait vu passer une caravane:

—Les hommes? Il en existe, je crois, six ou sept. Je les ai aperçus il y a des années. Mais on ne sait jamais où les trouver. Le vent les promène. Ils manquent de racines, ça les gêne beaucoup.

—Adieu, fit le petit prince.

—Adieu, dit la fleur.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅨ





Le petit prince fit l'ascension d'une haute montagne. Les seules montagnes qu'il eût jamais connues étaient les trois volcans qui lui arrivaient au genou. Et il se servait du volcan éteint comme d'un tabouret. "D'une montagne haute comme celle-ci, se dit-il donc, j'apercevrai d'un coup toute la planète et tous les hommes...” Mais il n'aperçut rien que des aiguilles de roc bien aiguisées. —Bonjour, dit-il à tout hasard.

—Bonjour... Bonjour... Bonjour... répondit l'écho.

—Qui êtes-vous? dit le petit prince.

—Qui êtes-vous... qui êtes-vous... qui êtes-vous... répondit l'écho.

—Soyez mes amis, je suis seul, dit-il.

—Je suis seul... je suis seul... Je suis seul... répondit l'écho.

"Quelle drôle de planète! pensa-t-il alors. Elle est toute sèche, et toute pointue et toute salée.

Et les hommes manquent d'imagination. Ils répètent ce qu'on leur dit... Chez moi j'avais une fleur: elle parlait toujours la première...”





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩ





Mais il arriva que le petit prince, ayant longtemps marché à travers les sables, les rocs et les neiges, découvrit enfin une route. Et les routes vont toutes chez les hommes.

—Bonjour, dit-il.

C'était un jardin fleuri de roses.

—Bonjour, dirent les roses.

Le petit prince les regarda. Elles ressemblaient toutes à sa fleur.

—Qui êtes-vous? leur demanda-t-il, stupéfait.

—Nous sommes des roses, dirent les roses.

—Ah! fit le petit prince...

Et il se sentit très malheureux. Sa fleur lui avait raconté qu'elle était seule de son espèce dans l'univers. Et voici qu'il en était cinq mille, toutes semblables, dans un seul jardin!

"Elle serait bien vexée, se dit-il, si elle voyait ça... elle tousserait énormément et ferait semblant de mourrir pour échapper au ridicule. Et je serais bien obligé de faire semblant de la soigner, car, sinon, pour m'humilier moi aussi, elle se laisserait vraiment mourir...”

Puis il se dit encore: "Je me croyais riche d'une fleur unique, et je ne possède qu'une rose ordinaire. Ça et mes trois volcans qui m'arrivent au genou, et dont l'un, peut-être, est éteint pour toujours, ça ne fais pas de moi un bien grand prince...” Et, couché dans l'herbe, il pleura.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩⅠ





C'est alors qu'apparut le renard.

—Bonjour, dit le renard.

—Bonjour, répondit poliment le petit prince, qui se tourna mais ne vit rien.

—Je suis là, dit la voix, sous le pommier.

—Qui es-tu? dit le petit prince. Tu es bien joli...

—Je suis un renard, dit le renard.

—Viens jouer avec moi, lui proposa le petit prince. Je suis tellement triste...

—Je ne puis pas jouer avec toi, dit le renard. Je ne suis pas apprivoisé —Ah! Pardon, fit le petit prince.

Mais après réflexion, il ajouta:

—Qu'est-ce que signifie "apprivoiser”?

—Tu n'es pas d'ici, dit le renard, que cherches-tu?

—Je cherche les hommes, dit le petit prince. Qu'est-ce que signifie "apprivoiser”?

—Les hommes, dit le renard, ils ont des fusils et ils chassent. C'est bien gênant! Il élèvent aussi des poules. C'est leur seul intérêt. Tu cherches des poules?

—Non, dit le petit prince. Je cherche des amis. Qu'est-ce que signifie "apprivoiser”?

—C'est une chose trop oubliée, dit le renard. Ça signifie "Créer des liens...”

—Créer des liens?

—Bien sûr, dit le renard. Tu n'es encore pour moi qu'un petit garçon tout semblable à cent mille petits garçons. Et je n'ai pas besoin de toi. Et tu n'a pas besoin de moi non plus. Je ne suis pour toi qu'un renard semblable à cent mille renards. Mais, si tu m'apprivoises, nous aurons besoin l'un de l'autre. Tu seras pour moi unique au monde. Je serai pour toi unique au monde...

—Je commence à comprendre, dit le petit prince. Il y a une fleur... je crois qu'elle m'a apprivoisé...

—C'est possible, dit le renard. On voit sur la Terre toutes sortes de choses...

—Oh! ce n'est pas sur la Terre, dit le petit prince. Le renard parut très intrigué:

—Sur une autre planète?

—Oui.

—Il y a des chasseurs, sur cette planète-là?

—Non.

—Ça, c'est intéressant! Et des poules?

—Non.

—Rien n'est parfait, soupira le renard.

Mais le renard revint à son idée:

—Ma vie est monotone. Je chasse les poules, les hommes me chassent. Toutes les poules se ressemblent, et tous les hommes se ressemblent. Je m'ennuie donc un peu. Mais si tu m'apprivoises, ma vie sera comme ensoleillée. Je connaîtrai un bruit de pas qui sera différent de tous les autres. Les autres pas me font rentrer sous terre. Le tien m'appelera hors du terrier, comme une musique. Et puis regarde! Tu vois, là-bas, les champs de blé? Je ne mange pas de pain. Le blé pour moi est inutile. Les champs de blé ne me rappellent rien. Et ça, c'est triste! Mais tu a des cheveux couleur d'or. Alors ce sera merveilleux quand tu m'aura apprivoisé! Le blé, qui est doré, me fera souvenir de toi. Et j'aimerai le bruit du vent dans le blé...

Le renard se tut et regarda longtemps le petit prince:

—S'il te plaît... apprivoise-moi! dit-il.

—Je veux bien, répondit le petit prince, mais je n'ai pas beaucoup de temps.

J'ai des amis à découvrir et beaucoup de choses à connaître.

—On ne connaît que les choses que l'on apprivoise, dit le renard. Les hommes n'ont plus le temps de rien connaître. Ils achètent des choses toutes faites chez les marchands. Mais comme il n'existe point de marchands d'amis, les hommes n'ont plus d'amis. Si tu veux un ami, apprivoise-moi!

—Que faut-il faire? dit le petit prince.

—Il faut être très patient, répondit le renard. Tu t'assoiras d'abord un peu loin de moi, comme ça, dans l'herbe. Je te regarderai du coin de l'œil et tu ne diras rien. Le langage est source de malentendus. Mais, chaque jour, tu pourras t'asseoir un peu plus près...

Le lendemain revint le petit prince.

—Il eût mieux valu revenir à la même heure, dit le renard. Si tu viens, par exemple, à quatre heures de l'après-midi, dès trois heures je commencerai d'être heureux. Plus l'heure avancera, plus je me sentirai heureux. À quatre heures, déjà, je m'agiterai et m'inquiéterai; je découvrira le prix du bonheur! Mais si tu viens n'importe quand, je ne saurai jamais à quelle heure m'habiller le cœur... il faut des rites.

—Qu'est-ce qu'un rite? dit le petit prince.

—C'est aussi quelque chose de trop oublié, dit le renard. C'est ce qui fait qu'un jour est différent des autres jours, une heure, des autres heures. Il y a un rite, par exemple, chez mes chasseurs. Ils dansent le jeudi avec les filles du village. Alors le jeudi est jour merveilleux! Je vais me promener jusqu'à la vigne. Si les chasseurs dansaient n'importe quand, les jours se ressembleraient tous, et je n'aurait point de vacances.

Ainsi le petit prince apprivoisa le renard. Et quand l'heure du départ fut proche:

—Ah! dit le renard... je preurerai.

—C'est ta faute, dit le petit prince, je ne te souhaitais point de mal, mais tu as voulu que je t'apprivoise...

—Bien sûr, dit le renard.

—Mais tu vas pleurer! dit le petit prince.

—Bien sûr, dit le renard.

—Alors tu n'y gagnes rien!

—J'y gagne, dit le renard, à cause de la couleur du blé.

Puis il ajouta:

—Va revoir les roses. Tu comprendras que la tienne est unique au monde. Tu reviendras me dire adieu, et je te ferai cadeau d'un secret.

Le petit prince s'en fut revoir les roses:

—Vous n'êtes pas du tout semblables à ma rose, vous n'êtes rien encore, leur dit-il. Personne ne vous a apprivoisés et vous n'avez apprivoisé personne. Vous êtes comme était mon renard. Ce n'était qu'un renard semblable à cent mille autres. Mais j'en ai fait mon ami, et il est maintenant unique au monde.

Et les roses étaient gênées.

—Vous êtes belles mais vous êtes vides, leur dit-il encore. On ne peut pas mourir pour vous. Bien sûr, ma rose à moi, un passant ordinaire croirait qu'elle vous ressemble. Mais à elle seule elle est plus importante que vous toutes, puisque c'est elle que j'ai arrosée. Puisque c'est elle que j'ai abritée par le paravent. Puisque c'est elle dont j'ai tué les chenilles (sauf les deux ou trois pour les papillons). Puisque c'est elle que j'ai écoutée se plaindre, ou se vanter, ou même quelquefois se taire. Puisque c'est ma rose.





Et il revint vers le renard:

—Adieu, dit-il...

—Adieu, dit le renard. Voici mon secret. Il est très simple: on ne voit bien qu'avec le cœur. L'essentiel est invisible pour les yeux.

—L'essentiel est invisible pour les yeux, répéta le petit prince, afin de se souvenir.

—C'est le temps que tu as perdu pour ta rose qui fait ta rose si importante.

—C'est le temps que j'ai perdu pour ma rose... fit le petit prince, afin de se souvenir.

—Les hommes on oublié cette vérité, dit le renard. Mais tu ne dois pas l'oublier. Tu deviens responsable pour toujours de ce que tu as apprivoisé. Tu es responsable de ta rose...

—Je suis responsable de ma rose... répéta le petit prince, afin de se souvenir.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩⅡ





—Bonjour, dit le petit prince.

—Bonjour, dit l'aiguilleur.

—Que fais-tu ici? dit le petit prince.

—Je trie les voyageurs, par paquets de mille, dit l'aiguilleur. J'expédie les trains qui les emportent, tantôt vers la droite, tantôt vers la gauche.

Et un rapide illuminé, grondant comme le tonnere, fit trembler la cabine d'aiguillage.

—Ils sont bien pressés, dit le petit prince. Que cherchent-ils?

—L'homme de la locomotive l'ignore lui-même, dit l'aiguilleur.

Et gronda, en sens inverse, un second rapide illuminé.

—Ils reviennent déjà? demanda le petit prince...

—Ce ne sont pas les mêmes, dit l'aiguilleur. C'est un échange.

—Ils n'étaient pas contents, là où ils étaient?

—On n'est jamais content là où l'on est, dit l'aiguilleur.

Et gronda le tonnerre d'un troisième rapide illuminé.

—Ils poursuivent les premiers voyageur? demanda le petit prince.

—Ils ne poursuivent rien du tout, dit l'aiguilleur. Ils dorment là-dedans, ou bien ils bâillent. Les enfants seuls écrasent leur nez contre les vitres.

—Les enfants seuls savent ce qu'ils cherchent, fit le petit prince. Ils perdent du temps pour une poupée de chiffons, et elle devient très importante, et si on la leur enlève, ils pleurent...

—Ils ont de la chance, dit l'aiguilleur.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩⅢ





—Bonjour, dit le petit prince.

—Bonjour, dit le marchand de pilules perfctionnées qui apaisent la soif. On en avale une par semaine et l'on n'éprouve plus le besoin de boire.

—Pourquoi vends-tu ça? dit le petit princ.

—C'est une grosse économie de temps, dit le marchand. Les experts ont fait des calculs. On épargne cinquante-trois minutes pas semaine.

—Et que fait-on des cinquante-trois minutes?

—On en fait ce que l'on veut...

"Moi, se dit le petit prince, si j'avais cinquante-trois minutes à dépenser, je marcherais tout doucement vers une fontaine...”





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩⅣ





Nous en étions au huitième jour de ma panne dans le désert, et j'avais écouté l'histoire du marchand en buvant la dernière goutte de ma provision d'eau:

—Ah! dis-je au petit prince, ils sont bien jolis, tes souvenirs, mais je n'ai pas encore réparé mon avion, je n'ai plus rien à boire, et je serais heureux, moi aussi, si je pouvais marcher tout doucement vers une fontaine!

—Mon ami le renard, me dit-il...

—Mon petit bonhomme, il ne s'agit plus du renard!

—Pourquoi?

—Parce qu'on va mourrir de soif...

Il ne comprit pas mon raisonnement, il me répondit:

—C'est bien d'avoir eu un ami, même si l'on va mourrir. Moi, je suis bien content d'avoir eu un ami renard...

Il ne mesure pas le danger, me dis-je. Il n'a jamais ni faim ni soif. Un peu de soleil lui suffit...

Mais il me regarda et répondit à ma pensée:

—J'ai soif aussi... cherchons un puits...

J'eus un geste de lassitude: il est absurde de chercher un puits, au hasard, dans l'immensité du désert. Cependant nous nous mîmes en marche.

Quand nous eûmes marché, des heures, en silence, la nuit tomba, et les étoiles commencèrent des'éclairer. Je les apercevais comme en rêve, ayant un peu de fièvre, à cause de ma soif. Les mots du petit prince dansaient dans ma mémoire:

—Tu as donc soif, toi aussi? lui demandai-je.

Mais il ne répondit pas à ma question. Il me dit simplement:

—L'eau put aussi être bonne pour le cœur...

Je ne compris pas sa réponse mais je me tus... Je savais bien qu'il ne fallait pas l'interroger.

Il était fatigué. Il s'assit. Je m'assis auprès de lui. Et, après un silence, il dit encore:

—Les étoiles sont belles, à cause d'une fleur que l'on ne voit pas...

Je répondis "bien sûr” et je regardai, sans parler, les plis du sable sous la lune.

—Le désert est beau, ajouta-t-il...

Et c'était vrai. J'ai toujours aimé le désert. On s'assoit sur une dune de sable. On ne voit rien. On n'entend rien. Et cependant quelque chose rayonne en silence...

—Ce qui embellit le désert, dit le petit prince, c'est qu'il cache un puits quelque part...

Je fus surpris de comprendre soudain ce mystérieux rayonnement du sable. Lorsque j'étais petit garçon j'habitais une maison ancienne, et la légende racontait qu'un trésor y était enfoui. Bien sûr, jamais personne n'a su le découvrir, ni peut-être même ne l'a cherché. Mais il enchantait toute cette maison. Ma maison, cachait un secret au fond de son cœur...

—Oue, dis-je au petit prince, qu'il s'agisse de la maison, des étoiles ou du désert, ce qui fait leur beauté est invisible!

—Je suis content, dit-il, que tu sois d'accord avec mon renard.

Comme le petit prince s'endormait, je le pris dans mes bras, et me remis en route. J'étais ému. Il me semblait porter un trésor fragile. Il me semblait même qu'il n'y eût rien de plus fragile sur la Terre. Je regardais, à la lumière de la lune, ce front pâle. ces yeux clos, ces mèches de cheveux qui tremblaient au vent, et je me disais: ce que je vois là n'est qu'une écorce. Le plus important est invisible...

Comme ses lèvres entrouvertes ébauchaient un demi-sourire je me dis encore: "Ce qui m'émeut si fort de ce petit prince endormi, c'est sa fidélité pour une fleur, c'est l'image d'une rose qui rayonne en lui comme la flamme d'une lampe, même quand il dort...” Et je le devinai plus fragile encore. Il faut bien protéger les lampes: un coup de vent peut les éteindre...

Et, marchant ainsi, je découvris le puits au lever du jour.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩⅤ





—Les hommes, dit le petit prince, ils s'enfoncent dans les rapides, mais ils ne savent plus ce qu'ils cherchent. Alors ils s'agitent et tournent en rond...

Et il ajouta:

—Ce n'est pas la peine...

Le puits que nous avions atteint ne ressemblait pas aux puits sahariens.

Les puits sahariens sont de simples trous creusés dans le sable. Celui-là ressemblait à un puits de village. Mais il n'y avait là aucun village, et je croyais rêver.

—C'est étrange, dis-je au petit prince, tout est prêt: la poulie, le seau et la corde...

Il rit, toucha la corde, fit jouer la poulie. Et la poulie gémit comme une vieille girouette quand le vent a longtemps dormi.

—Tu entends, dit le petit prince, nous réveillons ce puits et il chante...

Je ne voulais pas qu'il fît un effort:

—Laisse-moi faire, lui dis-je, c'est trop lourd pour toi.

Lentement je hissai le seau jusqu'à la margelle. Je l'y installai bien d'aplomb.

Dans mes oreilles durait le chant de la poulie et, dans l'eau qui tremblait encore, je voyais trem-ber le soleil.

—J'ai soif de cette eau-là, dit le petit prince, donne-moi à boire...

Et je compris ce qu'il avait cherché!

Je soulevai le seau jusqu'à ses lèvres. Il but, les yeux fermés. C'était doux comme une fête. Cette eau était bien autre chose qu'un aliment. Elle était née de la marche sous les étoiles, du chant de la poulie, de l'effort de mes bras. Elle était bonne pour le cœur, comme un cadeau. Lorsque j'étais petit garçon, la lumière de l'arbre de Noël, la musique de la messe de minuit, la douceur des sourires faisaient ainsi tout le rayonnement du cadeau de Noël que je recevais.

—Les hommes de chez toi, dit le petit prince, cultivent cinq mille roses dans le même jardin... et ils n'y trouvent pas ce qu'ils cherchent...

—Ils ne le trouvent pas, répondis-je...

—Et cependant ce qu'ils cherchent pourrait être trouvé dans une seule rose ou un peu d'eau...

Et le petit prince ajouta:

—Mais les yeux sont aveugles. Il faut chercher avec le cœur.





J'avais bu. Je respirais bien. Le sable, au lever du jour, est couleur de miel.

J'étais heureux aussi de cette couleur de miel. Pourquoi fallait-il que j'eusse de la peine...

—Il faut que tu tiennes ta promesse, me dit doucement le petit prince, qui, de nouveau, s'était assis auprès de moi.

—Quelle promesse?

—Tu sais... une muselière pour mon mouton... je suis responsable de cette fleur!

Je sortis de ma poche mes ébauches de dessin. Le petit prince les aperçut et dit en riant:

—Tes baobabs, ils ressemblent un peu à des choux...

—Oh!

Moi qui étais si fier des baobabs!

—Ton renard... ses oreilles... elles ressemblent un peu à des cornes... et elles sont trop longues!

Et il rit encore.

—Tu es injuste, petit bonhomme, je ne savais rien dessiner que les boas fermés et les boas ouverts.

—Oh! ça ira, dit-il, les enfants savent.

Je crayonnai donc une muselière. Et j'eus le cœur serré en la lui donnant:

—Tu as des projets que j'ignore...

Mais il ne me répondit pas. Il me dit:

—Tu sais, ma chute sur la Terre... c'en sera demain l'anniversaire...

Puis après un silence il dit encore:

—J'étais tombé tout près d'ici...

Et il rougit.

Et de nouveau, sans comprendre pourquoi, j'éprouvai un chagrin bizarre.

Cependant une question me vint:

—Alors ce n'est pas par hasard que, le matin où je t'ai connu, il y a huit jours, tu te promenais comme ça, tout seul, à mille milles de toutesles régions habitées! Tu retournais vers le point de ta chute?

Le peptit prince rougit encore.

Et j'ajoutai, en hésitant:

—À cause, peut-être, de lnniversaire?...

Le petit prince rougit de nouveau. Il ne répondait jamais aux questions, mais, quand on rougit, ça signifie "oui”, n'est-ce pas?

—Ah! lui dis-je, j'ai peur...

Mais il me répondit:

—Tu dois maintenent travailler. Tu dois repartir vers ta machine. Je t'attends ici. Reviens demain soir...

Mais je n'étais pas rassuré. Je me souvenais du renard. On risque de pleurer un peu si l'on s'est laissé apprivoisé...





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩⅥ





Il y avait, à côté du puits, une ruine de vieux mur de pierre. Lorsque je revins de mon travail, le lendemain soir, j'aperçus de loin mon petit prince assis là-haut, les jambes pendantes. Et je l'entendis qui parlait:

—Tu ne t'en souvens donc pas? disait-il. Ce n'est pas tout à fait ici!

Une autre voix lui répondit sans doute, puisqu'il répliqua:

—Si! Si! c'est bien le jour, mais ce n'est pas ici l'endroit...

Je poursuivis ma marche vers le mur. Je ne voyais ni entendais toujours personne. Pourtant le petit prince répliqua de nouveau:

—... Bien sûr. Tu verras où commence ma trace dans le sable. Tu n'as qu'a m'y attendre. J'y serai cette nuit...

J'étais à vingt mètres du mur et je ne voyais toujours rien.

Le petit prince dit encore, après un silence:

—Tu as du bon venin? Tu es sûr de ne pas me faire souffrir longtemps?

Je fis halte, le cœur serré, mais je ne comprennais toujours pas.

—Maintenent va-t'en, dit-il... je veux redescendre!

Alors j'abaissai moi-même les yeux vers le pied du mur, et je fis un bond! Il était là, dressé vers le petit prince, un de ces serpents jaunes qui vous exécutent en trente secondes. Tout en fouillant ma poche pour en tirer mon révolver, je pris le pas de course, mais, au bruit que je fis, le serpent se laissa doucement couler dans le sable, comme un jet d'eau qui meurt, et, sans trop se presser, se faufilla entre les pierres avec un léger bruit de métal.

Je parvins au mur juste à temps pour y recevoir dans les bras mon petit bonhomme de prince, pâle comme la neige.

—Quelle est cette histoire-là! Tu parles maintenent avec les serpents!

J'avais défait son éternel cache-nez d'or. Je lui avait mouillé les tempes et l'avais fait boire. Et maintenant je n'osais plus rien lui demander. Il me regarda gravement et m'entoura le cou de ses bras. Je sentais battre son cœur comme celui d'un oiseau qui meurt, quand on l'a tiré à la carabine. Il me dit:

—Je suis content que tu aies trouvé ce qui manquait à ta machine. Tu vas pouvoir rentrer chez toi...

—Comment sais-tu?

Je venais justement lui annoncer que, contre toute espérence, j'avais réussi mon travail!

Il ne répondit rien à ma question, mais il ajouta:

—Moi aussi, aujourd'hui, je rentre chez moi...

Puis, mélancolique:

—C'est bien plus loin... c'est bien plus difficile...

Je sentais bien qu'il se passait quelque chose d'extraordinaire. Je le serrais dans mes bras comme un petit enfant, et cependant il me semblait qu'il coulait verticalement dans un abîme sans que je pusse rien pour le retenir...

Il avait le regard sérieux, perdu très loin:

—J'ai ton mouton. Et j'ai la caisse pour le mouton. Et j'ai la muselière...

Et il sourit avec mélancolie.

J'attendis longtemps. Je sentais qu'il se réchauffait peu à peu:

—Petit bonhomme, tu as eu peur...

Il avait eu peur, bien sûr! Mais il rit doucement:

—J'aurai bien plus peur ce soir...

De nouveau je me sentis glacé par le sentiment de l'irréparable. Et je compris que je ne supportais pas l'idée de ne plus jamais entendre ce rire. C'était pour moi comme une fontaine dans le désert.

—Petit bonhomme, je veux encore t'entendre rire...

Mais il me dit:

—Cette nuit, ça fera un an. Mon étoile se trouvera juste au-dessus de l'endroit où je suis tombé l'année dernière...

—Petit bonhomme, n'est-ce pas que c'est un mauvais rêve cette histoire de serpent et de rendez-vous et d'étoile...

Mais il ne répondit pas à ma question. Il me dit:

—Ce qui est important, ça ne se voit pas...

—Bien sûr...

—C'est comme pour la fleur. Si tu aimes une fleur qui se trouve dans une étoile, c'est doux, la nuit, de regarder le ciel. Toutes les étoiles sont fleuries.

—Bien sûr...

—C'est comme pour léau. Celle que tu m'as donnée à boire était comme une musique, à cause de la poulie et de la corde... tu te rappelles... elle était banne.

—Bien sûr...

—Tu regarderas, la nuit, les étoiles. C'est trop petit chez moi pour que je te montres où se trouve la mienne. C'est mieux comme ça. Mon étoile, ça sera pour toi une des étoiles. Alors, toutes les étoiles, tu aimeras les regarder... Elles seront toutes tes amies. Et puis je vais te faire un cadeau...

Il rit encore.

—Ah! petit bonhomme, petit bonhomme, j'aime entendre ce rire!

—Justement ce sera mon cadeau... ce sera comme pour l'eau...

—Que veux-tu dire?

—Les gens ont des étoiles qui ne sont pas les mêmes. Pour les uns, qui voyagent, les étoiles sont des guides. Pour d'autres elles ne sont rien que de petites lumières. Pour d'autres qui sont savants, elles sont des problèmes. Pour mon businessman elles étaient de l'or. Mais toutes ces étoiles-là se taisent.

Toi, tu auras des étoiles comme personne n'en a...

—Que veux-tu dire?

—Quand tu regarderas le ciel, la nuit, puisque j'habiterai dans l'une d'elles, puisque je rirai dans l'une d'elles, alors ce sera pour toi comme si riaient toutes les étoiles. Tu auras, toi, des étoiles qui savent rire!

Et il rit encore.

—Et quand tu seras consolé (on se console toujours) tu seras content de m'avoir connu. Tu seras toujours mon ami. Tu auras envie de rire avec moi. Et tu ouvriras parfois ta fenêtre, comme ça, pour le plaisir... Et tes amis seront bien étonnés de te voir rire en regardant le ciel. Alors tu leur diras: "Oui, les étoiles, ça me fait toujours rire!” Et ils te croiront fou. Je t'aurai joué un bien vilain tour...

Et il rit encore.

—Ce sera comme si je t'avais donné, au lieu d'étoiles, des tas de petits grelots qui savent rire...

Et il rit encore. Puis il redevint sérieux:

—Cette nuit... tu sais... ne viens pas.

—Je ne te quitterai pas.

—J'aurai l'air d'avoir mal... j'aurai un peu l'air de mourir. C'est comme ça. Ne viens pas voir ça, ce n'est pas la peine...

—Je ne te quitterai pas.

Mais il était soucieux.

—Je te dis ça... c'est à cause aussi du serpent. Il ne faut pas qu'il te morde... Les serpents, c'est méchant. Ça peut mordre pour le plaisir...

—Je ne te quitterai pas.

Mais quelque chose le rassura:

—C'est vrai qu'ils n'ont plus de venin pour la seconde morsure...

Cette nuit-là je ne le vis pas se mettre en route. Il s'était évadé sans bruit.

Quand je réussis à le joindre il marchait décidé, d'un pas rapide. Il me dit seulement:

—Ah! tu es là...

Et il me prit par la main. Mais il se tourmenta encore:

—Tu as eu tort. Tu auras de la peine. J'aurai l'air d'être mort et ce ne sera pas vrai...

Moi je me taisais.

—Tu comprends. C'est trop loin. Je ne peux pas emportes ce corps-là. C'est trop lourd.

Moi je me taisais.

—Mais ce sera comme une vieille écorce abandonnée. Ce n'est pas triste les vieilles écorces...

Moi je me taisais.

Il se découragea un peu. Mais il fit encore un effort:

—Ce sera gentil, tu sais. Moi aussi je regarderai les étoiles. Toutes les étoiles seront des puits avec une poulie rouillée. Toutes les étoiles me verseront à boire...

Moi je me taisais.

—Ce sera tellement amusant! Tu auras cinq cents millions de grelots, j'aurai cinq cent millions de fontaines...

Et il se tut aussi, parce qu'il pleurait...

—C'est là. Laisse moi faire un pas tout seul.

Et il s'assit parce qu'il avait peur. Il dit encore:

—Tu sais... ma fleur... j'en suis responsable! Et elle est tellement faible! ET elle est tellement naïve. Elle a quatre épines de rien du tout pour la protéger contre le monde...

Moi je m'assis parce que je ne pouvais plus me tenir debout. Il dit:

—Voilà... C'est tout...

Il hésita encore un peu, puis se releva. Il fit un pas. Moi je ne pouvais pas bouger.

Il n'y eut rien qu'un éclair jaune près de sa cheville. Il demeura un instant immobile. Il ne cria pas. Il tomba doucement comme tombe un arbre. Ça ne fit même pas de bruit, à cause du sable.





Le Chapitre ⅩⅩⅦ





ET maintenant, bien sûr, ça fait six ans déjà... Je n'ai jamais encore raconté cette histoire. Les camarades qui m'ont revu ont été bien contents de me revoir vivant. J'étais triste mais je leur disais: C'est la fatigue...

Maintenant je me suis un peu consolé. C'est à dire... pas tout à fait. Mais je sais bien qu'il est revenu à sa planète, car, au lever du jour, je n'ai pas retrouvé son corps. Ce n'était pas un corps tellement lourd... Et j'aime la nuit écouter les étoiles. C'est comme cinq cent millions de grelots...

Mais voilà qu'il se passe quelque chose d'extraordinaire. La muselière que j'ai dessinée pour le petit prince, j'ai oublié d'y ajouter la courroie de cuir! Il n'aura jamais pu l'attacher au mouton. Alors je me demande: "Que s'est-il passé sur sa planète? Peut-être bien que le mouton à mangé la fleur...”

Tantôt je me dis: "Sûrement non! Le petit prince enferme sa fleur toutes les nuits sous son globe de verre, et il surveille bien son mouton...” Alors je suis heureux. Et toutes les étoiles rient doucement.

Tantôt je me dis: "On est distrait une fois ou l'autre, et ça suffit! Il a oublié, un soir, le globe le verre, ou bien le mouton est sorti sans bruit pendant la nuit...” Alors les grelots se changent tous en larmes!...

C'est là un bien grand mystère. Pour vous qui aimez aussi le petit prince, comme pour moi, rien de l'univers n'est semblable si quelque part, on ne sait où, un mouton que nous ne connaissons pas a, oui ou non, mangé une rose...

Regardez le ciel. Demandez-vous: le mouton oui ou non a-t-il mangé la fleur? Et vous verrez comme tout change...

Et aucune grande personne ne comprendra jamais que ça a tellement d'importance!





Ca c'est pour moi, le plus beau et le plus triste paysage du monde. C'est le même paysage que celui de la page précédente, mais je l'ai dessiné une fois encore pour bien vous le montrer. C'est ici que le petit prince a apparu sur terre, puis disparu.

Regardez attentivement ce paysage afin d'être sûr de le reconnaître, si vous voyagez un jour en Afrique, dans le désert. Et, s'il vous arrive de passer par là, je vous en supplie, ne vous pressez pas, attendez un peu juste sous l'étoile! Si alors un enfant vient à vous, s'il rit, s'il a des cheveux d'or, s'il ne répond pas quand on l'inter roge, vous devinerez bien qui il est. Alors soyez gentils! Ne me laissez pas tellement triste: écrivez-moi vite qu'il est revenu...





责任编辑：刘　桦

封面设计：奇文雲海　视觉传达





《小王子》，60岁生日快乐

亲爱的小王子，你已经长大，并满60周岁了，让我们一齐道声：小王子，生日快乐！





《小王子》，曾是法国最著名的书，也是全世界最令人喜爱的书，现在仍是！尽管这本法国人写的童话于1943年在美国首次出版，而法国人却只愿意记得它的法国出版日——1946年4月。2006年4月，法国人高调为它过了60岁大寿，他们用法语向全球宣布：《小王子》刚满60周岁！那就让我们尊重骄傲的法国人的意愿，再纪念一次《小王子》诞生60周年吧！





根据《小王子》官方网站公布的最新数据，此书在全世界已销售8000万册，仅在法国的销量就达1100万册。它已被译成160余种语言，中文版本估计有上百种之多。几年前，法国人毫不吝啬地将“20世纪最佳法语图书”的桂冠授予了《小王子》，《追忆似水年华》等一连串伟大的现代文学经典也只能排名其后。





